Maryland, session 2026, HB1532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 10–862 and the part “Part VII. Short Title” of Article – Economic
Development of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 10–871 and
the part “Part VIII. Short Title”.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 5–5A–08 through
5–5A–10 of Article – Human Services of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to
be Section(s) 5–5A–09 through 5–5A–11, respectively.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 7–512.1 of
Article – Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of Maryland be transferred to be Section(s)
5–5A–08 of Article – Human Services of the Annotated Code of Maryland.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–826.
(a) On or before December 1 of each year, the Center shall report to the Governor,
the Administration, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly.
(b) The report shall include:
(1) a complete operating and financial statement covering the Center’s
operations;
(2) a summary of the Center’s activities during the preceding fiscal year;
[and]
(3) a summary of the Center’s activities specific to clean energy innovation;
AND
(4) A SUMMARY OF THE CENTER’S ACTIVITIES SPECIFIC TO THE
GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY FOR NONPROFITS LOAN PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–863 OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING:
(I) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF LOANS AWARDED;
(II) THE TOTAL MONETARY VALUE OF THE LOANS AWARDED;
(III) THE AVERAGE TERM OF LOANS IN THE LOAN PORTFOLIO;
(IV) THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL ENERGY SAVINGS, IN
KILOWATT–HOURS, RESULTING FROM MEASURES ASSOCIATED WITH LOANS IN THE
LOAN PORTFOLIO; AND
(V) THE ESTIMATED REDUCTION OF GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS, IN METRIC TONS, ASSOCIATED WITH LOANS IN THE LOAN PORTFOLIO.
PART VII. GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY FOR NONPROFITS LOAN
PROGRAM.
10–862.
– 11 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
(B) “BORROWER” MEANS A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT APPLIES AND
QUALIFIES FOR A LOAN UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY FOR
NONPROFITS LOAN FUND.
(D) “NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ORGANIZATION THAT IS
EXEMPT FROM FEDERAL INCOME TAX UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY
FOR NONPROFITS LOAN PROGRAM.
(F) “QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM” MEANS A SYSTEM THAT:
(1) GENERATES ELECTRICITY OR USABLE THERMAL ENERGY THAT IS
USED TO MEET ON–SITE DEMAND; AND
(2) ASSISTS THE STATE IN MEETING THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND
GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION GOALS UNDER TITLE 2, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
10–863.
THERE IS A GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY FOR NONPROFITS
LOAN PROGRAM IN THE CENTER.
10–864.
THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE IN
THE FORM OF NO–INTEREST LOANS TO NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS FOR:
(1) THE PLANNING, PURCHASE, AND INSTALLATION OF QUALIFYING
ENERGY SYSTEMS IN THE STATE; AND
(2) ACTIONS THAT IMPROVE ENERGY EFFICIENCY, SUCH AS
REPAIRING OR REPLACING WINDOWS, DOORS, AND HEATING, VENTILATION, AND
AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEMS AND OTHER SIMILAR IMPROVEMENTS.
10–865.
THE CENTER SHALL:
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(1) MANAGE, SUPERVISE, AND ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM;
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ENSURE THAT LOANS PROVIDED TO
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS CARRY OUT THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(3) ATTACH TO ANY LOAN SPECIFIC TERMS THAT ARE CONSIDERED
NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS FULFILLED.
10–866.
(A) (1) A BORROWER MUST FILE AN APPLICATION WITH THE CENTER TO
RECEIVE A LOAN UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE APPLICATION MUST BE SIGNED BY THE CHIEF OPERATING
OFFICER OR AN AUTHORIZED OFFICER OF THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION.
(B) THE APPLICATION MUST CONTAIN ANY INFORMATION THE CENTER
DETERMINES IS NECESSARY, INCLUDING:
(1) THE PROJECTED COST OF THE QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM,
ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION, OR TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE BEING FINANCED
THROUGH THE LOAN;
(2) THE LOCATION OF THE PROPERTY WHERE THE QUALIFYING
ENERGY SYSTEM WILL BE INSTALLED OR AN ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION WILL
OCCUR AND WHETHER THE PROPERTY IS OWNED OR LEASED BY THE APPLICANT;
(3) (I) EVIDENCE THAT THE BORROWER:
1. IS CURRENT ON ITS REGISTRATION STATUS WITH THE
SECRETARY OF STATE AT THE TIME THE BORROWER SUBMITS THE APPLICATION; OR
2. IS AN EXEMPT ORGANIZATION THAT IS COMPLYING
WITH ANY FILING REQUIREMENTS OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE RELATED TO
EXEMPT ORGANIZATIONS; OR
(II) CERTIFICATION THAT THE BORROWER IS NOT REQUIRED TO
REGISTER OR FILE AS AN EXEMPT ORGANIZATION WITH THE SECRETARY OF STATE
BECAUSE THE BORROWER DOES NOT SOLICIT CHARITABLE CONTRIBUTIONS IN THE
STATE; AND
(4) ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION RELATING TO THE BORROWER OR
THE PROPOSED QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM OR ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION
– 13 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
BEING FINANCED THROUGH THE LOAN THAT MAY BE REQUIRED BY THE CENTER TO
ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE CENTER MAY APPROVE AN APPLICATION FOR A LOAN SPECIFIED IN
§ 10–867(A)(1) OR (3) OF THIS SUBTITLE ONLY IF THE APPLICATION DEMONSTRATES
THAT THE PROPOSED QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM OR ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION
IS ESTIMATED, BASED ON PROJECTED ENERGY COSTS, TO GENERATE ENERGY COST
SAVINGS OVER THE USEFUL LIFE OF THE SYSTEM OR ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION
THAT EQUAL OR EXCEED THE TOTAL AMORTIZED COST OF THE LOAN.
(D) IN APPROVING AN APPLICATION, THE CENTER SHALL CONSIDER AND
GIVE PRIORITY TO AN APPLICANT THAT HAS AN ANNUAL BUDGET OF $1,000,000 OR
LESS.
10–867.
(A) LOANS FROM THE FUND MAY BE USED FOR:
(1) THE PURCHASE AND INSTALLATION OF A QUALIFYING ENERGY
SYSTEM, INCLUDING ANY NECESSARY ANCILLARY MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, OR
FURNISHINGS;
(2) TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR THE PLANNING AND INSTALLATION
OF A QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM; AND
(3) ACTIONS THAT IMPROVE ENERGY EFFICIENCY, SUCH AS
REPAIRING OR REPLACING WINDOWS, DOORS, AND HEATING, VENTILATION, AND
AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEMS AND OTHER SIMILAR IMPROVEMENTS.
(B) EACH BORROWER FOR A LOAN UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OR (3) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL CONTRIBUTE AT LEAST 10% OF THE COST OF THE QUALIFYING
ENERGY SYSTEM OR ENERGY EFFICIENCY ACTION.
(C) (1) LOANS MADE UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL BE REPAYABLE BY THE
BORROWER IN ACCORDANCE WITH A SCHEDULE SET BY THE CENTER.
(2) THE SCHEDULE SET BY THE CENTER MAY BE ON A DEFERRED
PAYMENT BASIS.
(D) (1) A BORROWER SHALL PROVIDE ASSURANCES FOR THE REPAYMENT
OF A LOAN.
(2) THE ASSURANCES:
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(I) SHALL INCLUDE A PROMISSORY NOTE; AND
(II) MAY INCLUDE A PLAN FOR REPAYMENT.
(E) LOANS MAY BE MADE IN CONJUNCTION WITH OR IN ADDITION TO
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROVIDED THROUGH OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL
PROGRAMS.
10–868.
(A) THERE IS A GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY FOR
NONPROFITS LOAN FUND.
(B) THE CENTER SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(C) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE CENTER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY AND ACCOUNT
FOR THE FUND.
(D) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) MONEY TRANSFERRED FROM THE STRATEGIC ENERGY
INVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE;
(3) MONEY RECEIVED FROM ANY PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SOURCE;
(4) INTEREST AND INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(5) REPAYMENTS AND PREPAYMENTS ON LOANS MADE FROM THE
FUND.
(E) (1) IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $5,000,000 FOR THE FUND.
(2) IN FISCAL YEAR 2029, THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION EQUAL TO AT LEAST $5,000,000 MINUS
THE AMOUNT IN THE FUND AS OF JUNE 30 OF THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL
YEAR.
– 15 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY:
(1) TO PAY THE EXPENSES OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) TO PROVIDE LOANS TO ELIGIBLE BORROWERS UNDER THE
PROGRAM.
(G) (1) THE CENTER SHALL INVEST AND REINVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY HELD BY THE CENTER MAY BE
INVESTED.
(2) ANY INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE PAID INTO
THE FUND.
(3) ANY REPAYMENT ON LOANS MADE FROM THE FUND SHALL BE PAID
INTO THE FUND.
10–869. RESERVED.
10–870. RESERVED.
Article – Environment
2–1209.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PREPARE AN ANNUAL REPORT ON THE
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS ACHIEVED AS A RESULT OF THE
ADOPTION OF ELECTRIC VEHICLES IN THE STATE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY,
AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ENVIRONMENT AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMITTEE.
Article – Housing and Community Development
2–102.
(a) The Department shall:
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(10) develop and implement a weatherization program in accordance with
Title 4 of this article and administer the low–income weatherization component of the electric
universal service program in accordance with [§ 7–512.1 of the Public Utilities Article] §
5–5A–08 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE.
Article – Human Services
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Family Investment Administration.
(c) “Department” means the Department of Human Services.
5–5A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION.
[(b)] (C) “Energy emergency” means a lack of fuel or the imminent
discontinuation of energy services supplied by a fuel vendor or utility vendor that will
endanger health, safety, or welfare.
[(c)] (D) “Fuel vendor” means a person that distributes, transports, produces, or
offers for sale coal products, fuel oil, kerosene, bottled gas, propane, or wood for fuel use or
consumption in the State.
[(d)] (E) “Office” means the Office of Home Energy Programs.
[(e)] (F) “Program” means the Energy Assistance Program.
[(f)] (G) “Utility vendor” means a person that distributes, transports, or produces
natural gas or electricity for use or consumption in the State.
5–5A–02.
There is an Office of Home Energy Programs in the Administration.
5–5A–03.
The purpose of the Office is to carry out this subtitle.
5–5A–08.
– 17 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) (I) [The Commission shall establish] THERE IS an electric universal
service program [to assist electric customers with annual incomes at or below 200% of the
federal poverty level] IN THE OFFICE.
(II) THE OFFICE SHALL IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE
ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE PROGRAM.
(III) THE PURPOSE OF THE ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE
PROGRAM IS TO ASSIST ELECTRIC CUSTOMERS WITH ANNUAL INCOMES AT OR BELOW
200% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL.
(2) The components of the electric universal service program shall include:
(i) bill assistance;
(ii) low–income residential weatherization; and
(iii) the retirement of arrearages for electric customers who have not
received assistance in retiring arrearages under the ELECTRIC universal service program
within the preceding 5 fiscal years.
(3) The Department of Housing and Community Development is responsible
for administering the low–income residential weatherization component of the electric
universal service program.
(4) [(i) The Department of Human Services, through the Office of Home
Energy Programs, is responsible for administering the bill assistance and the arrearage
retirement components of the electric universal service program.
(ii)] (I) The [Department of Human Services] OFFICE may:
1. establish minimum and maximum benefits available to an
electric customer under the bill assistance and arrearage retirement components; and
2. coordinate benefits under the electric universal service
program with benefits under the Maryland Energy Assistance Program and other available
energy assistance programs.
(II) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, THE OFFICE SHALL
AUTHORIZE BENEFITS UNDER THE ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE PROGRAM FOR AN
ELECTRIC CUSTOMER WHO MEETS THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
PROGRAM BUT WHO DOES NOT MEET THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
FEDERAL LOW INCOME HOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(III) THE OFFICE SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS GOVERNING
ELIGIBILITY FOR BENEFITS UNDER THE ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE PROGRAM.
(5) The [Department of Human Services] OFFICE may, with input from a
panel or roundtable of interested parties, contract to assist in administering the bill
assistance and the arrearage retirement components of the electric universal service
program.
(6) The Commission has oversight responsibility for the bill assistance and
the arrearage retirement components of the electric universal service program and any other
funds expended under this section.
(7) In a specific case, the electric universal service program may waive the
income eligibility limitation under paragraph (1) of this subsection in order to provide
assistance to an electric customer who would qualify for a similar waiver under [the
Maryland Energy Assistance Program established under Title 5, Subtitle 5A of the Human
Services Article] ANOTHER PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(8) (i) If an applicant for bill assistance or arrearage retirement is to be
denied due to deficient documentation, the [Department of Human Services] OFFICE shall:
1. promptly provide notice of the deficiency to the applicant;
and
2. afford the applicant ample opportunity of not less than 3
months to cure the deficiency.
(ii) An electric company may not begin the process to terminate
service to an applicant while the applicant is curing a deficiency under this paragraph.
(9) Notwithstanding paragraph (2)(iii) of this subsection, any assistance
received for arrearage retirement by a customer in calendar years 2020 and 2021 may not
be counted toward the limitation on the number of times the customer may receive assistance
for arrearage retirement.
(b) (1) All customers shall contribute to the funding of the electric universal
service program through a charge collected by each electric company.
(2) The Commission shall determine a fair and equitable allocation for
collecting the charges among all customer classes pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.
(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, in accordance
with subsection (f)(6) of this section, any unexpended bill assistance and arrearage
retirement funds returned to customers under subsection (f) of this section shall be returned
to each customer class as a credit in the same proportion that the customer class contributed
charges to the fund.
– 19 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) The Department [of Human Services] shall expend any unexpended bill
assistance and arrearage funds that were collected in fiscal years 2010 through 2017, in
excess of the total amount authorized under subsection (e) of this section, for one or more of
the following purposes:
(i) bill assistance and the retirement of arrearages for customers who
are eligible to receive assistance at the time services are provided;
(ii) targeted and enhanced low–income residential weatherization
designed to remediate households that are considered ineligible to participate in other State
energy efficiency programs due to significant health and safety hazards;
(iii) an arrearage management program for low–income customers in
arrears, including providing credits or matching payments for customers who make timely
payments on current bills; or
(iv) an arrearage prevention program for low–income customers.
(5) An electric company shall recover electric universal service program
costs in accordance with § 7–512 of [this subtitle] THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(6) As determined by the Office [of Home Energy Programs], bill assistance
payments to an electric company may be on a monthly basis for each customer.
(7) The Commission shall determine the allocation of the electric universal
service charge among the generation, transmission, and distribution rate components of all
classes.
(8) The Commission may not assess the electric universal service surcharge
on a per kilowatt–hour basis.
(c) (1) On or before January 1 of each year, the Commission shall report,
subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly on the electric
universal service program, including:
(i) subject to subsection (e) of this section, a recommendation on the
total amount of funds for the ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE program for the following
fiscal year based on:
1. the level of participation in and the amounts expended on
bill assistance and arrearage retirement during the preceding fiscal year;
2. how bill assistance and arrearage retirement payments
were calculated during the preceding fiscal year;
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
3. the projected needs for the bill assistance and the arrearage
retirement components for the next fiscal year; and
4. the amount of any bill assistance or arrearage retirement
surplus carried over in the electric universal service program fund under subsection (f)(6)(i)
of this section;
(ii) for bill assistance, the total amount of need, as determined by the
Commission, for electric customers with annual incomes at or below 175% of the federal
poverty level and the basis for this determination;
(iii) the amount of funds needed, as determined by the Commission, to
retire arrearages for electric customers who have not received assistance in retiring
arrearages under the electric universal service program within the preceding 7 fiscal years,
and the basis for this determination;
(iv) the amount of funds needed, as determined by the Commission,
for bill assistance and arrearage retirement, respectively, for customers for whom income
limitations may be waived under subsection (a)(7) of this section, and the basis for each
determination;
(v) the impact on customers’ rates, including the allocation among
customer classes, from collecting the total amount recommended by the Commission under
item (i) of this paragraph; and
(vi) the impact of using other federal poverty level benchmarks on
costs and the effectiveness of the electric universal service program.
(2) (i) To assist the Commission in preparing its recommendations
under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Office [of Home Energy Programs] shall report
to the Commission each year on:
1. the number of customers and the amount of distributions
made to fuel customers under the Maryland Energy Assistance Program established under
[Title 5, Subtitle 5A of the Human Services Article] THIS SUBTITLE, identified by funding
source and fuel source;
2. the cost of outreach and education materials provided by
the Office [of Home Energy Programs] for the electric universal service program; and
3. the amount of money that the Department [of Human
Services] receives, and is projected to receive, for low–income energy assistance from:
A. the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund under §
9–20B–05 of the State Government Article;
– 21 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. with respect to electric customers only, the Maryland
Energy Assistance Program; and
C. any other federal, State, local, or private source.
(ii) The Office [of Home Energy Programs] may satisfy the reporting
requirement of subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph by providing the Commission with a
copy of material that contains the required information and that the Office [of Home Energy
Programs] submits to the federal government.
(iii) The Commission shall include the information provided by the
Office [of Home Energy Programs] under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph in its report to
the General Assembly under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) Subject to subsection (d)(2) of this section, the Commission shall include
the information provided by the Department of Housing and Community Development under
subsection (d)(1) of this section in its report to the General Assembly under paragraph (1) of
this subsection.
(4) The electric universal service program shall be subject to audit by the
Office of Legislative Audits in accordance with §§ 2–1220 through 2–1227 of the State
Government Article.
(d) (1) On or before January 1 of each year, the Department of Housing and
Community Development shall report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, to the General Assembly on the low–income residential weatherization component of
the electric universal service program, including:
(i) the amount of funds expended during the preceding fiscal year;
(ii) the level of participation during the preceding fiscal year,
including the number of households served in each area of the State; and
(iii) the types of projects, including the average cost per unit, provided
to households during the preceding fiscal year.
(2) The Department of Housing and Community Development may satisfy
the reporting requirement under paragraph (1) of this subsection by requesting the
Commission to include the information in the Commission’s report required under
subsection (c) of this section and providing the information to the Commission by the date
specified by the Commission.
(e) The total amount of funds to be collected for the electric universal service
program each year shall be $37 million, allocated in the following manner:
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(1) $27.4 million shall be collected from the industrial and commercial
classes; and
(2) $9.6 million shall be collected from the residential class.
(f) (1) In this subsection, “fund” means the electric universal service program
fund.
(2) There is an electric universal service program fund.
(3) (i) 1. The Comptroller shall collect the revenue collected by
electric companies under subsection (b) of this section and place the revenue into the fund.
2. The General Assembly may appropriate funds
supplemental to the funds collected under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph.
(ii) The fund is a continuing, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(iii) The purpose of the fund is to assist electric customers as provided
in subsection (a)(1) of this section.
(4) The Department [of Human Services], with oversight by the
Commission, shall disburse the bill assistance and arrearage retirement funds in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
(5) The Comptroller annually shall disburse up to $1,000,000 of
low–income residential weatherization funds to the Department of Housing and Community
Development, as provided in the State budget.
(6) (i) At the end of a given fiscal year, any unexpended bill assistance
and arrearage retirement funds that were collected for that fiscal year shall be retained in
the fund and shall be made available for disbursement through the first 6 months of the next
fiscal year to customers who:
1. qualify for assistance from the fund during the given fiscal
year;
2. apply for assistance from the fund before the end of the
given fiscal year; and
3. remain eligible for assistance at the time services are
provided.
(ii) If the Commission determines that an extension is needed, the
Commission may extend up to an additional 6 months the period in which unexpended bill
– 23 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
assistance and arrearage retirement funds may be made available for disbursement under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(iii) 1. Any bill assistance and arrearage retirement funds
collected for a given fiscal year that are retained under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
and that remain unexpended at the end of the period allowed under subparagraphs (i) and
(ii) of this paragraph shall be returned to each customer class in the proportion that the
customer class contributed charges to the fund for the given fiscal year in the form of a credit
toward the charge assessed in the following fiscal year.
2. If the Commission determines that it is impractical to
establish a rate credit for the amount to be returned for a given fiscal year to customers under
subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph, the Commission:
A. may defer the return for not more than 2 additional fiscal
years; and
B. shall combine the returned amount for that fiscal year with
amounts to be returned for the following fiscal years when calculating the rate credit for the
final fiscal year of the period.
(g) (1) If a party to a merger or acquisition of an electric company or an affiliate
of an electric company is required to distribute a credit to the customers in the electric
company’s service territory under an agreement with the Commission in connection with the
merger or acquisition, the Commission shall consider the adequacy of the current funding
of the electric universal service program in providing assistance to customers who qualify
under this section.
(2) Any funds deposited into the electric universal service program fund as
a result of an agreement with the Commission in connection with a merger or acquisition of
an electric company or an affiliate of an electric company are in addition to, and may not
substitute for, funds collected under subsection (e) of this section.
(h) (1) An arrearage prevention program under subsection (b)(4)(iv) of this
section is intended to prevent or reduce arrearages for low–income customers who have
participated in a low–income residential weatherization program.
(2) (i) The ARREARAGE PREVENTION program is intended as a
one–time grant of money to establish ongoing arrearage prevention activities in the State.
(ii) The Department [of Human Services], in consultation with the
Commission, will select for the ARREARAGE PREVENTION program up to two public or
private entities as program recipients to administer the program.
(iii) At least one ARREARAGE PREVENTION program recipient must
primarily serve customers in a major urban area of the State.
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(3) [A] AN ARREARAGE PREVENTION program recipient must
demonstrate significant efforts to:
(i) secure additional private investment in rooftop solar installation,
including the use of ARREARAGE PREVENTION program money for credit enhancement,
direct project support, or support for program recipients and customers; and
(ii) provide employment in solar installation to unemployed and
underemployed individuals, with preference for those who reside in the local jurisdiction
where the installations will occur.
(4) The ARREARAGE PREVENTION program may include the installation
of rooftop solar electricity generation equipment after energy efficiency measures at the
residential property have been completed.
Article – Local Government
1–1320.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Administration” means the Maryland Energy Administration.
(3) “Residential energy storage system” means a system, on a residential
customer’s side of the meter, used to store electrical energy, or mechanical, chemical, or
thermal energy that was once electrical energy, for use as electrical energy at a later date or
in a process that offsets electricity use at peak times.
(4) “Residential solar energy system” means any configuration of solar
energy devices that collects and distributes solar energy for the purpose of generating
electricity and that has a single residential interconnection with the electrical grid.
(5) “RESTRICTION ON USE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 2–126 OF
THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(6) “SOLAR PERMITTING FEE” MEANS A FEE EQUAL TO THE SUM OF
ALL CHARGES IMPOSED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY, INCLUDING CHARGES
IMPOSED BY A PROVIDER OF SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE, IN CONNECTION WITH
AN APPLICATION FOR A RESIDENTIAL SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEM.
[(5)] (7) “Solar permitting software” means[:
(i) the most recent version of a web–based platform, developed by the
National Renewable Energy Laboratory, that provides a standard portal for receiving and
– 25 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
processing residential solar energy system and residential energy storage system permit
information; or
(ii) automated software that functions to support the tracking and
approval of residential building permits for residential solar energy systems, residential
energy storage systems, main electrical panel upgrades, and main electrical panel devices]
SOFTWARE OR A COMBINATION OF SOFTWARE THAT:
(I) AUTOMATES PLAN REVIEW FOR RESIDENTIAL SOLAR
ENERGY SYSTEMS TO THE MOST RECENT VERSION OF, AS APPLICABLE:
1. THE MARYLAND BUILDING PERFORMANCE
STANDARDS;
2. THE NATIONAL ELECTRICAL CODE, INCLUDING
LEGALLY ADOPTED LOCAL AMENDMENTS; AND
3. LOCALLY ADOPTED BUILDING CODES;
(II) PRODUCES CODE–COMPLIANT APPROVALS;
(III) ISSUES A CODE–COMPLIANT PERMIT;
(IV) ACCEPTS ONLINE PAYMENTS FOR ANY PERMITTING FEES
IMPOSED;
(V) ISSUES PERMITS OR PERMIT REVISIONS IMMEDIATELY ON
RECEIPT OF ONLINE SUBMISSION OF PERMITTING FEE PAYMENTS, IF APPLICABLE;
(VI) IS CAPABLE OF PROCESSING A MAJORITY OF RESIDENTIAL
SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEM APPLICATIONS; AND
(VII) WHEN A PERMIT IS ISSUED, IMMEDIATELY NOTIFIES A
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY, AS APPLICABLE, OF THE ISSUANCE OF THE PERMIT AND
ALLOWS ACCESS TO APPROVED APPLICATION MATERIALS.
(b) (1) This section applies to all counties and municipalities.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A RESTRICTION ON USE ON:
(I) HISTORIC PROPERTY THAT IS LISTED IN OR DETERMINED BY
THE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND HISTORICAL TRUST TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR
INCLUSION IN THE MARYLAND REGISTER OF HISTORIC PROPERTIES; OR
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(II) PROPERTY LOCATED WITHIN A DISTRICT DESIGNATED BY
THE APPLICABLE LOCAL JURISDICTION TO BE OF HISTORIC SIGNIFICANCE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–105 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE.
(c) (1) Subject to subsection (d) of this section and except as provided in
subsection (e) of this section, on or before August 1, [2025] 2027, each county and
municipality shall implement solar permitting software for features supporting the
[tracking] APPLICATION SUBMISSION, TRACKING, and approval of residential building
permits for:
[(1)] (I) residential solar energy systems;
[(2)] (II) residential energy storage systems;
[(3)] (III) main electrical panel upgrades; and
[(4)] (IV) main electrical panel derates.
(2) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL:
(I) COMPLETE A REMOTE OR IN–PERSON INSPECTION
REQUIRED FOR A PROJECT PERMITTED BY SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE WITHIN
AN AVERAGE OF 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A PROPERLY COMPLETED
REQUEST FOR INSPECTION; AND
(II) MAKE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ANNUAL DATA FOR THE
AVERAGE INSPECTION TIME FOR PROJECTS PERMITTED BY SOLAR PERMITTING
SOFTWARE.
(3) REVIEW OF A PERMIT APPLICATION TO INSTALL A RESIDENTIAL
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT IS SUBMITTED USING SOLAR
PERMITTING SOFTWARE SHALL BE LIMITED TO A DETERMINATION WHETHER THE
APPLICATION MEETS ALL HEALTH AND SAFETY REQUIREMENTS UNDER STATE AND
LOCAL LAW.
(4) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL COMPLETE ANY MANUAL
REVIEW OF A SOFTWARE–APPROVED PERMIT WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE
PERMIT IS APPROVED.
(5) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO A RESIDENTIAL SOLAR
ENERGY SYSTEM:
1. THAT IS OR WILL BE INSTALLED ON A RESIDENTIAL
ROOFTOP; AND
– 27 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. WITH A GENERATING CAPACITY OF LESS THAN 20
KILOWATTS, AS MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE
SYSTEM’S INVERTER.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, BEGINNING AUGUST 1, 2027, A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT
SET A PERMITTING FEE FOR PERMITS ISSUED BY SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE
THAT EXCEEDS $500 FOR RESIDENTIAL SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEMS.
(III) A THIRD–PARTY PAYMENT PROCESSING CHARGE MAY BE
ASSESSED FOR PERMITS ISSUED BY SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE IN ADDITION TO
THE MAXIMUM PERMITTING FEE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(6) AN INSPECTOR MAY REVIEW CONSTRUCTION DOCUMENTS THAT
ARE PRODUCED BY THE SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE.
(d) A county or municipality may not be required to comply with the requirements
of subsection (c) of this section if:
(1) the county or municipality does not require a permit for:
(i) residential solar energy systems; or
(ii) residential solar energy systems paired with a residential solar
energy storage system; or
(2) as determined by the Administration, the automated software is no
longer updated or maintained.
(e) The Administration shall delay the initial implementation or suspend the
requirements of subsection (c) of this section if there are insufficient State or federal funds
available to the Administration to provide financial support to a county or municipality
implementing solar permitting software [as defined in subsection (a)(5)(i) of this section].
(F) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN ELECTRIC
COMPANY, OTHER THAN A MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC UTILITY OR A THIRD–PARTY
CONTRACTOR FOR THE ELECTRIC COMPANY, SHALL PERFORM ANY METER
DISCONNECTION AND RECONNECTION NECESSARY FOR THE INTERCONNECTION OF
A RESIDENTIAL SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEM OR RESIDENTIAL ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM
WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A PROPERLY COMPLETED REQUEST
FROM THE OWNER OR INSTALLER OF THE SYSTEM.
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(2) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY MAY AUTHORIZE QUALIFIED PERSONNEL
WHO ARE NOT ASSOCIATED WITH THE ELECTRIC COMPANY TO PERFORM ANY METER
DISCONNECTION AND RECONNECTION NECESSARY FOR THE INTERCONNECTION OF
A RESIDENTIAL SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEM OR A RESIDENTIAL ENERGY STORAGE
SYSTEM.
(3) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO ALTER
REQUIREMENTS FOR SMALL GENERATOR FACILITY INTERCONNECTION STANDARDS
ESTABLISHED BY THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION.
(G) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY SEEK JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT AGAINST
A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY THAT FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION.
Article – Natural Resources
3–302.
(a) (1) There is an Environmental Trust Fund.
(2) (i) For the purpose of this subtitle, there is established as an added
cost of electricity distributed to retail electric customers within the State, an environmental
surcharge per kilowatt hour of electric energy distributed in the State to be paid by any
electric company as defined in § 1–101 of the Public Utilities Article.
(ii) The Public Service Commission shall impose the surcharge per
kilowatt hour of electric energy distributed to retail electric customers within the State and
shall authorize the electric companies to add the full amount of the surcharge to retail
electric customers’ bills.
(iii) To the extent that the surcharge is not collected from retail electric
customers, the surcharge shall be deemed a cost of distribution and shall be allowed and
computed as such, together with other allowable expenses, for rate–making purposes.
(iv) Revenues from the surcharge shall be collected by the Comptroller
and placed in the Fund.
(b) (1) (i) The Secretary, in consultation with the Director of the Maryland
Energy Administration, annually shall coordinate the preparation of a budget required to
carry out the provisions of this subtitle.
(ii) On approval of the budget by the General Assembly, the Public
Service Commission shall establish the amount of the surcharge per kilowatt hour for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 1972, and for each subsequent fiscal year.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subtitle, the amount of the
surcharge for each account for each retail electric customer may not exceed the lesser of 0.15
– 29 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
mill per kilowatt hour or $1,000 per month and the surcharge may not continue beyond
fiscal year 2030.
(3) (i) The Comptroller shall maintain the method of collection of the
surcharge from the companies and the collections shall accrue to the Fund.
(ii) The Department shall credit against the amount required to be
paid into the Environmental Trust Fund by each electric company an amount equal to 0.75%
of the total surcharge attributed to each company on the basis of the electricity distributed
within Maryland.
(c) (1) (i) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(ii) The Fund is subject to the provisions for financial management
and budgeting established by the Department of Budget and Management.
(iii) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the
General Fund of the State.
(iv) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(v) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the money
in the Fund shall be used to carry out the provisions of this subtitle as provided for in the
budget.
(vi) For the purposes of this subtitle, the Secretary, in consultation
with the Director of the Maryland Energy Administration, may execute appropriate
contracts with any State or federal agency, research organization, industry, or academic
institution to conduct the necessary research, construct or acquire, or both, real property
including physical predictive models, laboratories, buildings, land, and appurtenances, or
support the technological development of extraordinary systems related to power plants
designed to minimize environmental impact.
(vii) The Secretary may utilize available expertise in any other State
unit in the development, execution, and management of contracts and agreements on projects
relating to their areas of prime responsibility.
(2) Money in the Fund may be used for administrative costs calculated in
accordance with § 1–103(b)(2) of this article.
(d) [(1) The Maryland Energy Administration shall receive administrative and
fiscal support from the Fund for studies relating to the conservation or production of electric
energy.
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(2) Fiscal support to the Maryland Energy Administration from the Fund
may not exceed $250,000 in any fiscal year.
(3)] The Chesapeake Bay Trust shall receive $375,000 from the Fund each
fiscal year for the purpose of funding energy conservation projects through the Thomas V.
Mike Miller, Jr., Chesapeake Conservation and Climate Corps Program, as provided under
§§ 8–1913 through 8–1924 of this article.
(e) The Legislative Auditor may conduct post audits of a fiscal and compliance
nature of the Fund and of the appropriations and expenditures made for the purposes of this
subtitle. The cost of the fiscal portion of the post audit examinations shall be an operating
cost of the Fund.
Article – Public Utilities
2–124.
(A) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE COMMISSION:
(1) INCORPORATE KEYWORD SEARCH FUNCTIONALITY FOR, AT A
MINIMUM, MATERIALS PUBLISHED ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE ON AND AFTER
JULY 1, 2026, INCLUDING KEYWORD SEARCH FUNCTIONALITY WITHIN:
(I) THE CASE AND MAILLOG SEARCH;
(II) EACH CASE;
(III) EACH RULEMAKING; AND
(IV) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, EACH PUBLICATION; AND
(2) DEVELOP A LANDING PAGE TEMPLATE FOR MAJOR PROCEEDINGS,
INCLUDING RATE CASES, THAT VISUALLY TRACKS THE MAJOR PROCEEDING
THROUGH EACH STEP OF THE PROCESS.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP DASHBOARDS TO TRACK PROGRESS
TOWARD MAJOR STATE ENERGY PROGRAMS AND GOALS UNDER COMMISSION
OVERSIGHT, INCLUDING:
(1) NET ENERGY METERING; AND
(2) THE STATEWIDE ENERGY STORAGE GOAL UNDER § 7–216.1 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
– 31 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) AT THE REQUEST OF THE COMMISSION, STATE AGENCIES, INCLUDING
THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION, THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT, SHALL PROVIDE TO
THE COMMISSION ANY PUBLICLY DISCLOSABLE INFORMATION NECESSARY FOR THE
COMMISSION TO ACCURATELY TRACK THE PROGRESS AND GOALS IN THE
DASHBOARD REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
3–106.
(a) If a person timely files, the person may apply to intervene in a proceeding before
the Commission.
(b) The Commission shall grant leave to intervene unless the Commission
concludes that:
(1) the parties to the proceeding adequately represent the interest of the
person seeking to intervene; or
(2) the issues that the person seeks to raise are irrelevant or immaterial.
(c) (1) An intervenor has all the rights of a party to a proceeding.
(2) In a proceeding before the Commission, an individual who is an
intervenor may represent himself or herself.
4–203.1.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY
THAT IS AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY, A GAS COMPANY, OR A
COMBINATION GAS AND ELECTRIC COMPANY.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC
UTILITY OR AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN § 4–203 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, WHEN A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY INITIATES A BASE RATE PROCEEDING
OR ANOTHER PROCEEDING THAT MAY LEAD TO A DISTRIBUTION COST INCREASE IN
EXCESS OF 3.0% FOR ITS CUSTOMERS SERVED UNDER A RESIDENTIAL TARIFF, THE
PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE THOSE CUSTOMERS, THROUGH LINKS ON
PHYSICAL OR DIGITAL CUSTOMER BILLS, LINKS IN SEPARATE E–MAILS, OR LINKS IN
ANY OTHER FORM OF COMMUNICATION DETERMINED ACCEPTABLE BY THE
COMMISSION, WITH NOTIFICATION THAT:
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(1) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY IS INITIATING THE PROCEEDING;
AND
(2) INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROCEEDING IS OR WILL BE AVAILABLE
ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE.
(C) A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY SHALL INCLUDE IN EACH RESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMER’S BILL AND AUTOMATIC PAYMENT E–MAIL THE FOLLOWING STATEMENT:
“THE MARYLAND GENERAL ASSEMBLY ESTABLISHED THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMMISSION TO REGULATE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANIES DOING BUSINESS IN
MARYLAND, TO ENSURE THEIR ACTIVITIES ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE PUBLIC
INTEREST. FOR INFORMATION ON HOW TO PARTICIPATE IN OR OBSERVE A
PROCEEDING BEFORE THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION, PLEASE VISIT THE
PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE.”.
4–212.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Contract capacity” means the amount of monthly peak load
requirements:
(i) that is mutually agreed to by an electric company and a large load
customer for each month remaining in a contract term after the load ramp period has ended;
and
(ii) for which:
1. the electric company agrees to provide all of the components
of retail electric service subject to the terms and conditions in its tariffs; and
2. the large load customer agrees to purchase service at that
load level for the stated term of the contract and under the same terms and conditions as
those stated in the contract.
(3) “Large load customer” [means a commercial or industrial customer for
retail electric service that:
(i) has or is projected to have an aggregate monthly demand of at
least 100 megawatts; and
(ii) has or is projected to have a load factor of over 80%] HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 7–232 OF THIS ARTICLE.
– 33 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) “Load ramp period” means the period of time from commencement of
service until a large load customer’s billing calculation is based on the full contract capacity.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that residential retail electric customers
in the State should not bear the financial risks associated with large load customers
interconnecting to the electric system serving the State.
(c) (1) (i) On or before September 1, 2026, each investor–owned electric
company and each electric cooperative shall submit to the Commission for approval a
specific rate schedule for large load customers that accomplishes the intent of subsection (b)
of this section.
(ii) Each municipal electric utility that receives an application for
retail electric service from a large load customer shall submit to the Commission for approval
a specific rate schedule for large load customers.
(2) (i) Service under a specific rate schedule shall be available to large
load customers that will use, within the initial contract term:
1. a monthly maximum demand of more than [100] 25
megawatts at a single location; or
2. an aggregated contract capacity in the electric company’s
service territory of more than [100] 25 megawatts.
(ii) Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, large
load customers that qualify for a specific rate schedule after the effective date of that
schedule:
1. shall take service under the specific rate schedule; and
2. may not be allowed to take service under any other existing
schedule.
(iii) A specific rate schedule does not apply to the facility of an existing
large load customer that has signed a service agreement before the effective date of the
schedule if:
1. the large load customer’s existing load does not expand by
more than 25 megawatts at that facility under the existing service agreement; or
2. the large load customer does not sign a new service
agreement to expand the facility’s load by more than 25 megawatts above the contract
capacity of the existing service agreement.
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(d) In making a determination on whether to approve a specific rate schedule
submitted under subsection (c) of this section, the Commission shall consider whether the
rate schedule:
(1) requires a large load customer to cover the just and reasonable costs
associated with any electric transmission or distribution system buildout required to:
(i) interconnect the large load customer to the electric system serving
the State; or
(ii) serve the large load customer;
(2) protects residential retail electric customers from the financial risks
associated with large load customers through the use of:
(i) load ramp periods;
(ii) minimum billing demand for electric distribution and
transmission service that is a high percentage of a large load customer’s contract capacity;
(iii) long–term contractual commitments and exit fees;
(iv) guarantee or collateral requirements; and
(v) penalties and reimbursement requirements for the large load
customer if the large load customer delays or cancels a project after the electric company has
begun buildout to accommodate the large load customer; [and]
(3) ALLOCATES TO THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER:
(I) ANY INCREASED OR AVOIDED COSTS THAT THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES HAVE BEEN CAUSED BY THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER, INCLUDING ANY
INCREASED OR AVOIDED WHOLESALE COSTS SUCH AS:
1. TRANSMISSION COSTS; AND
2. CAPACITY COSTS; AND
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING § 4–503(B) OF THIS TITLE AND AS
AUTHORIZED UNDER FEDERAL LAW, ANY DIRECT OR INDIRECT COSTS, FEES, AND
OBLIGATIONS THAT ARE NORMALLY APPLIED TO RETAIL ELECTRIC CUSTOMERS IN
THE SERVICE TERRITORY IN WHICH THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER IS LOCATED OR
INTERCONNECTED IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE DIRECT OR
INDIRECT COSTS, FEES, AND OBLIGATIONS SHOULD BE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER; AND
– 35 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(3)] (4) sufficiently ensures that the allocation of costs to large load
customers under the schedule does not result in customers that are not large load customers
unreasonably subsidizing the costs of large load customers under the schedule.
(e) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE COSTS
ALLOCATED TO A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D)(3)
OF THIS SECTION INCLUDE COSTS THAT ARE INCURRED BY A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER
THAT IS NOT PROVIDING 100% OF ITS ELECTRICITY NEEDS AND ARE ASSOCIATED
WITH:
(1) CAPACITY PROCUREMENT, INCLUDING BACKSTOP RELIABILITY
PROCUREMENT; AND
(2) COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE INTERCONNECTION PROCESS,
INCLUDING TRANSMISSION COSTS.
(F) Before signing a contract for service under a specific rate schedule submitted
under subsection (c) of this section, a large load customer under the schedule is required to:
(1) submit a request for a load study to determine the necessary contract
capacity for the large load customer and pay any applicable fees associated with the study;
(2) designate a specific site where the large load customer’s project will be
constructed and served by the electric company;
(3) own or have the exclusive right to use the land designated in item (2) of
this subsection for the project; and
(4) meet any other requirements specified under the rate schedule.
[(f)] (G) (1) On or before June 1, 2026, the Commission shall adopt
regulations to carry out this section.
(2) The regulations shall:
(i) establish minimum notice requirements and deadlines related to
load study requests and contract terminations and adjustments;
(ii) if considered necessary by the Commission, specify common forms
of acceptable collateral to satisfy the requirements of this section; and
(iii) establish deadlines related to completion of load studies and
payment of fees.
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(H) (1) BY ORDER OR REGULATION, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) PROHIBIT BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE
FACILITIES FROM BEING STUDIED BY AN ELECTRIC COMPANY AS AN ADDITIONAL
LOAD UNDER A LOAD STUDY CONDUCTED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(II) ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS AND LIMITATIONS FOR
CHARGING AND DISCHARGING BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES
DURING PEAK DEMAND; AND
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ESTABLISH A VOLUNTARY LARGE–LOAD INTERRUPTIBLE INTERCONNECTION
PROCESS FOR AN ELECTRIC COMPANY TO PROVIDE VOLUNTARY LARGE–LOAD
INTERRUPTIBLE INTERCONNECTION SERVICE.
(2) (I) THE VOLUNTARY LARGE–LOAD INTERRUPTIBLE
INTERCONNECTION PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
1. A LOAD STUDY THAT REFLECTS THE TERMS OF THE
VOLUNTARY INTERRUPTIBLE INTERCONNECTION SERVICE; AND
2. METHODS TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THE
VOLUNTARY LARGE–LOAD INTERRUPTIBLE INTERCONNECTION SERVICE.
(II) THE COMPLIANCE METHODS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I)2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY INCLUDE THE IMPOSITION OF CIVIL
PENALTIES FOR FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH THE VOLUNTARY LARGE–LOAD
INTERRUPTIBLE INTERCONNECTION SERVICE.
4–309.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible limited–income customer” means a residential customer of a
utility company with annual income that:
(i) 1. is at or below 175% of the federal poverty level; or
2. for a customer at least 67 years of age, is at or below 200%
of the federal poverty level; or
(ii) meets a broader designation approved by the Commission.
– 37 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) “Limited–income mechanism” or “mechanism” means a process
approved by the Commission under this section to benefit an eligible limited–income
customer of a utility company.
(4) “Payment plan” means an agreement between an eligible limited–income
customer and a utility company to pay an arrearage balance over a specific period of time to
avoid disconnection of a utility service.
(5) (i) “Utility company” means an electric company, a gas and electric
company, or a gas company.
(ii) “Utility company” does not include a small rural electric
cooperative.
(b) The General Assembly finds and declares that the societal benefits of a
well–constructed limited–income mechanism to benefit Maryland’s eligible limited–income
customers are in the public interest.
(c) (1) Subject to the approval of the Commission, a utility company shall adopt
a limited–income mechanism to benefit an eligible limited–income customer.
(2) Notwithstanding § 4–503(b) of this title, the mechanism may take the
form of a program, tariff provision, credit, rate, rider, or other means to assist an eligible
limited–income customer to afford a utility service.
(3) A municipal electric utility may adopt a limited–income mechanism
subject to the approval of the Commission in the same manner as a utility company in
accordance with this section.
(d) (1) A utility company that proposes a limited–income mechanism for
Commission approval under subsection (c) of this section shall include the proposal in:
(i) a separate application for approval of the mechanism; or
(ii) only with the prior approval of the Commission, an application
for a base rate proceeding, including an alternative rate proceeding, or any other proceeding
to alter the utility company’s base rates under the authority of the Commission.
(2) A proposal submitted under this section shall allocate the prudently
incurred costs of the limited–income mechanism across rate classes.
(3) The proposal shall include:
(i) a detailed description of the proposed mechanism;
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(ii) the proposed method for allocating the mechanism’s costs across
customer classes;
(iii) the rationale supporting the utility company’s proposal for a
mechanism to benefit the eligible limited–income customers in the utility company’s service
territory;
(iv) a time frame and process for the Commission to review the
effectiveness of the mechanism after implementation; and
(v) any other information the Commission considers necessary or
useful to evaluate the proposal.
(e) In evaluating a limited–income mechanism, the Commission shall consider:
(1) the degree to which the mechanism promotes affordability of electricity
or natural gas for limited–income customers;
(2) the public interest in allocating the costs of the mechanism between the
utility company’s shareholders and rate payers;
(3) the impact on rates, utility operating costs, customer arrearages,
customer disconnections, uncollectible costs, and successful completion of payment plans;
(4) the ability of a limited–income customer to continue to receive benefits
when relocating within the same service territory;
(5) coordination of benefits under the mechanism with any other public or
private assistance that may be available to the customer;
(6) a minimum level of support or assistance structure to provide equitable
availability of limited–income assistance across the State; and
(7) any other information the Commission considers appropriate.
(f) If an approved limited–income mechanism requires that the Office of Home
Energy Programs must certify an eligible limited–income customer’s qualifications to
participate in a limited–income mechanism, the Office shall certify an eligible
limited–income customer’s qualifications before the customer may participate in the
mechanism.
(g) An eligible limited–income customer who participates in a mechanism under
this section may also be eligible for other assistance programs offered in the State, including
those offered by a utility company or the Office of Home Energy Programs, the Department
of Housing and Community Development, or any other public or private source.
– 39 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
7–109.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE.
(B) A PERSON THAT OWNS OR OPERATES A TRANSMISSION LINE THAT IS
DESIGNED TO CARRY A VOLTAGE IN EXCESS OF 69,000 VOLTS AND IS LOCATED IN
THE STATE SHALL PARTICIPATE AS A MEMBER IN A REGIONAL TRANSMISSION
ORGANIZATION.
7–204.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “CONSTRUCTION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, at least 30 days
before a hearing, a public service company shall provide to each owner of land and each
owner of adjacent land, by certified mail, written notice of intent to run a line or similar
transmission device over, on, or under the land.
(2) ON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A
TRANSMISSION LINE UNDER § 7–207 OR § 7–208 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE, OR DIRECT THE PERSON APPLYING FOR A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY TO PROVIDE, BY CERTIFIED
MAIL, NOTICE OF INTENT TO RUN A LINE OR SIMILAR TRANSMISSION DEVICE OVER,
ON, OR UNDER THE LAND TO:
(I) EACH OWNER OF LAND THAT ABUTS THE PROPERTY WHERE
THE CONSTRUCTION IS PLANNED; AND
(II) FOR CONSTRUCTION OF AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE,
EACH OWNER OF LAND AND EACH OWNER OF ADJACENT LAND.
(3) NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE
INFORMATION REGARDING:
(I) ANY APPLICABLE RIGHT TO FILE AS AN INTERVENOR IN THE
PROCEEDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–106 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(II) THE PROCESS FOR FILING AS AN INTERVENOR IN THE
PROCEEDING, INCLUDING THE METHOD FOR FILING AND THE LOCATION WHERE THE
FILING IS REQUIRED TO BE SUBMITTED; AND
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(III) CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE COMMISSION AND THE
WEBSITE WHERE THE RECIPIENT MAY OBTAIN ADDITIONAL INFORMATION
REGARDING INTERVENTION RIGHTS AND PROCEDURES.
[(2)] (C) The public service company shall determine the property owners
from the current tax assessment records of the political subdivision in which the property is
located.
[(b) Unless the failure is willful or deliberate, the failure of a public service
company to provide notice does not invalidate a public hearing or require that another
hearing take place.]
(D) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT A PERSON DIRECTED TO
PROVIDE NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION HAS FAILED TO
PROVIDE NOTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION:
(1) IF THE FAILURE IS WILLFUL OR DELIBERATE, THE PUBLIC
HEARING IS INVALIDATED AND ANOTHER HEARING MUST TAKE PLACE; OR
(2) IF THE FAILURE IS NOT WILLFUL OR DELIBERATE, THE
COMMISSION MAY REQUIRE ANOTHER HEARING TO TAKE PLACE.
7–207.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES” MEANS:
(I) GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES;
(II) HIGH PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS; OR
(III) STORAGE USED AS A TRANSMISSION ASSET.
(3) “Brownfields site” means:
(i) a former industrial or commercial site identified by federal or
State laws or regulation as contaminated or polluted;
(ii) a closed landfill regulated by the Department of the Environment;
or
(iii) mined land.
[(3)] (4) (i) “Construction” means:
– 41 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. any physical change at a site, including fabrication,
erection, installation, or demolition; or
2. the entry into a binding agreement or contractual
obligation to purchase equipment exclusively for use in construction in the State or to
undertake a program of actual construction in the State which cannot be canceled or
modified without substantial loss to the owner or operator of the proposed generating station.
(ii) “Construction” does not include a change that is needed for the
temporary use of a site or route for nonutility purposes or for use in securing geological data,
including any boring that is necessary to ascertain foundation conditions.
[(4)] (5) “Generating station” does not include:
(i) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity;
2. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current; and
3. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid during time periods when the electric grid is out of service;
(ii) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that:
1. are used for the production of electricity from a solar
photovoltaic system or an eligible customer–generator that is subject to the provisions of §
7–306 of this title;
2. are located on the same property or adjacent properties;
3. have the capacity to produce, when calculated cumulatively
for all generating units or facilities on the property or adjacent property, more than 2
megawatts but not more than 14 megawatts of alternating current; and
4. for each individual generating unit or facility:
A. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current;
B. is separately metered by the electric company; and
C. does not export electricity for sale on the wholesale market
under an agreement with PJM Interconnection, LLC;
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(iii) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity for the purpose of:
A. onsite emergency backup at a facility when service from the
electric company is interrupted due to electric distribution or transmission system failure or
when there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located; and
B. test and maintenance operations necessary to ensure
functionality of the generating unit or facility in the event of a service interruption from the
electric company due to electric distribution or transmission system failure or when there is
equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
2. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid;
3. is subject to a permit to construct issued by the Department
of the Environment; and
4. is installed at a facility that is part of critical
infrastructure if the facility complies with all applicable regulations regarding noise level
and testing hours; or
(iv) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that
satisfy item (iii) of this paragraph.
[(5)] (6) (I) “GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGY” MEANS
HARDWARE OR SOFTWARE THAT INCREASES THE CAPACITY, EFFICIENCY, OR
RELIABILITY OF EXISTING TRANSMISSION SYSTEMS.
(II) “GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGY” INCLUDES:
1. A SYSTEM THAT USES REAL–TIME OR FORECASTED
WEATHER AND OPERATING CONDITIONS TO DETERMINE THE TRANSFER CAPACITY
OF TRANSMISSION SYSTEMS;
2. TECHNOLOGY THAT MODULATES CIRCUIT IMPEDANCE
OR OTHER ELECTRICAL PROPERTIES TO REROUTE POWER FLOWS AND RELIEVE
CONGESTION; AND
3. SOFTWARE THAT IDENTIFIES SWITCHING
CONFIGURATIONS TO REROUTE ELECTRICITY AND ALLEVIATE TRANSMISSION
CONSTRAINTS.
– 43 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(7) “HIGH PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS” MEANS CONDUCTORS,
INCLUDING ADVANCED STEEL CORE CONDUCTORS, CARBON FIBER AND COMPOSITE
CORE CONDUCTORS, AND SUPERCONDUCTORS, THAT HAVE A DIRECT CURRENT
ELECTRICAL RESISTANCE THAT IS AT LEAST 20% LESS THAN TRADITIONAL ACSR
CONDUCTORS OF A SIMILAR DIAMETER WHEN USED ON THE ELECTRIC
TRANSMISSION SYSTEM AT THE STANDARD OPERATING TEMPERATURE OF 20
DEGREES CELSIUS.
(8) (i) “Mined land” means the surface or subsurface of an area in which
surface mining operations will be, are being, or have been conducted.
(ii) “Mined land” includes:
1. private ways and roads used for mining appurtenant to
any surface mining area;
2. land excavations;
3. workings; and
4. overburden.
[(6)] (9) “Qualified generator lead line” means [an overhead] A
transmission line [that is] AND ANY ASSOCIATED ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGY designed to carry, OR SUPPORT THE CARRYING OF, a voltage in excess of
69,000 volts and would allow an out–of–state Tier 1 or Tier 2 renewable source to
interconnect with a portion of the electric system in Maryland that is owned by an electric
company.
(10) “STORAGE USED AS A TRANSMISSION ASSET” MEANS AN ENERGY
STORAGE FACILITY THAT:
(I) IS PLANNED, OPERATED, AND RECOVERS COSTS AS A
TRANSMISSION FACILITY THAT PROVIDES ONE OR MORE TRANSMISSION SERVICES,
INCLUDING CONGESTION RELIEF, VOLTAGE SUPPORT, POWER FLOW CONTROL, OR
STABILITY UNDER ANY PJM TARIFFS AND APPLICABLE FERC ORDERS;
(II) EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED FOR TRANSMISSION ASSETS, IS
NOT DISPATCHED FOR WHOLESALE ENERGY STORAGE; AND
(III) IS ELIGIBLE FOR COST RECOVERY IN TRANSMISSION RATES.
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(11) “TRADITIONAL ACSR CONDUCTORS” MEANS ELECTRICAL CABLES
USED IN TRANSMISSION SYSTEMS THAT CONSIST OF A CENTRAL CORE OF STEEL
WIRES SURROUNDED BY STRANDS OF ALUMINUM.
(b) (3) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, unless a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for the construction is first obtained from the
Commission, a person may not begin construction of [an overhead] A transmission line that
is designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts or exercise a right of condemnation
with the construction.
(ii) For construction related to an existing [overhead] transmission
line THAT IS DESIGNED TO CARRY A VOLTAGE IN EXCESS OF 69,000 VOLTS, the
Commission may waive the requirement in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for good
cause.
(III) IN DETERMINING WHETHER GOOD CAUSE EXISTS UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER:
1. WHETHER THE PROPOSED CONSTRUCTION:
A. DOES NOT REQUIRE THE ACQUISITION OF NEW REAL
PROPERTY OR ADDITIONAL RIGHTS–OF–WAY THROUGH EMINENT DOMAIN;
B. DOES NOT REQUIRE LARGER OR HIGHER STRUCTURES
TO ACCOMMODATE INCREASED VOLTAGE OR LARGER CONDUCTORS;
C. IS LOCATED SUBSTANTIALLY WITHIN AN EXISTING
TRANSMISSION RIGHT–OF–WAY OR EXISTING TRANSMISSION CORRIDOR OR
CONDUIT SYSTEM; AND
D. HAS A PURPOSE INDEPENDENT OF, AND IS NOT A PART
OF, ANOTHER PROJECT THAT WOULD OTHERWISE REQUIRE THE ISSUANCE OF A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY;
2. WHETHER THE APPLICANT GAVE DUE
CONSIDERATION TO ALTERNATIVES TO THE PROPOSED CONSTRUCTION, INCLUDING
THE USE OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES; AND
3. THE EXTENT TO WHICH:
A. THE CONSTRUCTION SUBSTANTIALLY CONSISTS OF
NEW FACILITIES;
– 45 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. THE COST OF THE FACILITIES BEING CONSTRUCTED
WILL BE ALLOCATED TO RATEPAYERS;
C. THE FACILITIES BEING CONSTRUCTED WILL IMPACT
POWER FLOW AND RELIABILITY; AND
D. OTHER FACTORS, AS DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION, SUPPORT GRANTING OR DENYING A WAIVER FOR GOOD CAUSE.
(IV) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE A WRITTEN DECISION
GRANTING OR DENYING A WAIVER UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE APPLICANT HAS SUBMITTED A WAIVER REQUEST.
2. UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED TO BY THE APPLICANT,
THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND THE PERIOD FOR ISSUING A WRITTEN DECISION
GRANTING OR DENYING A WAIVER UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
FOR A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED 60 DAYS IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES:
A. THE APPLICANT HAS FAILED TO PROVIDE SUFFICIENT
INFORMATION FOR THE COMMISSION TO MAKE A DETERMINATION; OR
B. FURTHER CONSIDERATION IS NECESSARY DUE TO
MATERIAL IMPACTS TO THE PUBLIC OR RATEPAYERS UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH
(III)3 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
3. WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER ISSUING A WRITTEN DECISION
DENYING A WAIVER UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OR 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE
COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE A WRITTEN DECISION THAT STATES THE GROUNDS FOR
THE DENIAL.
(V) AN APPLICANT FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A TRANSMISSION LINE
SHALL INCLUDE IN ITS APPLICATION:
1. EVIDENCE THAT THE APPLICANT CONSIDERED, AS
PART OF THE APPLICANT’S INTERNAL PLANNING PROCESS, ANY LOCAL, STATE, OR
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT TRANSMISSION PLANNING PROCESSES AND ANY
TRANSMISSION PLANNING PROCESSES REQUIRED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION,
INCLUDING:
A. AN ANALYSIS OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGIES AND WHETHER THE USE OF THE TECHNOLOGIES WILL ENHANCE THE
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
VALUE OF THE NEW TRANSMISSION LINE AND THEREFORE LEAD TO INCREASED
RATEPAYER VALUE THROUGH EFFICIENCY AND AVOIDED COSTS;
B. ALTERNATIVE ROUTINGS;
C. TECHNOLOGIES OR MODIFICATIONS TO ONE OR MORE
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS IN THE STATE THAT ARE OWNED BY THE
APPLICANT OR ITS AFFILIATES THAT COULD AVOID THE NEED FOR THE
TRANSMISSION LINE;
D. THE COST TO RATEPAYERS;
E. RESOURCE ADEQUACY; AND
F. ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION
CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE; AND
2. AN ANALYSIS OF THE TRANSMISSION LINE ROUTE
SELECTION, INCLUDING:
A. RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH THE COSTS ESTIMATES;
B. COST CONTAINMENT EFFORTS;
C. CONSTRUCTION SCHEDULE;
D. ACQUISITION OF LAND AND RIGHTS–OF–WAY; AND
E. THE APPLICANT’S PLAN TO WORK WITH COMMUNITIES
AND STAKEHOLDERS ON PROPOSED ROUTES.
[(iii)] (VI) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and
subject to subparagraph [(iv)] (VII) of this paragraph, the Commission may issue a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for the construction of [an overhead] A
transmission line only if the applicant for the certificate of public convenience and necessity:
1. is an electric company; or
2. is or, on the start of commercial operation of the [overhead]
transmission line, will be subject to regulation as a public utility by an officer or an agency
of the United States.
[(iv)] (VII) The Commission may not issue a certificate of public
convenience and necessity for the construction of [an overhead] A transmission line in the
– 47 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
electric distribution service territory of an electric company to an applicant other than an
electric company if:
1. the [overhead] transmission line is to be located solely
within the electric distribution service territory of that electric company; and
2. the cost of the [overhead] transmission line is to be paid
solely by that electric company and its ratepayers.
[(v)] (VIII) 1. This subparagraph applies to the construction of [an
overhead] A transmission line for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity is
required under this section.
2. On issuance of a certificate of public convenience and
necessity for the construction of [an overhead] A transmission line, a person may acquire by
condemnation, in accordance with Title 12 of the Real Property Article, any property or right
necessary for the construction or maintenance of the transmission line.
(4) (i) [Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, for
construction related to an existing overhead transmission line designed to carry a voltage in
excess of 69,000 volts, the Commission shall waive the requirement to obtain a certificate of
public convenience and necessity if the Commission finds that the construction does not:
1. require the person to obtain new real property or additional
rights–of–way through eminent domain; or
2. require larger or higher structures to accommodate:
A. increased voltage; or
B. larger conductors.
(ii) 1. For construction related to an existing overhead
transmission line, including repairs, that is necessary to avoid an imminent safety hazard
or reliability risk, a person may undertake the necessary construction] A PERSON MAY
COMPLETE CONSTRUCTION RELATED TO AN EXISTING TRANSMISSION LINE,
INCLUDING REPAIRS, IF THE CONSTRUCTION IS NECESSARY TO AVOID AN IMMINENT
SAFETY HAZARD OR RELIABILITY RISK.
[2.] (II) Within 30 days after construction is completed
under [subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph] SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, a person shall file a report with the Commission describing the work that was
completed.
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(c) (1) On receipt of an application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under this section, the Commission shall provide notice immediately or require the
applicant to provide notice immediately of the application to:
(i) the Department of Planning;
(ii) the governing body, and if applicable the executive, of each county
or municipal corporation in which any portion of the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line is proposed to be constructed;
(iii) the governing body, and if applicable the executive, of each county
or municipal corporation within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating station,
[overhead] transmission line, or qualified generator lead line;
(iv) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of a
county in which any portion of the generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or
qualified generator lead line is proposed to be constructed;
(v) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
each county within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line;
(vi) for a proposed [overhead] transmission line, each owner of land
and each owner of adjacent land; and
(vii) all other interested persons.
(2) The Commission, when sending the notice required under paragraph (1)
of this subsection, shall forward a copy of the application to:
(i) each appropriate State unit and unit of local government for
review, evaluation, and comment regarding the significance of the proposal to State,
area–wide, and local plans or programs; and
(ii) each member of the General Assembly included under paragraph
(1)(iv) and (v) of this subsection who requests a copy of the application.
(3) On receipt of an application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under this section, the Commission shall provide notice of the application on the
Commission’s social media platforms and website.
(d) (1) (i) The Commission shall provide an opportunity for public comment
and hold a public hearing on the application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity in each county and municipal corporation in which any portion of the construction
of a generating station, [an overhead] A transmission line designed to carry a voltage in
excess of 69,000 volts, or a qualified generator lead line is proposed to be located.
– 49 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) The Commission may hold the public hearing virtually rather
than in person if the Commission provides a comparable opportunity for public comment
and participation in the hearing.
(2) The Commission shall hold the public hearing jointly with the governing
body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the construction of the
generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or qualified generator lead line is proposed
to be located, unless the governing body declines to participate in the hearing.
(3) (i) Once in each of the 4 successive weeks immediately before the
hearing date, the Commission shall provide weekly notice of the public hearing and an
opportunity for public comment:
1. by advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county or municipal corporation affected by the application;
2. on two types of social media; and
3. on the Commission’s website.
(ii) Before a public hearing, the Commission shall coordinate with the
governing body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of the generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or qualified generator
lead line is proposed to be located to identify additional options for providing, in an efficient
and cost–effective manner, notice of the public hearing through other types of media that are
familiar to the residents of the county or municipal corporation.
(4) (i) On the day of a public hearing, an informational sign shall be
posted prominently at or near each public entrance of the building in which the public
hearing will be held.
(ii) The informational sign required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall:
1. state the time, room number, and subject of the public
hearing; and
2. be at least 17 by 22 inches in size.
(iii) If the public hearing is conducted virtually rather than in person,
the Commission shall provide information on the hearing prominently on the Commission’s
website.
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(5) (i) The Commission shall ensure presentation and recommendations
from each interested State unit, and shall allow representatives of each State unit to sit
during hearing of all parties.
(ii) The Commission shall allow each State unit 15 days after the
conclusion of the hearing to modify the State unit’s initial recommendations.
(e) The Commission shall take final action on an application for a certificate of
public convenience and necessity only after due consideration of:
(1) the recommendation of the governing body of each county or municipal
corporation in which any portion of the construction of the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line is proposed to be located;
(2) the effect of the generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or
qualified generator lead line on:
(i) the stability and reliability of the electric system;
(ii) economics;
(iii) esthetics;
(iv) historic sites;
(v) WHEN APPLICABLE, aviation safety as determined by the
Maryland Aviation Administration and the administrator of the Federal Aviation
Administration;
(vi) when applicable, air quality and water pollution; and
(vii) the availability of means for the required timely disposal of
wastes produced by any generating station;
(3) the effect of climate change on the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line based on the best available scientific
information recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change;
(4) for a generating station:
(i) the consistency of the application with the comprehensive plan
and zoning of each county or municipal corporation where any portion of the generating
station is proposed to be located;
(ii) the efforts to resolve any issues presented by a county or municipal
corporation where any portion of the generating station is proposed to be located;
– 51 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) the impact of the generating station on the quantity of annual and
long–term statewide greenhouse gas emissions, measured in the manner specified in §
2–1202 of the Environment Article and based on the best available scientific information
recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change; and
(iv) the consistency of the application with the State’s climate
commitments for reducing statewide greenhouse gas emissions, including those specified in
Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article; and
(5) for a solar energy generating station specified under § 7–218 of this
subtitle, whether the owner of a proposed solar energy generating station complies with the
site requirements under § 7–218(f) of this subtitle.
(f) For the construction of [an overhead] A transmission line, in addition to the
considerations listed in subsection (e) of this section, the Commission shall:
(1) take final action on an application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity only after due consideration of:
(i) the need to meet existing and future demand for electric service;
[and]
(ii) EVIDENCE THAT ALTERNATIVES HAVE BEEN CONSIDERED
BY THE APPLICANT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B)(3)(V) OF THIS SECTION;
AND
(III) for construction related to a new [overhead] transmission line, the
alternative routes that the applicant considered, including the estimated capital and
operating costs of each alternative route and a statement of the reason why the alternative
route was rejected;
(2) require as an ongoing condition of the certificate of public convenience
and necessity that an applicant comply with:
(i) all relevant agreements with PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., or its
successors, related to the ongoing operation and maintenance of the [overhead] transmission
line; and
(ii) all obligations imposed by the North America Electric Reliability
Council and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission related to the ongoing operation
and maintenance of the [overhead] transmission line; and
(3) require the applicant to identify whether the [overhead] transmission
line is proposed to be constructed on:
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(i) an existing brownfields site;
(ii) property that is subject to an existing easement; or
(iii) a site where a tower structure or components of a tower structure
used to support an overhead transmission line exist.
(g) (1) The Commission may not authorize, and a person may not undertake,
the construction of an overhead transmission line that is aligned with and within 1 mile of
either end of a public airport runway, unless:
(i) the Federal Aviation Administration determines that the
construction of an overhead transmission line will not constitute a hazard to air navigation;
and
(ii) the Maryland Aviation Administration concurs in that
determination.
(2) A privately owned airport runway shall qualify as a public airport
runway under this subsection only if the runway has been on file with the Federal Aviation
Administration for at least 2 years as being open to the public without restriction.
(h) (1) A county or municipal corporation has the authority to approve or deny
any local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued
under this section or a distributed generation certificate of public convenience and necessity
issued under § 7–207.4 of this subtitle.
(2) A county or municipal corporation shall approve or deny any local
permits required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under this
section or a distributed generation certificate of public convenience and necessity issued
under § 7–207.4 of this subtitle:
(i) within a reasonable time; and
(ii) to the extent local laws are not preempted by State law, in
accordance with local laws.
(3) A county or municipal corporation may not condition the approval of a
local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under
this section or a distributed generation certificate of public convenience and necessity issued
under § 7–207.4 of this subtitle on receipt of any of the following approvals for any aspect of
a generating station, [an overhead] A transmission line, or a qualified lead line proposed to
be constructed under the certificate:
(i) a conditional use approval;
– 53 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) a special exception approval; or
(iii) a floating zone approval.
7–207.6.
(A) A PERSON THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION FOR APPROVAL OF THE
CONSTRUCTION OF A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
7–207, § 7–207.1, OR § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL:
(1) REQUEST, WITHIN 90 DAYS BEFORE BEGINNING CONSTRUCTION,
THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY TO DETERMINE THE PREVAILING
WAGE RATE FOR EACH CLASSIFICATION OF WORKER REQUIRED TO PERFORM WORK
ON THE PROJECT;
(2) REQUIRE THAT ANY CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR ON THE
PROJECT PAY ITS EMPLOYEES NOT LESS THAN THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE AS
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY UNDER ITEM (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AND TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
(3) INCLUDE IN THE APPLICATION AN ATTESTATION THAT THE
PERSON SHALL COMPLY WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION AND ANY
ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS IMPOSED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRY.
(B) IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE LABOR AND
EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE, THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR SHALL ENFORCE
THE REQUIREMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION FOR
CONTRACTORS AND SUBCONTRACTORS TO PAY EMPLOYEES NOT LESS THAN THE
PREVAILING WAGE RATE DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRY.
7–207.7.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON
OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND EVERY 4 YEARS THEREAFTER, EACH OWNER OR
OPERATOR OF A TRANSMISSION LINE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION A REPORT
THAT:
– 54 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(I) IDENTIFIES AREAS OF SIGNIFICANT TRANSMISSION
CONGESTION COSTS FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 3 YEARS AND ANY
REASONABLY FORESEEABLE TRANSMISSION CONSTRAINTS FOR THE 5 YEARS
IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE DATE OF THE REPORT;
(II) IDENTIFIES THE PROJECTED OR ACTUAL COST TO
RATEPAYERS AS A RESULT OF PAST AND PROJECTED FUTURE TRANSMISSION
CONGESTION;
(III) IDENTIFIES THE FEASIBILITY AND COST OF USING
ALTERNATIVE MEANS OF ADDRESSING TRANSMISSION CONGESTION, INCLUDING
THE USE OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES;
(IV) IDENTIFIES THE ECONOMIC, ENVIRONMENTAL, AND SOCIAL
ISSUES POSED BY THE USE OF EACH ALTERNATIVE MEANS IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM
(III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
(V) IF FEASIBLE, PROPOSES AN ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGY IMPLEMENTATION PLAN TO ADDRESS AREAS OF TRANSMISSION
CONGESTION IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL DISTINGUISH BETWEEN REGIONAL AND LOCAL CONGESTION
DRIVERS AND REFERENCE THE PJM PLANNING INPUTS OR ANY OTHER PLANNING
INPUTS USED TO SUPPORT THE CONGESTION FORECASTS AND PROPOSED
CONGESTION RELIEF SOLUTIONS.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY MODIFY THE REPORTING SCHEDULE
SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A TRANSMISSION LINE MAY USE ANY
AVAILABLE DATA FROM PJM OR OTHER SOURCES IN COMPLETING THE REPORT
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
7–208.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Construction” has the meaning stated in § 7–207 of this subtitle.
(3) “Generating station” does not include:
(i) a generating unit or facility that:
– 55 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. is used for the production of electricity for the purpose of:
A. onsite emergency backup at a facility when service from the
electric company is interrupted due to electric distribution or transmission system failure or
when there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located; and
B. test and maintenance operations necessary to ensure
functionality of the generating unit or facility in the event of an interruption of service from
the electric company due to electric distribution or transmission system failure or when there
is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
2. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid;
3. is subject to a permit to construct issued by the Department
of the Environment; and
4. is installed at a facility that is part of critical
infrastructure if the facility complies with all applicable regulations regarding noise level
and testing hours; or
(ii) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that
satisfy item (i) of this paragraph.
(4) “Qualified offshore wind project” has the meaning stated in § 7–701 of
this title.
(5) “Qualified submerged renewable energy line” means:
(i) a line carrying electricity supply and connecting a qualified
offshore wind project to the transmission system; and
(ii) a line in which the portions of the line crossing any submerged
lands or any part of a beach erosion control district are buried or submerged.
(b) This section applies to any person:
(1) constructing a generating station and its associated [overhead]
transmission lines designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts;
(2) exercising the right of condemnation in connection with the construction;
or
(3) constructing a qualified submerged renewable energy line.
– 56 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(c) (1) To obtain the certificate of public convenience and necessity required
under § 7–207 of this subtitle for construction under this section, a person shall file an
application with the Commission at least 2 years before construction of the facility will
commence.
(2) The Commission may waive the 2–year requirement on a showing of
good cause.
(d) The applicant shall:
(1) include in an application under this section the information that the
Commission requests initially; and
(2) furnish any additional information that the Commission requests
subsequently.
(e) (1) On the receipt of an application under this section, together with any
additional information requested under subsection (d)(2) of this section, the Commission
shall provide notice to:
(i) for a proposed [overhead] transmission line, each owner of land
and each owner of adjacent land;
(ii) all interested persons;
(iii) the Department of Agriculture;
(iv) the Department of Commerce;
(v) the Department of the Environment;
(vi) the Department of Natural Resources;
(vii) the Department of Transportation;
(viii) the Department of Planning; and
(ix) the Maryland Energy Administration.
(2) On receipt of an application under this section, and whenever additional
information is received under subsection (d)(2) of this section, the Commission shall provide
notice immediately or require the applicant to provide notice immediately to:
(i) the governing body of each county or municipal corporation in
which any portion of the generating station or the associated [overhead] transmission lines
is proposed to be constructed;
– 57 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) the governing body of each county or municipal corporation
within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating station or the associated [overhead]
transmission lines;
(iii) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of a
county in which any portion of the generating station or the associated [overhead]
transmission lines is proposed to be constructed; and
(iv) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
each county within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating station or the associated
[overhead] transmission lines.
(3) The Commission shall hold a public hearing on the application as
required by § 7–207 of this subtitle after:
(i) the receipt of any additional information requested under
subsection (d)(2) of this section that the Commission considers necessary; and
(ii) any publication of notice the Commission considers to be proper.
(4) (i) At the public hearing, the Commission shall ensure presentation
of the information and recommendations of the State units specified in paragraph (1) of this
subsection and shall allow the official representative of each unit to sit during hearing of all
parties.
(ii) Based on the evidence relating to the unit’s areas of concern, the
Commission shall allow each unit 15 days after the conclusion of the hearing to modify or
affirm the unit’s initial recommendations.
(f) Within 90 days after the conclusion of the hearing on an application under this
section, the Commission shall:
(1) (i) grant a certificate of public convenience and necessity
unconditionally;
(ii) grant the certificate, subject to conditions the Commission
determines to be appropriate; or
(iii) deny the certificate; and
(2) notify all interested parties of its decision.
(g) (1) The Commission shall include in each certificate it issues under
subsection (f) of this section:
– 58 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(i) the requirements of the federal and State environmental laws and
standards that are identified by the Department of the Environment; and
(ii) the methods and conditions that the Commission determines are
appropriate to comply with those environmental laws and standards.
(2) The Commission may not adopt any method or condition under
paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection that the Department of the Environment determines is
inconsistent with federal and State environmental laws and standards.
(h) (1) A decision of the Commission regarding the issuance of a certificate
requires the vote of a majority of the members of the Commission.
(2) If a majority of the members of the Commission fails to reach agreement
on the conditions to be attached to a conditional certificate, the certificate shall be denied.
(i) The grant of a certificate by the Commission to any person under subsection (f)
of this section constitutes:
(1) authority for the person to dredge and construct bulkheads in the waters
or private wetlands of the State and to appropriate or use the waters; and
(2) registration and a permit to construct, as required under Title 2, Subtitle
4 of the Environment Article.
(j) (1) A county or municipal corporation has the authority to approve or deny
any local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued
under this section.
(2) A county or municipal corporation shall approve or deny any local
permits required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under this
section:
(i) within a reasonable time; and
(ii) to the extent local laws are not preempted by State law, in
accordance with local laws.
(3) A county or municipal corporation may not condition the approval of a
local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under
this section on receipt of any of the following approvals for any aspect of a generating station,
an [overhead] transmission line, or a qualified lead line proposed to be constructed under
the certificate:
(i) a conditional use approval;
– 59 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) a special exception approval; or
(iii) a floating zone approval.
7–216.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Program” means the Maryland Energy Storage Program.
(c) (1) The Commission shall establish the Maryland Energy Storage Program.
(2) The Program shall be implemented no later than July 1, 2025.
(3) The Program shall include competitive procurement mechanisms to
reach a minimum of 3,000 megawatts of energy storage, or the maximum cost–effective
amount of energy storage that can be deployed, by the end of delivery year 2033.
(4) The Program may include:
(i) a system of energy storage credits and market–based incentives
designed to:
1. develop a robust energy storage market in the State; and
2. deploy energy storage devices in a cost–effective manner;
(ii) a requirement that investor–owned electric companies:
1. install or contract for energy storage devices; or
2. contract for credits from an energy storage project under §
7–216 of this subtitle;
(iii) a requirement that Program participants make reasonable efforts
to apply for all applicable State and federal grants, rebates, tax credits, loan guarantees,
and other similar benefits as the benefits become available; or
(iv) any other mechanism or policy that the Commission determines
is appropriate to achieve the goal of a robust, cost–effective energy storage system in the
State.
(D) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE STATUS OF THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING:
– 60 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(1) THE CAPACITY OF OPERATIONAL ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES IN
THE STATE THAT IS BEING COUNTED TOWARD THE CAPACITY GOAL ESTABLISHED
UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION, DISAGGREGATED BY:
(I) ELECTRIC COMPANY SERVICE TERRITORY;
(II) ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE CAPACITY;
(III) FRONT–OF–METER TRANSMISSION–LEVEL STORAGE;
(IV) FRONT–OF–METER DISTRIBUTION–LEVEL STORAGE;
(V) BEHIND–THE–METER STORAGE; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER RELEVANT CATEGORY, AS DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION;
(2) WHETHER THE CAPACITY GOAL ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(3) OF THIS SECTION SHOULD BE ALTERED;
(3) BARRIERS TO ACHIEVING THE GOALS IDENTIFIED UNDER THIS
SECTION; AND
(4) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS
PERTINENT.
7–221.
The General Assembly finds and declares that energy efficiency is:
(1) among the least expensive ways to meet the energy demands of the State;
(2) a means of affordable, reliable, and clean energy for consumers of
Maryland; and
(3) one method to achieve Maryland’s climate commitments for reducing
statewide greenhouse gas emissions, including those required under Title 2, Subtitle 12 of
the Environment Article.
7–222.
(a) Subject to review and approval by the Commission, each electric company,
[each gas company other than a gas company subject to § 4–207(a) of this article,] the
Department, and, if required in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, each midsize
electric cooperative shall develop and implement programs and services in accordance with
– 61 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
§§ 7–223, 7–224, and 7–225 of this subtitle to encourage and promote the efficient use and
conservation of energy, demand response, and beneficial electrification by consumers,
electric companies, [gas companies,] and the Department in support of the greenhouse gas
emissions reduction goals and targets required under Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment
Article.
(b) As directed by the Commission, [each gas company subject to § 4–207(a) of this
article,] each municipal electric [or gas] utility, each small rural electric cooperative, and,
if required in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, each midsize electric cooperative
shall include energy efficiency and conservation, demand response, and beneficial
electrification programs or services as part of their service to their customers.
(c) (1) In accordance with this subsection, each midsize electric cooperative
shall be subject to either subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section.
(2) Each midsize electric cooperative shall offer programs and services to
customers in accordance with:
(i) subsection (b) of this section through December 31, 2026; and
(ii) on or after January 1, 2027, and as the Commission directs, either
subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section.
(3) Not later than October 1, 2025, the Commission shall determine if it is
in the public interest for a midsize electric cooperative to offer programs and services to
customers in accordance with subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section starting January
1, 2027, and for all subsequent years.
(4) Each midsize electric cooperative shall provide the following
information to the Commission to assist in making a determination under paragraph (3) of
this subsection:
(i) anticipated costs and bill impacts;
(ii) a description of the anticipated program offerings;
(iii) the anticipated cost–effectiveness of the residential, commercial,
and industrial sector subportfolios based on the cost–effectiveness tests in § 7–225(d)(3)(i) of
this subtitle;
(iv) the anticipated electricity savings and greenhouse gas emissions
reductions; and
(v) any other information the Commission requires.
– 62 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(5) The information provided to the Commission under paragraph (4) of this
subsection shall be based on a plan to offer programs and services to customers that complies
with the requirements of an electric company subject to subsection (a) of this section for the
3–year program cycle starting January 1, 2027.
(6) When making a public interest determination under paragraph (3) of
this subsection the Commission, at a minimum, shall consider the requirements under §
7–225(d)(3) of this subtitle that are considered when approving a plan of an electric company
that is subject to subsection (a) of this section.
(7) Starting October 1, 2025, if the Commission determines that it is in the
public interest for a midsize electric cooperative to be subject to subsection (a) of this section,
the midsize electric cooperative shall comply with all requirements of an electric company
subject to subsection (a) of this section for program cycles starting on and after January 1,
2027.
(8) On or before March 1 each year, starting in 2026, each midsize electric
cooperative directed by the Commission to include programs or services under subsection (b)
of this section shall submit to the Commission a report quantifying the gains in energy
efficiency and reductions in greenhouse gas emissions achieved during the previous year.
(d) The Commission shall encourage and promote the efficient use and
conservation of energy in support of the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and
targets required under Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the
Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle, and specified in § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle
by:
(1) requiring each electric company [and gas company] to establish any
program or service that the Commission determines to be appropriate and cost–effective;
(2) adopting rate–making policies that provide, through a surcharge line
item on customer bills:
(i) full cost recovery of reasonably incurred costs for programs and
services established under item (1) of this subsection, including full recovery on a current
basis on or before January 1, 2028;
(ii) on or before December 31, 2032, the elimination of any unpaid
costs and unamortized costs that:
1. A. existed on December 31, 2024; or
B. were incurred before January 1, 2028; and
2. were accrued for the purpose of achieving statutory targets
for annual incremental gross energy savings;
– 63 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) compensation for any unpaid costs and unamortized costs under
item (ii) of this item at not more than each electric company’s and each gas company’s
average cost of outstanding debt; and
(iv) reasonable financial performance incentives and penalties for
investor–owned electric companies [and gas companies,] as appropriate; and
(3) ensuring that adoption of electric customer choice under Subtitle 5 of
this title [and gas customer choice under Subtitle 6 of this title] does not adversely impact
these goals and targets.
(e) The Commission shall, by regulation or order, require each electric company
[and each gas company subject to subsection (a) of this section] that has submitted to the
Commission, on or before July 1, 2024, a plan for achieving electricity [or gas] savings and
demand reduction targets to disclose the following information in a form and format readily
understandable to the average customer:
(1) that the surcharge imposed in accordance with subsection (d) of this
section includes the cost of paying down the unpaid costs and unamortized costs that were
accrued over time by programs and services required by the Commission dating back to
2008; and
(2) the period of time that the surcharge will include excess charges to pay
down the unpaid costs and unamortized costs.
(F) A GAS COMPANY THAT PROVIDED A PROGRAM OR SERVICE UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND RECOVERED COSTS UNDER SUBSECTION
(D)(2) OF THIS SECTION ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, SHALL:
(1) TERMINATE THE PROGRAM ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026;
AND
(2) CONTINUE TO RECOVER ANY PROGRAM AND SERVICE COSTS
REASONABLY INCURRED THROUGH DECEMBER 31, 2026, INCLUDING UNPAID AND
UNAMORTIZED COSTS UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION, THROUGH
THE RATE–MAKING POLICIES UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2) OF THIS SECTION UNTIL
ALL REASONABLY INCURRED PROGRAM AND SERVICE COSTS HAVE BEEN
RECOVERED.
7–223.
(a) On or before January 1, 2025, and on or before January 1 every 3 years,
starting in 2027, the Commission shall, by regulation or order, require each electric company
– 64 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
[and each gas company] subject to § 7–222(a) of this subtitle to develop and implement a
plan that:
(1) covers appropriate ratepayer classes;
(2) starting in 2027, covers a 3–year program cycle; and
(3) achieves the greenhouse gas emissions reduction target established for
the electric company [or gas company] under subsection (b) of this section through
cost–effective energy efficiency and conservation programs and services, demand response
programs and services, and beneficial electrification programs and services.
(b) (1) For 2025 and 2026, and for each 3–year program cycle starting in 2027,
the Commission shall establish a greenhouse gas emissions reduction target for each electric
company [and each gas company] subject to § 7–222(a) of this subtitle as provided in this
subsection.
(2) When establishing greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets under
this subsection, the Commission shall measure the greenhouse gas emissions from electricity
and gas, and the intensities of those emissions, using current data and projections from the
Department of the Environment.
(3) The greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets established under this
subsection shall be measured:
(i) in metric tons; and
(ii) relative to the greenhouse gas emissions associated with the
electric company’s [or gas company’s] weather–normalized gross retail sales and losses in a
baseline year, as determined by the Commission.
(4) By the dates specified in § 7–225(a) of this subtitle, the Commission shall
establish greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets for each electric company plan that
will achieve at least the greenhouse gas emissions reduction equivalent, measured on a
lifecycle basis using the emission intensities under paragraph (2) of this subsection, of the
following annual electricity savings percentages, calculated as a percentage of the electric
company’s 2016 weather–normalized gross retail sales and electricity losses:
(i) 2.0% in 2024;
(ii) 2.25% each year in 2025 and 2026; [and]
(iii) [2.5% each year in 2027 and after] 1.75% EACH YEAR IN 2027
THROUGH 2029;
(IV) 2.0% EACH YEAR IN 2030 THROUGH 2032;
– 65 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) 2.25% EACH YEAR IN 2033 THROUGH 2035; AND
(VI) 2.5% EACH YEAR IN 2036 AND AFTER.
(5) [On or before January 1, 2025, and on or before January 1 every 3 years,
starting in 2027, the Commission shall establish greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets
for each gas company plan that will achieve at least the greenhouse gas emissions reduction
equivalent, measured on a lifecycle basis using the emission intensities under paragraph (2)
of this subsection, of the gas savings achieved by the gas company for the 2021–2023 program
cycle.
(6)] The Commission shall take into consideration the most recent final plan
adopted under § 2–1205 of the Environment Article when establishing the greenhouse gas
emissions reduction targets under this subsection.
[(7)] (6) For 2025 and 2026:
(i) the Commission shall, after making appropriate findings,
determine whether existing electric company [and gas company] plans must be modified to
comply with § 7–225(d) of this subtitle; and
(ii) electric companies [and gas companies]:
1. shall provide information as required by the Commission
to assist in making the determination under item (i) of this paragraph; and
2. are only required to file new plans in accordance with this
section if directed by the Commission.
(c) The Commission may give priority to long–lived greenhouse gas emissions
reduction measures in the plans by establishing a minimum weighted average measure life
for the plan of each electric company [and gas company].
(d) Contributions to greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and targets in a
plan of an electric company [or a gas company]:
(1) may, notwithstanding § 7–222(d)(2) of this subtitle, include recovery of
the reasonable and prudent costs from programs that are not behind–the–meter programs
in a base rate proceeding, subject to Commission approval; and
(2) may not include the increased adoption of electric vehicles.
(e) (1) [Beginning January 1, 2025,] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2025:
– 66 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(I) at least 80% of the greenhouse gas emissions reductions counted
toward each electric company’s [and each gas company’s] greenhouse gas emissions
reduction targets established under this section shall come from behind–the–meter
programs, which may include deployment of energy storage facilities; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, FOR
2027 THROUGH 2029, NOT MORE THAN 20% OF THE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
REDUCTIONS COUNTED TOWARD EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY’S GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS REDUCTION TARGETS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
INCLUDE:
1. COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS
THAT ARE INTERCONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM;
AND
2. SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING FACILITIES THAT ARE
INTERCONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO
AUTHORIZE AN ELECTRIC COMPANY TO BUILD, OWN, OR OPERATE ELECTRIC
GENERATING FACILITIES OR ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES TO MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(3) GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS FROM SOURCES
SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE USED TO
MEET THE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION TARGETS UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
7–225.
(a) As soon as possible in 2024, and at least 8 months before the filing deadline for
plans after 2024, the Commission shall issue an order that determines the greenhouse gas
emissions reduction targets required under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle and the greenhouse
gas emissions reductions required under § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(b) (1) (i) If directed by the Commission in 2024, and on or before July 1
every 3 years, starting in 2026, each electric company [and each gas company] subject to §
7–222(a) of this subtitle that submitted a plan for achieving electricity savings and demand
reduction targets to the Commission before July 1, 2024, and the Department, shall consult
with the technical staff of the Commission, the Office of People’s Counsel, the Maryland
Energy Administration, and the Department of the Environment regarding the design and
adequacy of its plans for achieving the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets
established by the Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle and specified in §
7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
– 67 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) On or before October 1, 2024, and on or before July 1 every 3 years,
starting in 2026, each electric company [and each gas company] subject to § 7–222(a) of this
subtitle that did not submit a plan for achieving electricity savings and demand reduction
targets to the Commission before July 1, 2024, shall comply with the consulting requirements
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(2) Each electric company [and each gas company] subject to § 7–222(a) of
this subtitle shall provide the technical staff of the Commission, the Office of People’s
Counsel, the Maryland Energy Administration, and the Department of the Environment
with any additional information regarding its plan, as requested.
(c) (1) (i) If directed by the Commission in 2024, and on or before September
1 every 3 years, starting in 2026, each electric company [and each gas company] subject to
§ 7–222(a) of this subtitle that submitted a plan for achieving electricity savings and demand
reduction targets to the Commission before July 1, 2024, and the Department, shall submit
its plan to the Commission.
(ii) On or before December 1, 2024, and on or before September 1 every
3 years, starting in 2026, each electric company [and each gas company] that did not submit
a plan for achieving electricity savings and demand reduction targets to the Commission
before July 1, 2024, shall submit its plan to the Commission.
(2) Each plan shall detail a proposal for achieving greenhouse gas
emissions reduction targets for 3 subsequent calendar years.
(3) (i) Each plan shall:
1. include:
A. a description of the proposed programs and services;
B. anticipated costs;
C. projected benefits, including greenhouse gas emissions
reductions[,] AND electricity savings[, and gas savings]; and
D. any other information requested by the Commission; and
2. address residential, commercial, and industrial sectors as
appropriate, including low–income communities.
(ii) A plan of the Department shall include:
– 68 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
1. a definition of “low–income individual” to be used in the
procurement or provision of energy efficiency, conservation, and greenhouse gas emissions
reduction programs and services;
2. a description of the steps proposed to ensure insulation
materials meet the requirements under § 7–224 of this subtitle; and
3. a proposed average lifetime measure threshold that:
A. encourages the delivery of insulation and weatherization
measures; and
B. is developed through a stakeholder engagement process.
(iii) A plan of an electric company shall include the provision or
procurement of programs and services for residential beneficial electrification.
(d) (1) The Commission shall review the plan of each electric company[, each
gas company,] and the Department to determine whether the plan is adequate and
cost–effective in achieving the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets established by the
Commission under §§ 7–223(b) and 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(2) The Commission shall consider any written findings provided by the
Maryland Energy Administration, the Department of the Environment, and the Office of
People’s Counsel regarding the design and adequacy of the plan.
(3) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, in approving, modifying, or
denying the plan of an electric company [or a gas company], the Commission shall consider:
(i) the cost–effectiveness of the residential, commercial, and
industrial sector subportfolios by using:
1. the primary State jurisdiction–specific test, as developed,
updated, or approved by the Commission, to determine the cost–effectiveness of a program
or service prospectively, including consideration of:
A. participant nonenergy benefits;
B. utility nonenergy benefits; and
C. societal nonenergy benefits; and
2. a total resource cost test to compare the electricity savings
and demand reduction targets of the program or service with the results of similar programs
or services implemented in other jurisdictions, including:
– 69 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A. participant nonenergy benefits; and
B. utility nonenergy benefits;
(ii) the impact on rates of each ratepayer class;
(iii) the impact on jobs;
(iv) the impact on the environment; and
(v) the impact on the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets
specified in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the Commission
under §§ 7–223(b) and 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(4) Nonenergy benefits considered under paragraph (3) of this subsection
shall be quantifiable and directly related to a program or service.
(5) (i) In approving, modifying, or denying the plan of the Department,
the Commission shall consider:
1. subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
cost–effectiveness of the plan by using the primary State jurisdiction–specific test, as
developed, updated, or approved by the Commission;
2. the impact on rates of each ratepayer class;
3. the impact on jobs;
4. the impact on the environment; and
5. the impact on the greenhouse gas emissions targets
specified in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the Commission
under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle, and specified in § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(ii) The programs and services offered by the Department are not
required to be cost–effective.
(e) The Department of the Environment shall prepare and submit to the
Commission an analysis regarding the adequacy of the plan in supporting the State’s
greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals specified in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment
Article, established by the Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle, and required under
§ 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
7–226.
– 70 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(a) (1) Each electric company[, each gas company,] and the Department shall
provide to the Commission every 6 months an update on plan implementation and progress
made toward achieving the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets established by the
Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle and required under § 7–224(a)(2) of this
subtitle.
(2) The Commission shall monitor and analyze the impact of each program
and service to ensure that the outcome of each program and service provides the best possible
results.
(3) In monitoring and analyzing the impact of a program or service under
paragraph (2) of this subsection, if the Commission finds that the outcome of the program
or service may not be providing the best possible results, the Commission shall direct the
electric company[, the gas company,] or the Department to include in its next update under
paragraph (1) of this subsection specific measures to address the findings.
(b) (1) At least once each year, each electric company [and each gas company]
shall notify affected customers of the energy efficiency and conservation and greenhouse gas
reduction charges imposed and benefits conferred.
(2) The notice shall be provided by publication on the company’s website
and inclusion with billing information such as a bill insert or bill message.
(c) On or before May 1 each year, the Commission shall report, in accordance with
§ 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly on:
(1) the status of programs and services approved under this subtitle,
including an evaluation of the impact of the programs and services that are directed to
low–income communities and other particular classes of ratepayers;
(2) a recommendation for the appropriate funding level to adequately fund
these programs and services;
(3) the per capita electricity consumption and the winter and summer peak
demand for the previous calendar year; and
(4) beginning in 2026, progress made toward reducing greenhouse gas
emissions in accordance with §§ 7–223 and 7–224 of this subtitle.
7–227.
(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Commission may not require or allow an
electric company [or a gas company] to require a customer to authorize the electric company
[or gas company] to control the amount of the customer’s electricity usage [or gas usage].
– 71 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) A customer may provide consent to participate in a program of an electric
company [or a gas company] that provides direct load control or other utility manipulation
of a customer’s electricity [or gas] usage.
7–228.
(a) Each electric company [and each gas company] shall promote the availability
of federal and State rebates, tax credits, and incentives that can be used to support energy
efficiency investments, energy efficient and non–fossil–fuel–powered appliances and cooking
equipment, breaker box upgrades, and portable heating and cooling equipment.
(b) The Commission shall adopt regulations to carry out this section.
7–229.
NOTHING IN THIS PART PROHIBITS THE COMMISSION FROM APPROVING A
DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAM PROPOSED BY AN ELECTRIC COMPANY IF THE
DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAM IS DETERMINED TO BE COST–EFFECTIVE AND
IMPROVE SYSTEM RELIABILITY.
7–230. RESERVED.
7–231. RESERVED.
PART III. LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS.
7–232.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
(B) “DISTRICT ENERGY SYSTEM” MEANS AN UNDERGROUND
INFRASTRUCTURE ASSET WHOSE PRIMARY PURPOSE IS TO PROVIDE THERMAL
ENERGY TO MULTIPLE BUILDINGS FROM A CENTRAL ENERGY PLANT OR PLANTS.
(C) “DUPLICATIVE INTERCONNECTION REQUEST” MEANS AN
INTERCONNECTION REQUEST THAT:
(1) IS SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO ANOTHER INTERCONNECTION
REQUEST SUBMITTED BY THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER OR THE CUSTOMER’S PARENT
COMPANY OR AFFILIATE;
(2) IS SUBMITTED TO AN ELECTRIC COMPANY IN THE STATE OR IN
ANOTHER STATE IN THE PJM REGION; AND
– 72 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(3) IF PROGRESSED FURTHER THROUGH THE INTERCONNECTION
PROCESS, WOULD CAUSE THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER TO MATERIALLY CHANGE,
DELAY, OR WITHDRAW THE APPLICABLE INTERCONNECTION REQUEST.
(D) “INCREMENTAL RESOURCES” INCLUDES ONE OR A COMBINATION OF
THE FOLLOWING FACILITIES AND RESOURCES, LOCATED WITHIN THE APPLICABLE
LOCATIONAL DELIVERABILITY AREA:
(1) BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES;
(2) NEWLY INTERCONNECTED ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES; AND
(3) PURCHASING OR ESTABLISHING NONEMITTING RESOURCES
WITHIN THE LOCATIONAL DELIVERABILITY AREA, INCLUDING:
(I) NEW CLEAN ENERGY GENERATION ASSETS;
(II) NEW VIRTUAL POWER PLANT AGGREGATIONS; AND
(III) A DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAM THAT THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES MEETS THE GOALS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–234 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
INCLUDING PROGRAMS ADMINISTERED BY PJM.
(E) (1) “LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER” MEANS A COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL
CUSTOMER FOR RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE THAT:
(I) HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE AN AGGREGATE MONTHLY
DEMAND OF AT LEAST 25 MEGAWATTS; AND
(II) HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE A LOAD FACTOR OF MORE
THAN 60%.
(2) “LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A COMMERCIAL OR
INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER FOR RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE WHOSE PRIMARY PURPOSE
IS TO OPERATE AS:
(I) A WATER COMPANY OR SEWAGE DISPOSAL COMPANY;
(II) A MANUFACTURING FACILITY;
(III) A HOSPITAL;
(IV) A DISTRICT ENERGY SYSTEM;
– 73 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) AN AGRICULTURAL FACILITY; OR
(VI) AT THE DISCRETION OF THE COMMISSION, ANOTHER
INDUSTRIAL FACILITY.
(F) “MANUFACTURING FACILITY” MEANS A FACILITY WHERE THE PROCESS
OF SUBSTANTIALLY TRANSFORMING, OR A SUBSTANTIAL STEP IN THE PROCESS OF
SUBSTANTIALLY TRANSFORMING, TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY INTO A NEW AND
DIFFERENT ARTICLE OF TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY BY THE USE OF LABOR OR
MACHINERY OCCURS.
(G) “ON–SITE BACKUP GENERATING FACILITY” MEANS A GENERATING
FACILITY THAT IS NOT CONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(H) “VIRTUAL POWER PLANT” MEANS AN AGGREGATION OF DISTRIBUTED
CLEAN ENERGY RESOURCES AND ENERGY STORAGE OWNED BY A CUSTOMER OR A
THIRD PARTY THAT:
(1) PROVIDES ELECTRIC SYSTEM SERVICES; AND
(2) MAY BE USED BY THE CUSTOMER OR THE THIRD PARTY FOR OTHER
APPLICATIONS WHEN NOT PROVIDING ELECTRIC SYSTEM SERVICES.
(I) “VOLUNTARY CLEAN CAPACITY RATING PROGRAM” MEANS THE
PROGRAM DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER § 7–234 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–233.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION, BY ORDER OR
REGULATION, SHALL ESTABLISH A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER REGISTRY TO:
(1) PROVIDE INFORMATION RELEVANT TO PLANNING AT THE
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION, STATE, AND PJM LEVELS; AND
(2) ASSIST IN ENSURING ACCURATE LOAD FORECASTS AT THE
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION, STATE, AND PJM LEVELS.
(B) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP A PROCESS FOR
REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE PROCESS SHALL:
(I) APPLY TO NEW OR EXPANDED INTERCONNECTION OF LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMERS;
– 74 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(II) REQUIRE A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER TO:
1. DISCLOSE ALL INFORMATION ABOUT THE LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER AS SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION;
2. DISCLOSE EACH OF THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S
DUPLICATIVE INTERCONNECTION REQUESTS AND ANY ASSOCIATED INFORMATION,
AS DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION;
3. EXPLAIN HOW THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S ENERGY
AND CAPACITY NEEDS WILL BE SERVED AND DESCRIBE ANY ANTICIPATED
ARRANGEMENTS, INCLUDING ARRANGEMENTS:
A. WITH THIRD PARTIES; AND
B. FOR NEW OR EXISTING GENERATION AND ENERGY
STORAGE, WHETHER ON–SITE OR OFF–SITE;
4. DISCLOSE INFORMATION ABOUT THE ANTICIPATED
TYPE OF ON–SITE BACKUP GENERATING FACILITY THAT WOULD BE USED IN THE
EVENT OF A SYSTEM OUTAGE;
5. DISCLOSE INFORMATION ABOUT:
A. THE AMOUNT OF WATER THAT THE LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER WILL USE EACH MONTH;
B. THE SOURCE OF THE WATER THAT WILL BE USED; AND
C. THE STATUS OF AN APPLICATION FOR A WATER
APPROPRIATION OR USE PERMIT SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
ENVIRONMENT OR A WATER UTILITY;
6. DISCLOSE THE STATUS AND TYPE OF SITE CONTROL
FOR THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S FACILITY,
INCLUDING OWNERSHIP OR LEASE CONTROL;
7. DISCLOSE ENERGY CHARACTERISTICS OF THE
CUSTOMER, INCLUDING:
A. PEAK LOAD;
B. ANTICIPATED LOAD FACTOR;
– 75 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
C. TIMING OF REQUESTED SERVICE;
D. LOAD RAMP PERIOD;
E. ANNUAL ENERGY USAGE; AND
F. LOAD PROFILE OR, IF UNAVAILABLE, A DESCRIPTION
OF THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S AVERAGE HOURLY USE;
8. PROVIDE A DESCRIPTION OF THE LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER’S OPERATION;
9. DISCLOSE THE POINT OF INTERCONNECTION AND
ADDRESS OR COORDINATES OF THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER; AND
10. PROVIDE ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE
COMMISSION CONSIDERS NECESSARY FOR THE PURPOSES IDENTIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) ESTABLISH ANY OTHER STANDARDS THAT THE COMMISSION
CONSIDERS NECESSARY.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, A
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER SHALL REGISTER WITH THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION:
(I) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER SIGNING A FEDERAL ENERGY
REGULATORY COMMISSION–JURISDICTIONAL AGREEMENT WITH AN ELECTRIC
COMPANY; OR
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER AN ELECTRIC COMPANY PROVIDES
TO THE COMMISSION AND THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE
COMMISSION AND A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER WHEN THE ELECTRIC COMPANY
PROVIDES TO PJM INFORMATION RELATED TO THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER THAT
MAY IMPACT PJM FORECASTS OR MARKETS.
(D) ELECTRIC COMPANIES AND LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS SHALL PROVIDE
TO THE COMMISSION WITHIN THE TIMELINES SET BY THE COMMISSION:
– 76 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(1) UPDATED INFORMATION REGARDING A REGISTERED LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER, INCLUDING IF:
(I) A NEW DUPLICATIVE INTERCONNECTION REQUEST
BECOMES KNOWN; OR
(II) THERE IS A CHANGE IN THE STATUS OF A DUPLICATIVE
INTERCONNECTION REQUEST; AND
(2) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS
RELEVANT.
(E) (1) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING AN APPLICATION FOR
REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING ALL INFORMATION REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL CERTIFY
WHETHER A REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SECTION IS COMPLETE.
(2) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE REGISTRATION
INFORMATION IS INCOMPLETE, THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND ANY TIME FRAME
PROVIDED IN AN ORDER OR REGULATION ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.
(F) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL CHARGE A REGISTRATION FEE OF NOT
LESS THAN $1,000 PER MEGAWATT OF THE PEAK LOAD OF THE LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER.
(2) THE FEE REVENUE RECEIVED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE USED ONLY AS FOLLOWS:
(I) 50% FOR THE ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–5A–08 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE; AND
(II) 50% FOR THE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–224 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL IMPOSE PENALTIES AGAINST A LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMER IF THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER:
(I) FAILS TO REGISTER IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION;
OR
(II) INTENTIONALLY MISLEADS THE COMMISSION IN ITS
REGISTRATION.
– 77 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY DIRECT PROCEEDS COLLECTED FROM A
PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO BE PROVIDED
TO EXISTING ELECTRIC CUSTOMERS IN THE SAME SERVICE TERRITORY AS THE
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER.
(H) (1) EXCEPT AS SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
CONFIDENTIAL COMMERCIAL OR FINANCIAL INFORMATION DISCLOSED TO THE
COMMISSION BY A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(B)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) SHALL BE CONSIDERED PROTECTED FROM DISCLOSURE
UNDER § 4–335 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE BEFORE THE LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER IS OPERATIONAL; AND
(II) MAY BE DISCLOSED BY THE COMMISSION:
1. IN A MANNER THAT IS CONSISTENT WITH TITLE 4 OF
THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE WHEN THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER BECOMES
OPERATIONAL; OR
2. NOTWITHSTANDING ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
A. IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION;
B. IF THE INFORMATION HAS BEEN MADE PUBLIC BY ANY
PERSON; OR
C. IF THE INFORMATION IS AGGREGATED AND
ANONYMIZED AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (J)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCEDURE FOR THE
DISCLOSURE OF CONFIDENTIAL COMMERCIAL AND FINANCIAL INFORMATION
PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION TO A UNIT
OF STATE GOVERNMENT, PJM, OR ANOTHER PERSON IF CONSIDERED APPROPRIATE
BY THE COMMISSION AND ONLY FOR THE PURPOSE OF ACCURATE LOAD
FORECASTING, TRANSMISSION PLANNING, OR OTHER REASONS THE COMMISSION
CONSIDERS NECESSARY.
(3) A PERSON AUTHORIZED TO ACCESS CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL KEEP THE INFORMATION
ACCESSED CONFIDENTIAL.
– 78 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(I) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, AN ELECTRIC COMPANY MAY NOT SUBMIT A
LARGE LOAD ADJUSTMENT REQUEST TO PJM UNLESS THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER
HAS COMPLETED THE REGISTRATION PROCESS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(J) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ENVIRONMENT
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER REGISTRY REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REPORT:
(I) SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION DISCLOSED IN SUBSECTION
(B)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION AGGREGATED BY EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SERVICE
TERRITORY;
(II) MAY NOT DISCLOSE CONFIDENTIAL COMMERCIAL OR
FINANCIAL INFORMATION AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION
UNLESS THE INFORMATION:
1. CONSISTS OF ENERGY CHARACTERISTICS IDENTIFIED
IN SUBSECTION (B)(2)(II)7A, C, AND D OF THIS SECTION, PROVIDED THAT THE
INFORMATION HAS BEEN ANONYMIZED AND PROJECTS ARE ONLY IDENTIFIED BY
ELECTRIC COMPANY SERVICE TERRITORY;
2. IS:
A. USED BY AN ELECTRIC COMPANY FOR THE
IDENTIFICATION OF DUPLICATIVE INTERCONNECTION REQUESTS BOTH IN AND
OUTSIDE THE STATE; AND
B. ANONYMIZED AND PROJECTS ARE IDENTIFIED ONLY
BY ELECTRIC COMPANY SERVICE TERRITORY; OR
3. HAS BEEN PREVIOUSLY DISCLOSED TO THE PUBLIC;
AND
(III) SHALL INCLUDE ANY OTHER INFORMATION REGARDING
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS AS A WHOLE IN AN ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE
TERRITORY THAT THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE.
(3) IF THERE IS ONLY ONE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER IDENTIFIED
WITHIN AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SERVICE TERRITORY THAT IS NOT THE SUBJECT OF
– 79 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A DUPLICATIVE INTERCONNECTION REQUEST, THE COMMISSION MAY REPORT THAT
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S INFORMATION IN AN AGGREGATED MANNER IN
CONJUNCTION WITH DATA FROM AN ADJACENT ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE
TERRITORY IN ORDER TO PRESERVE ANONYMITY.
(4) ALL INFORMATION PROVIDED IN THE REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE USED PUBLICLY BY THE COMMISSION.
7–234.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 15, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL
DEVELOP A VOLUNTARY CLEAN CAPACITY RATING PROGRAM THAT ESTABLISHES
CLEAN CAPACITY RATINGS FOR LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS THAT ELECT TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING PLATINUM AND GOLD RATING
DESIGNATIONS.
(2) THE RATING SYSTEM SHALL:
(I) ACCOUNT FOR A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S VOLUNTARY
ADOPTION OF DEMAND RESPONSE AND INCREMENTAL RESOURCES; AND
(II) EVALUATE THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER PROVIDES ADEQUATE INCREMENTAL RESOURCES TO MEET A
PERCENTAGE OF ITS PEAK LOAD AS ASSIGNED BY PJM AND GROSSED UP BY THE
APPROPRIATE RESERVE MARGIN.
(B) (1) A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER MAY BE ELIGIBLE FOR A GOLD OR
PLATINUM RATING UNDER THIS SECTION ONLY IF THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER:
(I) ENSURES THAT WORKERS CONSTRUCTING THE LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER’S FACILITY ARE PAID NOT LESS THAN THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY UNDER TITLE 17,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
(II) ENTERS INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH
THE COMMISSION THAT:
1. CONFIRMS THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S
COMMITMENT TO PROVIDE AND MAINTAIN THE CAPACITY REFERENCED IN
SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE LIFE OF THE FACILITY; AND
– 80 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
2. PROVIDES THAT THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER
CONSENTS TO THE COMMISSION’S JURISDICTION FOR ENFORCEMENT OF PENALTY
PROVISIONS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH PENALTIES FOR A
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER THAT VIOLATES A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING
ENTERED INTO UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) THE PENALTIES SHALL ACCOUNT FOR BOTH THE BENEFITS
RECEIVED BY THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER AND THE HARM DONE TO THE STATE AND
RATEPAYERS BY THE VIOLATION.
(III) CONSENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II)2 OF THIS SUBSECTION
TO THE ENFORCEMENT OF PENALTIES ESTABLISHED IN THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL
CONTINUE UNTIL THE COMMISSION PROVIDES WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMER THAT RELIEVES THE CUSTOMER FROM THE OBLIGATION.
(C) A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER MAY RECEIVE A GOLD RATING ONLY IF THE
CUSTOMER DEMONSTRATES THAT IT HAS ADEQUATE INCREMENTAL RESOURCES
SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE CUSTOMER’S CAPACITY FOR AT LEAST 80% OF THE
CUSTOMER’S PEAK LOAD AS ASSIGNED BY PJM AND ADDED TOGETHER WITH THE
APPROPRIATE RESERVE MARGIN THROUGH A COMBINATION OF INCREMENTAL
RESOURCES.
(D) A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER MAY RECEIVE A PLATINUM RATING ONLY IF
THE CUSTOMER DEMONSTRATES THAT IT HAS ADEQUATE INCREMENTAL RESOURCES
SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE CUSTOMER’S CAPACITY FOR 100% OF THE CUSTOMER’S
PEAK LOAD AS ASSIGNED BY PJM AND ADDED TOGETHER WITH THE APPROPRIATE
RESERVE MARGIN THROUGH A COMBINATION OF INCREMENTAL RESOURCES.
(E) BENEFITS OF RECEIVING A GOLD OR PLATINUM RATING INCLUDE:
(1) FOR A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER THAT HAS RECEIVED A GOLD
RATING, PRIORITIZATION FOR LOAD STUDIES AND INTERCONNECTION OVER LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMERS THAT DO NOT HAVE A GOLD OR PLATINUM RATING; AND
(2) FOR A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER THAT HAS RECEIVED A PLATINUM
RATING:
(I) PRIORITIZATION FOR LOAD STUDIES AND
INTERCONNECTION OVER OTHER LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS THAT DO NOT HAVE A
PLATINUM RATING;
– 81 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) A GUARANTEE THAT PERMIT APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED TO
THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT SHALL BE PROCESSED WITHIN 12
MONTHS AFTER SUBMISSION, PENDING COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE STATE AND
FEDERAL LAWS, INCLUDING EXISTING ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE REQUIREMENTS;
AND
(III) THE OPPORTUNITY TO PROCURE AND PROVIDE, BEFORE
PERMITS ARE ISSUED, EQUIPMENT FOR ANY SUBSTATION NEEDED TO
INTERCONNECT THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(F) A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER THAT DOES NOT HAVE A GOLD OR PLATINUM
RATING IS NOT ENTITLED TO THE BENEFITS LISTED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION.
(G) (1) IF A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER WITH A PLATINUM RATING ELECTS
TO PROCURE AND PROVIDE EQUIPMENT FOR A SUBSTATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (E)(2)(III) OF THIS SECTION, THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER:
(I) SHALL PROVIDE ALL THE NECESSARY EQUIPMENT FOR
CONSTRUCTING THE SUBSTATION INFRASTRUCTURE;
(II) MAY PROCURE THE EQUIPMENT BEFORE THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY IN WHOSE SERVICE TERRITORY THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER IS OR WILL
BE LOCATED HAS ISSUED FINAL PERMITTING APPROVALS; AND
(III) MAY ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY THAT DETAILS WHAT EQUIPMENT THE ELECTRIC COMPANY MAY
PURCHASE FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE SUBSTATION, BUT THE ENTIRETY OF
THE EQUIPMENT SHALL BE FUNDED OR PROVIDED BY THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER.
(2) ANY EQUIPMENT PROCURED BY THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER FOR
THE CONSTRUCTION OF A SUBSTATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL MEET THE
NECESSARY INTERCONNECTION REQUIREMENTS OF THE ELECTRIC COMPANY IN
WHOSE SERVICE TERRITORY THE SUBSTATION WILL BE LOCATED.
(3) COSTS INCURRED AS A RESULT OF CONSTRUCTING A SUBSTATION
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE PASSED ON TO OTHER CUSTOMERS, EITHER
THROUGH AN ELECTRIC COMPANY’S RATES OR OTHERWISE, AND SHALL BE FULLY
BORNE BY THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER.
(4) EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL DEVELOP PROCESSES AND
TARIFFS FOR REVIEW AND APPROVAL BY THE COMMISSION TO ALLOW FOR THE
– 82 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER TO PROCURE AND PROVIDE EQUIPMENT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION.
(5) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL RELIEVE A LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER THAT DOES NOT HAVE A VOLUNTARY CLEAN CAPACITY RATING FROM ANY
REQUIREMENT TO PAY THE COST OF CONSTRUCTING A SUBSTATION COMPLETED
THROUGH THE STANDARD PERMITTING AND INTERCONNECTION PROCESSES.
(H) (1) SUBJECT TO COMMISSION APPROVAL, EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY
SHALL ESTABLISH AN INTERCONNECTION PROCESS FOR LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS
THAT PARTICIPATE IN THE VOLUNTARY CLEAN CAPACITY RATING PROGRAM.
(2) THE INTERCONNECTION PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY NOT UNDULY IMPACT THE TIME FRAME OR ABILITY OF CUSTOMERS
THAT ARE NOT LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS TO INTERCONNECT WITH THE ELECTRIC
SYSTEM.
(3) THE INTERCONNECTION PROCESS SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A STANDARD TIMELINE FOR LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS THAT
PARTICIPATE IN THE VOLUNTARY CLEAN CAPACITY RATING PROGRAM BUT DO NOT
HAVE A GOLD OR PLATINUM RATING; AND
(II) A PRIORITIZATION PROCESS FOR LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS
WITH A GOLD OR PLATINUM RATING.
(I) BEFORE ENTERING INTO A CONTRACT FOR ELECTRIC SERVICE, A LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMER THAT PARTICIPATES IN THE VOLUNTARY CLEAN CAPACITY RATING
PROGRAM SHALL SUBMIT A REQUEST FOR A LOAD STUDY UNDER § 4–212 OF THIS
ARTICLE TO DETERMINE THE NECESSARY CONTRACT CAPACITY FOR THE LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMER.
7–306.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(7) “LMI subscriber” means a subscriber that:
(i) is low–income;
(ii) is moderate–income; or
(iii) resides in a census tract that is:
– 83 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. an overburdened community; and
2. an underserved community.
(d) (1) (i) The Commission shall establish and maintain a Community
Solar Energy Generating Systems Program.
(ii) The structure of the Program is as provided in this subsection.
(13) (i) Except as provided in [subparagraph (ii)] SUBPARAGRAPHS (II)
AND (III) of this paragraph, a community solar energy generating system may not be located
on the same or an adjacent parcel of land as an existing or proposed community solar energy
generating system if the total installed capacity of all community solar energy generating
systems on the same or adjacent parcel would exceed 5 megawatts.
(ii) The prohibition under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph does
not apply to projects constructed:
1. on the rooftops of buildings;
2. in areas that are zoned for industrial use;
3. on brownfields locations and clean fill sites;
4. over parking lots or roadways;
5. on multilevel parking structures;
6. on or over transportation or public rights–of–way;
7. at airports; OR
8. on land that:
A. was previously zoned for industrial use or is ecologically
compromised; and
B. is not targeted for mitigation or restoration. [; or
9.] (III) THE PROHIBITION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO PROJECTS CONSTRUCTED in any location if
the combined capacity of all community solar energy generating systems [on the same or
adjacent parcel does not exceed 10 megawatts and] DOES NOT EXCEED:
1. A. 10 MEGAWATTS ON THE SAME PARCEL; AND
– 84 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
B. 20 MEGAWATTS ON ADJACENT PARCELS; AND
2. A. at least 75% of the aggregate capacity of the
co–located community solar energy generating systems serves LMI subscribers;
B. for a site without a community solar energy generating
system installed before the start of the Program under paragraph (20) of this subsection, all
of the community solar energy generating systems installed after the start of the Program
are used for agrivoltaics; or
C. for a site with a community solar energy generating system
installed before the start of the Program under paragraph (20) of this subsection, each new
community solar energy generating system installed after the start of the Program is used
for agrivoltaics.
7–321.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM”
MEANS A MOVABLE PHOTOVOLTAIC SOLAR ENERGY GENERATION DEVICE THAT IS:
(1) DESIGNED TO BE CONNECTED TO A BUILDING’S ELECTRICAL
SYSTEM THROUGH A STANDARD ELECTRICAL OUTLET;
(2) PRIMARILY INTENDED TO OFFSET PART OF THE BUILDING’S
ELECTRICITY CONSUMPTION;
(3) LIMITED TO SUPPLYING A MAXIMUM POWER OUTPUT OF NOT MORE
THAN 1,200 WATTS BACK TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM OF THE BUILDING; AND
(4) CERTIFIED BY UNDERWRITERS LABORATORY OR AN EQUIVALENT
NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED TESTING LABORATORY.
(B) A PERSON MAY PURCHASE AND INSTALL NOT MORE THAN ONE
PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM PER ELECTRIC METER FOR
RESIDENTIAL USE ONLY.
(C) A PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM:
(1) IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF §§ 7–306 AND 7–306.1
OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR INCLUSION IN MEETING THE RENEWABLE
ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD; AND
– 85 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) MAY NOT GENERATE RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS OF ANY TYPE.
(D) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY:
(1) MAY NOT REQUIRE A CUSTOMER USING A PORTABLE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM TO:
(I) OBTAIN THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S APPROVAL BEFORE
INSTALLING OR USING THE PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM;
(II) PAY ANY FEE OR CHARGE RELATED TO THE PORTABLE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM’S ABILITY TO FEED ELECTRICITY BACK INTO THE
ELECTRIC SYSTEM; OR
(III) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION,
INSTALL ANY ADDITIONAL CONTROLS OR EQUIPMENT BEYOND WHAT IS INTEGRATED
INTO THE PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM; AND
(2) IS NOT LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGE CAUSED BY A PORTABLE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM.
(E) A CUSTOMER USING A PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
SHALL:
(1) NOTIFY THE ELECTRIC COMPANY PROVIDING SERVICE IN THE
SERVICE TERRITORY IN WHICH THE GENERATING SYSTEM WILL BE INSTALLED
BEFORE INSTALLATION;
(2) PROVIDE TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY PROVIDING SERVICE IN THE
SERVICE TERRITORY IN WHICH THE GENERATING SYSTEM WILL BE OR IS INSTALLED
A CERTIFICATION OF THE SAFETY FEATURES AND MAXIMUM GENERATING CAPACITY
OF THE GENERATING SYSTEM; AND
(3) IF THE GENERATING SYSTEM REQUIRES AN AUTOMATIC LOCKING
DISCONNECT SWITCH TO BE INSTALLED, PAY FOR THE SWITCH INSTALLATION.
(F) A PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT HAS A
MAXIMUM POWER OUTPUT TO A STANDARD ELECTRICAL OUTLET OF NOT MORE THAN
391 WATTS IS EXEMPT FROM PRODUCT LISTING PROVISIONS FROM UNDERWRITERS
LABORATORY OR AN EQUIVALENT NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED TESTING LABORATORY
THAT WOULD REQUIRE ALTERATIONS TO THE BUILDING’S PREMISES, WIRING, OR
ELECTRICAL PANELS.
– 86 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
7–505.
(b) (1) The Commission shall issue the orders or adopt the regulations required
under this subsection before the implementation of customer choice.
(2) The Commission shall order a universal service program, to be made
available on a statewide basis, to benefit low–income customers, in accordance with [§
7–512.1 of this subtitle] § 5–5A–08 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE.
(d) (2) (ii) The cap required under paragraph (1) of this subsection applies
to the recovery of:
3. costs for the universal service program established under
[§ 7–512.1 of this subtitle] § 5–5A–08 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE.
7–510.
(d) (2) A residential electricity supplier:
(i) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3)(III) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, may offer electricity, other than green power, only at a price that does not
exceed [the trailing 12–month average] THE FOLLOWING PERCENTAGES of the electric
company’s standard offer service rate in the electric company’s service territory as of the date
of agreement with the customer:
1. FOR A TERM NOT TO EXCEED 23 MONTHS, 100%;
2. FOR A TERM OF 24 MONTHS TO 35 MONTHS, 105%;
AND
3. FOR A TERM OF 36 MONTHS, 110%;
(ii) may offer residential electricity supply only for a term not to
exceed [12] 36 months at a time;
(iii) may, for electricity supply other than green power, automatically
renew the term only if the electricity supplier provides notice to the customer 90 days before
and 30 days before renewal;
(iv) may offer green power that meets the requirements of § 7–707 of
this title, but may not automatically renew the term with the customer;
(v) [subject to] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN paragraph (3) of this
subsection, may not offer a variable rate [other than a rate that adjusts for seasonal
variation not more than twice in a single year]; and
– 87 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vi) may not pay a commission or other incentive–based compensation
to an energy salesperson for enrolling customers.
(3) [Paragraph (2)(v) of this subsection does not prohibit the offer and use
of] A RESIDENTIAL ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER MAY OFFER A VARIABLE RATE THAT:
(I) USES time–of–use rates that establish different rates for periods
within a single day;
(II) ADJUSTS FOR SEASONAL VARIATION NOT MORE THAN TWICE
IN A SINGLE YEAR; OR
(III) DOES NOT EXCEED THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S STANDARD
OFFER SERVICE RATE IN THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY AT ANY
TIME DURING THE AGREEMENT WITH THE CUSTOMER.
7–510.3.
(o) The Commission shall establish procedures for an electric customer that is
receiving electricity supply through a community choice aggregator to receive any bill
assistance credit or arrearage assistance to which the customer may be entitled under [§
7–512.1 of this subtitle] § 5–5A–08 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE or any other
federal or State bill and arrearage assistance administered by the Office of Home Energy
Programs.
7–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) (1) “Electric distribution system support services” means the dispatch and
control of a distributed energy resource to provide services that contribute to the efficient and
reliable operation of the electric distribution system by:
(i) an electric company; or
(ii) an aggregator acting at the direction of an electric company.
(2) “Electric distribution system support services” includes:
(i) local or system peak demand reduction;
(ii) demand response;
– 88 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(iii) the avoidance or deferral of a transmission or distribution
upgrade or capacity expansion; and
(iv) facilitating hosting capacity to accommodate additional
distributed energy resources.
(i) (1) “Renewable on–site generating system” means an energy system located
on a customer’s premises that:
(i) generates or stores electricity from a Tier 1 renewable source or a
Tier 2 renewable source that does not release greenhouse gases;
(ii) is capable of providing electricity to:
1. a home, business, or other structure serviced by an electric
company; and
2. the electric distribution system;
(iii) is paired with an energy storage device that is configured to
charge from:
1. the renewable source; and
2. the electric distribution system unless, for the purpose of
eligibility for net energy metering, the device is required to be charged only from the
renewable source; and
(iv) is interconnected and operates in parallel with an electric
company’s transmission and distribution facilities.
(2) “Renewable on–site generating system” may include bidirectional
electric vehicle service equipment located on a customer’s premises.
7–1005.
(a) The Commission shall develop a program for each investor–owned electric
company to establish a pilot program or temporary tariff to compensate owners and
aggregators of distributed energy resources for electric distribution system support services
through an incentive mechanism determined by the Commission.
7–1006.
(a) (1) [The Commission may approve or require an investor–owned electric
company to] SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDING, THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION, MAY offer upfront
– 89 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
incentives or rebates to customers to acquire and install renewable on–site generating
systems if the customer:
(i) enrolls in a pilot program or temporary tariff established under §
7–1005 of this subtitle; and
(ii) allows the system to be used for electric distribution system
support services for a period of not less than 5 years.
(2) [The Commission may:
(i) authorize or require an investor–owned electric company to
provide an additional incentive or rebate for low– or moderate–income customers who apply
for an incentive or rebate under this section; and
(ii) require an investor–owned electric company to] THE MARYLAND
ENERGY ADMINISTRATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION, MAY
prioritize the offer of incentives or rebates under this section to low– or moderate–income
customers.
(b) [In determining whether to require an investor–owned electric company to offer
an incentive or rebate under this section, the Commission shall consider:
(1) the benefit of reducing the operation of peak generating facilities in
overburdened and underserved communities;
(2) the benefit of resiliency and service outage avoidance for customers with
on–site generating systems; and
(3) the potential for investor–owned electric companies to reduce expenses
relating to electric distribution system infrastructure by leveraging customers’ on–site
generating systems.
(c) The Commission shall consider establishing a limit on the amount of incentives
or rebates issued in a manner that achieves deployment goals while mitigating potential
customer impacts.
(d) The Commission shall consult with the] THE Maryland Energy
Administration, when approving [or requiring] an incentive or rebate under this section,
[to] SHALL ensure that the incentive or rebate is designed to supplement, to the greatest
extent possible, other available State and federal incentives for customer adoption of
renewable on–site generating systems.
7–1007.
– 90 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(a) An investor–owned electric company may recover all reasonable costs incurred
in[:
(1)] participating in and administering a program under § 7–1005 of this
subtitle[; and
(2) offering an upfront incentive or rebate under § 7–1006 of this subtitle].
(b) To the extent feasible, the costs [listed] in subsection (a) of this section shall be
recovered by the investor–owned electric company within the calendar year in which those
costs were incurred.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this subtitle, an investor–owned electric
company may pursue and use a performance incentive mechanism to cover the cost of using
distributed energy resources or an aggregator of distributed resources under this subtitle.
7–1201.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Large capacity energy resource” means a generating station or energy storage
device that[:
(1) on or before January 1, 2025:
(i) has applied to PJM for interconnection approval; or
(ii) has been approved by PJM for interconnection; and
(2)] has a capacity rating equal to or greater than 20 megawatts after
accounting for the effective load carrying capability.
7–1216.
(a) The Commission may not approve an application for a nuclear energy
generation project submitted under § 7–1212 of this subtitle unless:
(1) the project is connected to the electric system serving the State;
(2) over the duration of the proposed long–term pricing schedule, the
projected net rate impact for an average residential customer, based on annual consumption
of 12,000 kilowatt–hours and combined with the projected net rate impact of other nuclear
energy generation projects, does not exceed an amount determined by the Commission;
(3) over the duration of the proposed long–term pricing schedule, the
projected net rate impact for all nonresidential customers, considered as a blended average
– 91 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
and combined with the projected net rate impact of other nuclear energy generation projects,
does not exceed a percentage determined by the Commission of nonresidential customers’
total annual electric bills; and
(4) the price specified in the proposed long–term pricing schedule does not
exceed an amount determined by the Commission.
(b) When calculating the projected net average rate impacts for nuclear energy
generation projects under this section, the Commission shall [apply the same] CONSIDER
THE net long–term cost per megawatt–hour APPLIED to residential and nonresidential
customers.
7–1220.
(a) In this section, “zero–emission credit” means [the difference between the price
that a nuclear energy generating station with a long–term pricing schedule approved in an
order issued under § 7–1217 of this subtitle may receive on the wholesale market and the
cost of constructing the nuclear energy generating station] A CREDIT EQUAL TO THE
ENVIRONMENTAL ATTRIBUTES OF 1 MEGAWATT–HOUR OF ELECTRICITY THAT IS
DERIVED FROM A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION APPROVED BY THE
COMMISSION UNDER § 7–1217 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) The Commission shall adopt regulations that:
(1) establish the nuclear energy long–term pricing purchase obligation
sufficiently in advance to allow an electric company to reflect nuclear energy long–term
pricing costs as a nonbypassable surcharge that is added to the electric company’s base
distribution rate on customer bills;
(2) define rules that facilitate and ensure the secure and transparent
transfer of revenues and long–term pricing payments among parties;
(3) define the terms and procedures of the nuclear energy long–term pricing
schedule obligations, including:
(i) establishing a formula and process to adjust the value of the
long–term pricing schedule every 2 years based on projected wholesale market prices
adjusted by the locational value and earning potential in the PJM region of the nuclear
energy generating station; and
(ii) establishing a per megawatt hour cap on any long–term pricing
schedule specified in an order issued under § 7–1217 of this subtitle;
(4) require the Commission to establish an escrow account; and
– 92 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(5) to meet the total statewide long–term pricing purchase obligation for all
applications approved in an order issued under § 7–1217 of this subtitle, require the
Commission to annually establish each electric company’s zero–emission credit purchase
obligation based on the most recent final electricity sales data as reported by PJM
Interconnection and measured at the customer’s meter in proportion to the electric company’s
share of statewide load.
(c) (1) Each electric company shall procure from the escrow account established
by regulation under this section a quantity of zero–emission credits equal to the electric
company’s respective percentage of retail electric sales each year.
(2) Subject to any escrow account reserve requirement the Commission
establishes, if there are insufficient zero–emission credits available to satisfy the electric
companies’ zero–emission credit purchase obligations, the overpayment shall be distributed
to electric companies to be refunded or credited to each distribution customer based on the
customer’s consumption of electricity supply that is subject to the renewable energy portfolio
standard.
(d) A debt, an obligation, or a liability of a nuclear energy generation project or of
an owner or operator of a nuclear energy generation project may not be considered a debt,
an obligation, or a liability of the State.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AND BEFORE
THE NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT BEGINS COMMERCIAL OPERATION,
THE COMMISSION MAY APPROVE AN INCREASE OF THE TOTAL COST OF A NUCLEAR
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT UNDER A LONG–TERM PRICING PURCHASE
OBLIGATION.
(2) THE TOTAL COST OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT
THAT MAY BE RECOVERED UNDER A LONG–TERM PRICING PURCHASE OBLIGATION
MAY NOT BE INCREASED BY MORE THAN 15% OF THE ORIGINAL TOTAL PROJECT
COST.
7–1302.
(a) There is a Strategic Energy Planning Office.
(b) (1) The head of the Office is the Director.
(2) (i) The Director shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice
and consent of the Senate.
(ii) 1. The term of the Director is 5 years and begins on July 1.
– 93 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. THE FIRST TERM OF THE DIRECTOR SHALL BEGIN ON
JULY 1, 2026.
(iii) At the end of a term, the Director continues to serve until a
successor is appointed and qualifies.
(iv) A Director who is appointed after a term has begun serves for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(v) A Director may serve more than one term.
(3) The Governor may remove the Director for incompetence or misconduct
in accordance with § 3–307 of the State Government Article.
(4) The Director is entitled to a salary as provided in the State budget.
7–1304.
(c) (1) On or before November 1 each year, the Senate Committee on Education,
Energy, and the Environment and the House [Economic Matters] ENVIRONMENT AND
TRANSPORTATION Committee may jointly request the Office to assess up to five policy
scenarios.
(2) Not later than 1 year after the date the Office receives a request under
paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Office shall submit a report of the results of the
requested policy scenarios to the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the
Environment and the House [Economic Matters] ENVIRONMENT AND TRANSPORTATION
Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
Article – Real Property
14–134.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DATA CENTER” MEANS A BUILDING OR GROUP OF BUILDINGS:
(I) USED TO HOUSE COMPUTER SYSTEMS, COMPUTER STORAGE
EQUIPMENT, AND ASSOCIATED INFRASTRUCTURE THAT BUSINESSES OR OTHER
ORGANIZATIONS USE TO ORGANIZE, PROCESS, STORE, AND DISSEMINATE LARGE
AMOUNTS OF DATA;
(II) THAT HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE AN AGGREGATE
DEMAND OF AT LEAST 5 MEGAWATTS; AND
– 94 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(III) THAT HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE A LOAD FACTOR OF
MORE THAN 80%.
(3) “DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT” MEANS AN AREA OR AREAS WITHIN
THE CITY OF BALTIMORE DESIGNATED BY AN ORDINANCE OF THE MAYOR AND CITY
COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE.
(4) “TAX INCREMENT” MEANS FOR ANY TAX YEAR THE AMOUNT BY
WHICH THE ASSESSABLE BASE AS OF JANUARY 1 PRECEDING THAT TAX YEAR
EXCEEDS THE ORIGINAL TAXABLE VALUE, DIVIDED BY THE ASSESSMENT RATIO USED
TO DETERMINE THE ORIGINAL TAXABLE VALUE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN BALTIMORE CITY.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PERSON MAY NOT CONSTRUCT A DATA CENTER IN A DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT THAT
IS SUBJECT TO TAX INCREMENT REPAYMENT ON OUTSTANDING BONDS.
(2) THE PROHIBITION IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES
NOT APPLY TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF A DATA CENTER IN THE CITY–WIDE
AFFORDABLE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT ESTABLISHED UNDER
BALTIMORE CITY ORDINANCE NO. 24–443, ENACTED DECEMBER 4, 2024.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the State
Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to receive
interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General Fund of
the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
– 95 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
214. THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY EFFICIENCY
FOR NONPROFITS LOAN FUND.
13–117.
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) recognize the need for State agencies to be responsive to the requests and
legislative directives of the General Assembly;
(2) reduce the time it takes for State agencies to procure consultants to assist
with legislative mandates that have deadlines specified in law; and
(3) be timely in addressing climate change, environmental, energy, and
greenhouse gas emissions related issues.
(b) This section applies only to the procurement of consultants that:
(1) are legislatively mandated with specific time frames established in law;
and
(2) will address issues related only to climate change, the environment,
energy, and greenhouse gas emissions.
(c) The following units are authorized to issue [competitive sealed bids] A
PROCUREMENT CONTRACT USING A COMPETITIVE SEALED BID METHOD,
COMPETITIVE SEALED PROPOSAL METHOD, OR EXPEDITED PROCUREMENT
PROCEDURES FOR AMOUNTS higher than their designated small procurement delegation
authorities:
(1) the Public Service Commission;
(2) the Office of People’s Counsel;
(3) the Maryland Energy Administration;
(4) the Department of the Environment; and
(5) the Department of Natural Resources.
(d) Before awarding a procurement contract under this section, the procurement
officer shall obtain the approval of:
(1) the head of the unit; and
(2) the Chief Procurement Officer, or their designee.
– 96 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(e) (1) The Chief Procurement Officer, or their designee, shall approve a
procurement contract submitted under this section if it complies with the requirements of
this section.
(2) If the Chief Procurement Officer, or their designee, does not RESPOND
TO A REQUEST TO approve a procurement contract submitted under this section within 5
business days after receiving the contract, the contract shall be considered approved.
13–217.
(a) In this section, “multi–year contract” means a procurement contract that
requires appropriations for more than 1 fiscal year.
(b) (1) A unit may enter into a multi–year contract subject to:
(i) standards established by the Board; and
(ii) regulations adopted by the primary procurement unit that is
responsible for the type of procurement involved.
(2) A multi–year contract shall be subject to review and approval by that
primary procurement unit.
(c) A multi–year contract may not be approved unless each unit reviewing the
multi–year contract determines that:
(1) the estimated requirements of the State:
(i) cover the period of the multi–year contract;
(ii) are reasonably firm; and
(iii) are continuing; and
(2) the multi–year contract will serve the best interests of the State by
encouraging effective competition or otherwise promoting economy in State procurement.
(d) (1) If money sufficient for the continued performance of a multi–year
contract is not appropriated for any fiscal year, the multi–year contract terminates
automatically on the earlier of:
(i) the last day of the fiscal year for which money last was
appropriated; or
– 97 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) the date provided in the termination clause of the procurement
contract.
(2) If the multi–year contract is terminated under this subsection, the unit
shall reimburse the contractor for the reasonable value of any nonrecurring costs that were:
(i) incurred as a result of the multi–year contract; but
(ii) not amortized in the price of the supplies or services delivered
under the multi–year contract.
(3) The cost of termination under this subsection may be paid from any
appropriation available for that purpose.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, each multi–year contract,
including a lease of real property, shall include an automatic termination clause that:
(1) is not inconsistent with the requirements of subsection (d) of this section;
and
(2) discharges both parties to the multi–year contract from future
performance of that contract, but not from their existing obligations.
(f) (1) On the recommendation of the Secretary of General Services, FOR A
MULTI–YEAR CONTRACT TO PROCURE ENERGY GENERATED FROM A TIER 1
RENEWABLE SOURCE OR A TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCE, AS DEFINED IN § 7–701 OF
THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE, the Board may waive the requirement to include:
(I) an automatic termination clause under subsection (e) of this
section [for a multi–year contract to procure energy generated from a Tier 1 renewable source
or a Tier 2 renewable source, as defined in § 7–701 of the Public Utilities Article]; OR
(II) A TERMINATION FOR CONVENIENCE CLAUSE REQUIRED
UNDER § 13–218(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) In determining whether [or not] to grant a waiver under paragraph (1)
of this subsection, the Board shall consider the effect of imposing THE FOLLOWING CLAUSE
REQUIREMENTS ON THE ABILITY OF THE ENERGY SUPPLIER TO OBTAIN FINANCING
FOR THE RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT THAT PRODUCES THE ENERGY
THAT THE STATE IS CONTRACTING TO PROCURE:
(I) the termination clause requirement under subsection (e) of this
section [on the ability of the energy supplier to obtain financing for the renewable energy
generation project that produces the energy that the State is contracting to procure]; AND
– 98 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(II) THE TERMINATION FOR CONVENIENCE CLAUSE
REQUIREMENT UNDER § 13–218(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
13–218.
(a) Each procurement contract shall include clauses covering:
(2) termination wholly or partly by the State for its convenience if the head
of the primary procurement unit determines that termination is appropriate;
(F) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–217(F) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD MAY
WAIVE THE INCLUSION OF A TERMINATION FOR CONVENIENCE CLAUSE REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
Article – State Government
9–2012.
(b) There is an Energy Storage System Grant Program in the Administration.
(c) The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to individuals and business
entities for a portion of the costs of purchasing and installing energy storage systems.
(d) The Administration shall:
(1) administer the Program;
(2) establish application procedures for the Program; and
(3) award grants under the Program.
(e) (1) Subject TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND to the
availability of money in the Fund, an eligible applicant may apply for a grant under the
Program for costs incurred to purchase and install an energy storage system.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REQUIRE THAT AN APPLICANT
PARTICIPATE IN A PROGRAM OR TARIFF ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–1005 OF THE
PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE AS A CONDITION OF ELIGIBILITY FOR RECEIVING A
GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(f) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A grant awarded under the Program may not exceed the lesser of:
[(1)] (i) 1. for an energy storage system installed on a residential
property, $5,000; or
– 99 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(ii)] 2. for an energy storage system installed on a commercial
property, $150,000; or
[(2)] (II) 30% of the total installed costs of the energy storage system.
(2) THE AWARD LIMITS IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DO
NOT APPLY TO A GRANT PROVIDED TO AN APPLICANT AS AN UPFRONT INCENTIVE OR
REBATE UNDER § 7 –1006 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
9–20B–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Maryland Energy Administration.
9–20B–05.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “DISTRICT ENERGY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–232 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(A–1) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is to implement the Strategic Energy Investment
Program.
(c) The Administration shall administer the Fund.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) all of the proceeds from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g) of the
Environment Article;
(2) money appropriated in the State budget to the Program;
(3) repayments and prepayments of principal and interest on loans made
from the Fund;
(4) compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article;
– 100 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(5) money received from any public or private source for the benefit of the
Fund;
(6) money transferred from the Public Service Commission under §
7–207.2(d)(3) of the Public Utilities Article; and
(7) money distributed under § 2–614.1 of the Tax – General Article.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(1) to invest in the promotion, development, and implementation of:
(i) cost–effective energy efficiency and conservation programs,
projects, or activities, including measurement and verification of energy savings;
(ii) renewable and clean energy resources;
(iii) climate change programs directly related to reducing or
mitigating the effects of climate change; and
(iv) demand response programs that are designed to promote changes
in electric usage by customers in response to:
1. changes in the price of electricity over time; or
2. incentives designed to induce lower electricity use at times
of high wholesale market prices or when system reliability is jeopardized;
(2) to provide targeted programs, projects, activities, and investments to
reduce electricity consumption by customers in the low–income and moderate–income
residential sectors;
(3) to provide supplemental funds for low–income energy assistance through
[the Electric Universal Service Program established under § 7–512.1 of the Public Utilities
Article and other] electric AND FUEL assistance programs in the Department of Human
Services;
(4) to provide rate relief by offsetting electricity rates of:
(I) residential customers, including an offset of surcharges imposed
on ratepayers under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article; AND
(II) TO THE EXTENT FEASIBLE, RESIDENTS OF APARTMENT
HOUSES, AS DEFINED IN § 7–303 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE, FOR WHICH
ELECTRICITY SERVICE IS PROVIDED THROUGH:
– 101 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. SUBMETERING AUTHORIZED UNDER § 7–303 OF THE
PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE; OR
2. AN ENERGY ALLOCATION SYSTEM AS DEFINED IN §
7–304 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE;
(5) to provide grants, loans, and other assistance and investment as
necessary and appropriate to implement the purposes of the Program as set forth in §
9–20B–03 of this subtitle;
(6) to implement energy–related public education and outreach initiatives
regarding reducing energy consumption and greenhouse gas emissions;
(7) to provide rebates under the Electric Vehicle Recharging Equipment
Rebate Program established under § 9–2009 of this title;
(8) to provide grants to encourage combined heat and power projects at
industrial facilities;
(9) to provide at least $1,200,000 in each fiscal year for fiscal year 2025
through fiscal year 2028 to the Climate Technology Founder’s Fund established under §
10–858 of the Economic Development Article;
(10) subject to subsection (f–2) of this section, to provide at least $2,100,000
in funding each fiscal year to the Maryland Energy Innovation Fund established under §
10–835 of the Economic Development Article;
(11) to provide at least $500,000 each year to the Resiliency Hub Grant
Program Fund under § 9–2011 of this title;
(12) to provide grants through the Customer–Sited Solar Program under §
9–2016 of this title;
(13) notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section, to pay costs associated
with the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of the Environment;
[and]
(14) TO PROVIDE FUNDS TO THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY
EFFICIENCY FOR NONPROFITS LOAN FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–868 OF THE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE;
(15) TO PROVIDE LOANS AND GRANTS FOR:
– 102 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(I) BUILDING ELECTRIFICATION, INCLUDING CONNECTION TO
AN ELECTRIFIED DISTRICT ENERGY SYSTEM;
(II) ELECTRIFIED THERMAL ENERGY GENERATION ASSETS
INTERCONNECTED WITH A DISTRICT ENERGY SYSTEM; AND
(III) TRANSPORTATION ELECTRIFICATION;
(16) TO PROVIDE LOANS AND GRANTS FOR PROGRAMS, PROJECTS, AND
TECHNOLOGIES THAT ASSIST COVERED BUILDINGS, AS DEFINED IN § 2–1601 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, IN MEETING THE BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE
STANDARDS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–1602 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE;
(17) TO PROVIDE GRANTS FOR RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECTS UNDER
§ 9–20E–02 OF THIS TITLE;
(18) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO ELECTRIC
COMPANIES, INCLUDING ELECTRIC COOPERATIVES AND MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC
UTILITIES, TO PAY DOWN THE COSTS INCURRED BY THE ELECTRIC COMPANIES FOR
IMPLEMENTING AND ADMINISTERING PROGRAMS AND SERVICES UNDER TITLE 7,
SUBTITLE 2, PART II OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE;
(19) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, TO OFFSET RESIDENTIAL ELECTRIC
CUSTOMER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE LIMITED–INCOME RATE MECHANISM
REQUIRED UNDER § 4–309 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE;
(20) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR A
COMPREHENSIVE STUDY OF PUBLIC SCHOOL HVAC SYSTEMS IN BALTIMORE CITY;
(21) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR UPGRADES TO
PUBLIC SCHOOL HVAC SYSTEMS IN BALTIMORE CITY;
(22) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION’S RESIDENTIAL AND COMMERCIAL ENERGY STORAGE GRANT
PROGRAM;
(23) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR THE
REVIEW OF RENEWABLE AND CLEAN ENERGY PROJECTS THROUGH THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES’ POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM;
(24) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR
HEAT PUMP INSTALLATIONS AND REPLACEMENTS FOR LOW– AND
MODERATE–INCOME HOUSEHOLDS THROUGH THE ADMINISTRATION’S
RESIDENTIAL ENERGY EQUITY PROGRAM;
– 103 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(25) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, TO PROVIDE $5,000,000 IN
EACH FISCAL YEAR TO THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES’ POWER PLANT
RESEARCH PROGRAM;
(26) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, $9,000,000 TO PROVIDE
GRANTS OR REBATES TO INCENTIVIZE CUSTOMERS TO INSTALL RENEWABLE
ON–SITE GENERATING SYSTEMS UNDER § 7–1006 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES
ARTICLE;
(27) TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR CLEAN ENERGY AND EFFICIENCY
PROGRAMS FOR BUILDINGS, INCLUDING LOW–INCOME HOUSEHOLD ENERGY
EFFICIENCY AND SCHOOL ELECTRIFICATION;
(28) TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR TRANSPORTATION–RELATED
EMISSIONS REDUCTION PROGRAMS, INCLUDING ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING
INFRASTRUCTURE AND ELECTRIC SCHOOL BUS DEPLOYMENT;
(29) TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR ELECTRIC SYSTEM RESILIENCY
PROGRAMS, INCLUDING MICROGRID INSTALLATION AND RESILIENCY HUBS;
(30) FOR ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES OF THE MARYLAND CLEAN
ENERGY CENTER; AND
(31) to pay the expenses of the Program.
(f–1) (1) Any funding provided under subsection (f)(9) of this section that is not
spent in a given fiscal year shall revert to the Fund in the following fiscal year.
(2) The Administration may provide additional funding for the purposes
stated in subsection (f)(9) of this section.
(f–2) Of the funds transferred to the Maryland Energy Innovation Fund under
subsection (f)(10) of this section:
(1) at least $1,200,000 may be used to fund the Maryland Clean Energy
Center established under § 10–806 of the Economic Development Article; and
(2) at least $900,000 may be used to fund the Maryland Energy Innovation
Institute established under § 10–829 of the Economic Development Article.
(g) Proceeds received by the Fund from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g) of
the Environment Article shall be allocated as follows:
– 104 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(1) at least 50% shall be credited to an energy assistance account to be used
for [the Electric Universal Service Program and other] electricity AND FUEL assistance
programs in the Department of Human Services;
(2) at least 20% shall be credited to a low and moderate income efficiency
and conservation programs account and to a general efficiency and conservation programs
account for energy efficiency and conservation programs, projects, or activities and demand
response programs, of which at least one–half shall be targeted to the low and moderate
income efficiency and conservation programs account for:
(i) the low–income residential sector at no cost to the participants of
the programs, projects, or activities; and
(ii) the moderate–income residential sector;
(3) at least 20% shall be credited to a renewable and clean energy programs
account for:
(i) renewable and clean energy programs and initiatives;
(ii) energy–related public education and outreach; and
(iii) climate change and resiliency programs; and
(4) up to 10%, but not more than $7,500,000, shall be credited to an
administrative expense account for costs related to the administration of the Fund, including
the review of electric company plans for achieving electricity savings and demand reductions
that the electric companies are required under law to submit to the Administration.
(g–1) [Proceeds] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (I–2) OF THIS SECTION,
PROCEEDS received by the Fund from compliance fees under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public
Utilities Article shall be allocated as follows:
(1) beginning in fiscal year 2025, at least 20% of the proceeds shall be used
to provide grants to support the installation of new solar energy generating systems under
the Customer–Sited Solar Program;
(2) up to 10% of the proceeds shall be credited to an administrative expense
account for costs related to the administration of the Fund;
(3) proceeds collected but unused from a previous year shall be used before
proceeds allocated for the current year; and
(4) the Administration shall reallocate to other authorized uses any
proceeds that are not used within 3 fiscal years after collection.
– 105 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(h) (1) Energy efficiency and conservation programs under subsection (g)(2) of
this section include:
(i) low–income energy efficiency programs;
(ii) residential and small business energy efficiency programs;
(iii) commercial and industrial energy efficiency programs;
(iv) State and local energy efficiency programs;
(v) demand response programs;
(vi) loan programs and alternative financing mechanisms; and
(vii) grants to training funds and other organizations supporting job
training for deployment of energy efficiency and energy conservation technology and
equipment.
(2) Energy–related public education and outreach and renewable and clean
energy programs and initiatives under subsection (g)(3)(i) and (ii) of this section include:
(i) production incentives for specified renewable energy sources;
(ii) expansion of existing grant programs for solar, geothermal, and
wind programs;
(iii) loan programs and alternative financing mechanisms; and
(iv) consumer education and outreach programs that are designed to
reach low–income communities.
(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of this subsection AND
SUBSECTION (I–2) OF THIS SECTION, compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b) of the Public
Utilities Article may be used only to make loans and grants to support the creation of new
Tier 1 renewable energy sources in the State that are owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
or
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article.
(2) [Compliance] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (I–2) OF THIS
SECTION, COMPLIANCE fees paid under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities Article
– 106 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
shall be accounted for separately within the Fund and may be used only to make loans and
grants to support the creation of new solar energy sources in the State that are owned by or
directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article; or
(iii) households with low to moderate income, as defined in § 9–2016
of this title.
(3) For fiscal year 2026 only, up to $100,000,000 of compliance fees paid
under §§ 7–705(b) and 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities Article shall be accounted for
separately within the Fund and may be used for solar development on State government
property and local government clean energy projects.
(4) (i) Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this paragraph,
compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article may be used to provide
grants to electric companies to be refunded or credited to each residential distribution
customer based on the customer’s consumption of electricity supply that is subject to the
renewable energy portfolio standard.
(ii) The refunding or crediting of amounts to residential distribution
customers shall be identified on the customer’s bill as a line item identified as a “legislative
energy relief refund”.
(iii) An electric company awarded a grant under this paragraph:
1. may not retain any of the grant funds to cover overhead
expenses; and
2. shall provide all of the grant funds to residential
distribution customers.
(iv) The process under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph
related to the refunding or crediting of amounts to residential distribution customers shall
be directed and overseen by the Commission.
(i–1) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Area median income” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the
Housing and Community Development Article.
– 107 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) “Low and moderate income” means having an annual household
income that is at or below 120% of the area median income.
(2) [Compliance] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (I–2) OF THIS
SECTION, COMPLIANCE fees paid under § 7–705(b–1) of the Public Utilities Article shall be
accounted for separately within the Fund and may be used only to make loans and grants
to promote increased opportunities for the growth and development of small, minority,
women–owned, and veteran–owned businesses in the State that install geothermal systems
in the State.
(I–2) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028, $100,000,000 OF COMPLIANCE FEES
PAID UNDER § 7–705 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE AND DEPOSITED INTO THE
FUND IN EACH FISCAL YEAR MAY BE USED TO PROVIDE GRANTS FOR RENEWABLE
ENERGY PROJECTS UNDER § 9–20E–02 OF THIS TITLE, INCLUDING ANY ASSOCIATED
ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES.
(j) (1) The Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same manner
as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be paid into the Fund.
(3) Any repayment of principal and interest on loans made from the Fund
shall be paid into the Fund.
(4) Balances in the Fund shall be held for the benefit of the Program, shall
be expended solely for the purposes of the Program, and may not be used for the general
obligations of government.
(k) Expenditures from the Fund shall be made by:
(1) an appropriation in the annual State budget; or
(2) a budget amendment in accordance with § 7–209 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article.
(l) An expenditure by budget amendment may be made under subsection (k) of this
section only after:
(1) the Administration has submitted the proposed budget amendment and
supporting documentation to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, Senate
COMMITTEE ON Education, Energy, and the Environment [Committee], House
Appropriations Committee, and House [Economic Matters] ENVIRONMENT AND
TRANSPORTATION Committee; and
(2) the committees have had 45 days for review and comment.
– 108 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(m) (1) A loan or grant made available from the Fund to a unit of State or local
government shall comply with §§ 14–416 and 17–303 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
(2) At least 80% of workers participating in a project or program that
receives money from the Fund must reside within 50 miles of the project or program, or
another distance defined by the local jurisdiction where the project or program is located.
SUBTITLE 20E. ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE AUCTIONS.
9–20E–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ADMINISTRATION” MEANS THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION.
(C) “ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE” MEANS A FEE PAID IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 7–705 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE TO THE MARYLAND STRATEGIC
ENERGY INVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THIS TITLE.
(D) “AUCTION” MEANS AN ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE AUCTION.
(E) “CAPACITY TARGET” MEANS THE LESSER OF:
(1) THE CALCULATION OF THE AMOUNT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY
GENERATION NEEDED IN A GIVEN YEAR TO SATISFY THE RENEWABLE ENERGY
PORTFOLIO STANDARD UNDER § 7–703 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE FOR A
SPECIFIC YEAR, MINUS THE AMOUNT ALREADY PROCURED FROM OTHER SOURCES;
OR
(2) THE AMOUNT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY THAT CAN BE PROCURED
USING ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEES AVAILABLE FOR THE AUCTION.
(F) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION.
(G) “RENEWABLE ENERGY” MEANS:
(1) ENERGY GENERATED FROM:
(I) A TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCE THAT DOES NOT PARTICIPATE
IN NET ENERGY METERING UNDER § 7–306, § 7–306.2, § 7–306.3, OR § 7–306.4 OF
THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE;
– 109 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) A TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCE THAT:
1. MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH; AND
2. INCLUDES A CO–LOCATED ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE;
OR
(III) AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE THAT IS PLANNED TO BE
CO–LOCATED WITH A TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCE; OR
(2) ENERGY FROM AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE THAT IS NOT
PLANNED TO BE CO–LOCATED WITH A TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCE.
(H) “TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–701 OF
THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
9–20E–02.
(A) FOR 2027 AND 2028, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL CONDUCT, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION, AN ANNUAL, COMPETITIVE, ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE FEE AUCTION TO AWARD GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE BIDDERS TO OFFSET A
PORTION OF PROJECT COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE DEVELOPMENT OF RENEWABLE
ENERGY IN THE STATE USING REVENUE FROM ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEES.
(B) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
COMMISSION, SHALL DEVELOP AND CONDUCT THE AUCTIONS IN A MANNER THAT IS
COST–EFFECTIVE AND MAINTAINS AND PROMOTES THE DEVELOPMENT OF
RENEWABLE ENERGY IN THE STATE.
(2) THE COMPETITIVE AUCTION PROCESS MAY REQUIRE THE
ADMINISTRATION TO SOLICIT A SERIES OF BIDS FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY
PROJECT DEVELOPERS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECTS
IN A COST–EFFECTIVE MANNER.
(C) (1) TO BE ELIGIBLE TO SUBMIT A BID UNDER THIS SECTION, A PERSON
MUST:
(I) BE A RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECT DEVELOPER; AND
(II) MEET THE MINIMUM CREDIT AND OTHER ELIGIBILITY
REQUIREMENTS SET UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
– 110 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
COMMISSION, SHALL SET ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR BIDDERS, INCLUDING
REQUIRING EACH BIDDER TO:
(I) PROVIDE PROOF OF FINANCIAL INTEGRITY;
(II) POST A BOND OR OTHER SIMILAR INSTRUMENT;
(III) AGREE TO BE SUBJECT TO ALL APPLICABLE TAXES AND
FEES;
(IV) DEMONSTRATE THE ABILITY TO FINANCE, EXECUTE, AND
COMMISSION PROJECTS;
(V) PROVIDE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, EVIDENCE THAT IS SATISFACTORY TO THE ADMINISTRATION THAT
AWARDED FUNDS ARE NECESSARY FOR THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECT TO BE
CONSTRUCTED; AND
(VI) COMPLY WITH ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS THE
ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES ARE IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST.
(3) THE EVIDENCE PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(V) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE ADMINISTRATION AND MAINTAINED BY
THE ADMINISTRATION IN A MANNER THAT KEEPS THE EVIDENCE CONFIDENTIAL.
(D) (1) ELIGIBLE BIDDERS SHALL SUBMIT COMPETITIVE BIDS BY
SPECIFYING:
(I) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT OF MEGAWATTS TO BE GENERATED BY
THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECT;
(II) A PRICE PER MEGAWATT THAT WOULD BE REQUIRED FROM
THE AUCTION; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE ADMINISTRATION
DETERMINES IS NECESSARY.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL RANK BIDS FROM LOWEST TO HIGHEST COST PER
MEGAWATT AND AWARD FUNDS DERIVED FROM ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEES TO
THE LOWEST BID OR BIDS.
– 111 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PRIORITIZE BIDS FOR
RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECTS SPECIFIED IN § 9–20E–01(G)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL AWARD BIDS UNTIL THE CAPACITY TARGET IS REACHED.
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REFUSE TO ACCEPT SOME OR
ALL OF THE BIDS MADE IN A COMPETITIVE AUCTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(4) (I) IF THE CAPACITY TARGET CAN BE MET AT A COST BELOW THE
ALLOCATED FUNDING, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY:
1. CARRY FORWARD ANY FUNDING TO THE NEXT
AUCTION, IF APPLICABLE; OR
2. APPLY THE FUNDS FOR ANY ADDITIONAL MEGAWATTS
OF RENEWABLE ENERGY THAT HAVE BEEN OFFERED UNDER THE AUCTION.
(II) ANY AMOUNT OF ALLOCATED FUNDING THAT IS NOT
CARRIED FORWARD OR APPLIED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
SHALL ACCRUE IN THE MARYLAND STRATEGIC ENERGY INVESTMENT FUND AND
MAY BE ALLOCATED FOR ANY PURPOSE FOR WHICH ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE
REVENUE IS AUTHORIZED TO BE USED.
(E) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL SET DELIVERY DEADLINES FOR
EACH RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECT THAT IS AWARDED FUNDING FROM AN
AUCTION.
(2) THE DEADLINES SET IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL INCLUDE MILESTONES THAT REQUIRE THE DEVELOPER TO MEET CERTAIN
DELIVERY GOALS DURING THE DEVELOPMENT OF A RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECT.
(3) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY GRANT EXTENSIONS FOR DELIVERY
GOALS THAT ARE DELAYED DUE TO INTERCONNECTION OR PERMITTING
CHALLENGES OR DELAYS IF THE DEVELOPER PROVIDES DOCUMENTATION OF THE
CHALLENGE OR DELAY.
(4) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH A METHOD OF
COLLECTION AGAINST ANY DEVELOPER AWARDED A GRANT UNDER THIS SECTION TO
RECAPTURE ANY FUNDS RECEIVED AS A RESULT OF:
(I) MISAPPROPRIATION, OVERPAYMENT, OR FRAUD; OR
– 112 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(II) FAILURE TO MEET MILESTONES OR DELIVERY DATES.
(F) WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER ALL GRANTS FOR RENEWABLE ENERGY
PROJECTS ARE EXECUTED, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PUBLICLY DISCLOSE THE
NAMES OF EACH SUCCESSFUL BIDDER AND THE MEGAWATTS TO BE DELIVERED BY
THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECT.
(G) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND JULY 1, 2028, THE ADMINISTRATION,
IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION, SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, ON THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING AUCTION, INCLUDING:
(1) THE AMOUNT OF MEGAWATTS OR MEGAWATT–HOURS, AS
APPLICABLE, THAT RECEIVED FINANCIAL SUPPORT THROUGH THE AUCTION;
(2) THE COST PER MEGAWATT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY ALLOCATED IN
THE AUCTION;
(3) THE NUMBER OF RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS PROJECTED TO BE
CREATED AS A RESULT OF THE AUCTION; AND
(4) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE
COMMISSION CONSIDER RELEVANT.
Chapter 7 of the Acts of the 2025 Special Session
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) The Public Service Commission shall study the effectiveness of an
independent distribution operator.
(2) On or before December 31, [2026] 2027, the Public Service Commission
shall submit to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, a report on the study required under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(b) (1) The Department of Transportation shall study methods for reducing
transmission–constrained areas through the use of existing rights–of–way.
(2) On or before December 31, [2026] 2027, the Department of
Transportation shall submit to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, a report on the study required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection.
– 113 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) (i) The Maryland Energy Administration shall obtain existing power
flow analyses for electric system reliability in the State that are related to currently known
electric generation facility retirements.
(ii) If the Maryland Energy Administration is unable to obtain the
existing power flow analyses under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, then the
Administration, with the support of the Public Service Commission, shall develop a power
flow analysis for electric system reliability in the State that is related to currently known
electric generation facility retirements.
(iii) On or before January 1, [2026] 2027, the Maryland Energy
Administration shall submit to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly a report on the power flow analyses required
under this paragraph.
(2) (i) On or before [December 31, 2025, and on or before] December 31,
2026, the Maryland Energy Administration shall provide to the General Assembly, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, an update on the status of the
National Renewable Energy Laboratory’s analysis on resource adequacy conducted at the
request of the Administration.
(ii) On receipt of the National Renewable Energy Laboratory’s final
analysis on resource adequacy, the Maryland Energy Administration shall submit a final
report on the analysis to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
Chapter 19 of the Acts of the 2025 Special Session
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) The Public Service Commission shall study the effectiveness of an
independent distribution operator.
(2) On or before December 31, [2026] 2027, the Public Service Commission
shall submit to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, a report on the study required under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(b) (1) The Department of Transportation shall study methods for reducing
transmission–constrained areas through the use of existing rights–of–way.
(2) On or before December 31, [2026] 2027, the Department of
Transportation shall submit to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, a report on the study required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection.
– 114 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(c) (1) (i) The Maryland Energy Administration shall obtain existing power
flow analyses for electric system reliability in the State that are related to currently known
electric generation facility retirements.
(ii) If the Maryland Energy Administration is unable to obtain the
existing power flow analyses under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, then the
Administration, with the support of the Public Service Commission, shall develop a power
flow analysis for electric system reliability in the State that is related to currently known
electric generation facility retirements.
(iii) On or before January 1, [2026] 2027, the Maryland Energy
Administration shall submit to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly a report on the power flow analyses required
under this paragraph.
(2) (i) On or before [December 31, 2025, and on or before] December 31,
2026, the Maryland Energy Administration shall provide to the General Assembly, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, an update on the status of the
National Renewable Energy Laboratory’s analysis on resource adequacy conducted at the
request of the Administration.
(ii) On receipt of the National Renewable Energy Laboratory’s final
analysis on resource adequacy, the Maryland Energy Administration shall submit a final
report on the analysis to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
4–213.
(a) This section applies only to a public service company that is an electric
company, a gas company, or a combination gas and electric company.
(b) Unless otherwise authorized by law, the Commission may approve the use of a
multiyear rate plan for distribution base rates only if the plan:
(1) demonstrates the customer benefits of the investment; and
(2) does not allow for:
(I) the public service company to file for reconciliation of cost or
revenue variances of the approved revenue component used by the Commission to establish
– 115 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
just and reasonable rates IF THE RECONCILIATION WOULD RESULT IN ADDITIONAL
CHARGES TO CUSTOMERS; OR
(II) THE USE OF COST–SHARING MECHANISMS THAT WOULD
RESULT IN ADDITIONAL CHARGES TO CUSTOMERS ABOVE THE APPROVED REVENUE
COMPONENT USED BY THE COMMISSION TO ESTABLISH JUST AND REASONABLE
RATES.
(c) A public service company that files or has filed an application for a multiyear
rate plan may not subsequently file for reconciliation of cost or revenue variances [of] THAT
WOULD RESULT IN ADDITIONAL CHARGES TO CUSTOMERS DUE TO THE PUBLIC
SERVICE COMPANY SPENDING MORE THAN the approved revenue component used by the
Commission to establish the multiyear rates unless the filing for reconciliation was made on
or before January 1, 2025.
(D) FOR MULTIYEAR RATE PLANS APPROVED AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026, THE
COMMISSION MAY REQUIRE A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY TO INCLUDE A
RECONCILIATION PROCEDURE IN ITS MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN TO REFUND
CUSTOMERS THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN:
(1) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY’S APPROVED REVENUE
REQUIREMENT; AND
(2) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY’S ACTUAL REVENUE
REQUIREMENT DURING THE TERM OF THE MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN.
4–504.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “BONUS” MEANS A FORM OF DIRECT OR INDIRECT PAYMENT,
CONSIDERATION, OR COMPENSATION THAT IS PAID OR CONVEYED TO AN EMPLOYEE
OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY IN ADDITION TO THE EMPLOYEE’S BASE PAY.
(II) “BONUS” INCLUDES:
1. COMPENSATION THAT THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY
DOES NOT FORMALLY LABEL AS A BONUS PAYMENT;
2. ANY FORM OF INCENTIVE COMPENSATION THE FACT
AND AMOUNT OF WHICH IS UNDER THE DISCRETION OF THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY UNTIL A TIME CLOSE TO THE END OF THE PERIOD FOR WHICH THE
INCENTIVE PAYMENT IS PAID; AND
– 116 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
3. PAYMENTS GIVEN IN ADDITION TO BASE PAY THAT ARE
CONTINGENT ON THE OCCURRENCE OF ONE OR MORE EVENTS OR CONDITIONS.
(3) (I) “COMPENSATION” MEANS A FORM OF PAYMENT OR
CONSIDERATION CONVEYED TO OR FOR THE BENEFIT OF AN EMPLOYEE OF A PUBLIC
SERVICE COMPANY, THE PARENT COMPANY OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY, OR ANY
OTHER AFFILIATE OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY IN CONNECTION WITH THE
EMPLOYEE’S WORK FOR A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY.
(II) “COMPENSATION” INCLUDES:
1. DIRECT AND INDIRECT METHODS OF CONFERRING
BENEFITS;
2. CASH AND NONCASH BENEFITS;
3. SALARY, BONUSES, PERIOD PAYMENTS, AND
SEVERANCE PAY; AND
4. THE VALUE OF A PERQUISITE, COMPENSATORY OR
PAID LEAVE, OR OTHER BENEFIT NOT EXCLUDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH.
(III) “COMPENSATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY EXPENDITURE
OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY FOR HEALTH, MEDICAL, DENTAL, VISION, OR LIFE
INSURANCE OR DISABILITY PAY.
(4) “SUPERVISOR” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE OF A PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY, THE PARENT COMPANY OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY, OR ANY OTHER
AFFILIATE OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY WHO:
(I) USING THE EMPLOYEE’S INDEPENDENT JUDGMENT:
1. IS AUTHORIZED BY THE EMPLOYEE’S EMPLOYER TO
HIRE, TRANSFER, SUSPEND, LAY OFF, RECALL, PROMOTE, DISCHARGE, ASSIGN,
REWARD, OR DISCIPLINE OTHER EMPLOYEES;
2. IS RESPONSIBLE FOR DIRECTING THE WORK
PERFORMANCE OF OTHER EMPLOYEES; AND
3. IS RESPONSIBLE FOR RESPONDING TO EMPLOYEE
COMPLAINTS; OR
– 117 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) IS EMPLOYED IN A BONA FIDE EXECUTIVE CAPACITY UNDER
THE FEDERAL FAIR LABOR STANDARDS ACT.
(B) This section applies only to a public service company that is an investor–owned
electric company, gas company, or combination gas and electric company.
[(b)] (C) A public service company may not recover through rates any costs
associated with:
(1) membership, dues, sponsorships, or contributions to an industry trade
association, group, or related entity exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(6) of the Internal
Revenue Code; [or]
(2) the acquisition, use, or allocation of costs associated with a private plane
that is owned or leased by the public service company or its holding company; OR
(3) COMPENSATION FOR A SUPERVISOR THAT EXCEEDS 110% OF THE
MAXIMUM ANNUAL SALARY PAYABLE TO THE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION FOR THE
SAME CALENDAR YEAR.
(D) (1) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF EACH PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY
SHALL ADOPT A COMPANY–WIDE POLICY PLACING REASONABLE COST LIMITATIONS
ON EXPENDITURES THAT THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY INTENDS TO RECOVER
THROUGH RATES FOR:
(I) ENTERTAINMENT AND EVENTS;
(II) OFFICE AND FACILITY RENOVATIONS;
(III) TRANSPORTATION SERVICES, INCLUDING AVIATION;
(IV) STAFF DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITIES OR EVENTS;
(V) PERFORMANCE INCENTIVES; AND
(VI) OTHER ACTIVITIES OUTSIDE THE SCOPE OF THE NORMAL
COURSE OF BUSINESS OPERATIONS.
(2) EACH PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY SHALL SEND A COPY OF THE
POLICY ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE
COMMISSION:
(I) AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE; AND
– 118 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(II) EACH TIME THE POLICY IS UPDATED, BUT NOT LESS THAN
ONCE EVERY 5 YEARS.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY REVIEW IN A BASE RATE PROCEEDING THE
REASONABLENESS OF THE COST LIMITATIONS IN A POLICY ADOPTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
7–306.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Biomass” means “qualified biomass” as defined in § 7–701 of this title.
(3) “Closed conduit hydro” means a hydroelectric generating facility that:
(i) generates electricity within existing piping or limited adjacent
piping of a potable water supply system;
(ii) is owned or operated by a municipal corporation or public water
authority; and
(iii) is designed to produce less energy than is consumed to operate the
water supply system.
(4) “COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 7–306.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(5) “COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM PROGRAM”
MEANS A PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY AN ELECTRIC COMPANY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 7–306.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(4)] (6) “Eligible customer–generator” means a customer that owns and
operates, leases and operates, or contracts with a third party that owns and operates a
biomass, micro combined heat and power, solar, fuel cell, wind, or closed conduit hydro
electric generating facility that:
(i) is located on the customer’s premises or contiguous property;
(ii) is interconnected and operated in parallel with an electric
company’s transmission and distribution facilities; and
(iii) is intended primarily to offset all or part of the customer’s own
electricity requirements.
[(5)] (7) “Fuel cell” means an electric generating facility that:
– 119 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) includes integrated power plant systems containing a stack,
tubular array, or other functionally similar configuration used to electrochemically convert
fuel to electric energy; and
(ii) may include:
1. an inverter and fuel processing system; and
2. other plant equipment to support the plant’s operation or
its energy conversion, including heat recovery equipment.
[(6)] (8) “Micro combined heat and power” means the simultaneous or
sequential production of useful thermal energy and electrical or mechanical power not
exceeding 30 kilowatts.
[(7)] (9) “Net energy metering” means measurement of the difference
between the electricity that is supplied by an electric company and the electricity that is
generated by an eligible customer–generator and fed back to the electric grid over the eligible
customer–generator’s billing period.
[(8)] (10) “Net excess generation” means the amount of the electricity
generated by an eligible customer–generator that is in excess of the electricity consumed by
the eligible customer–generator and that results in a negative kilowatt–hour reading at the
end of the eligible customer–generator’s billing cycle.
(11) (I) “REPOWERED” MEANS A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM OWNED BY AN ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR OR A COMMUNITY SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT, THROUGH A SINGLE ACTION OR A SERIES OF
ACTIONS, HAS HAD REPLACED MORE THAN 80% OF THE DIRECT CURRENT
NAMEPLATE CAPACITY OF THE PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULES AT THE SYSTEM AS OF THE
DATE THE SYSTEM WAS ORIGINALLY PLACED IN SERVICE UNDER THIS SECTION.
(II) “REPOWERED” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. ROUTINE EQUIPMENT REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE,
INCLUDING THE REPLACEMENT OF EQUIPMENT DURING ROUTINE REPAIR AND
MAINTENANCE WITH EQUIPMENT THAT HAS SIMILAR OR IMPROVED RATINGS,
IMPEDANCES, EFFICIENCIES, OR CAPABILITIES;
2. ROOF REPLACEMENT OR OTHER PROJECT SITE
MAINTENANCE;
3. THE REMEDIATION OF EQUIPMENT DEFECTS;
– 120 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
4. THE REMEDIATION OF DAMAGE CAUSED BY A NATURAL
DISASTER, AN ACT OF GOD, FIRE, VANDALISM, THEFT, OR ANOTHER CASUALTY
EVENT; OR
5. REPLACEMENTS REQUIRED BY A GOVERNMENTAL
AUTHORITY OR ELECTRIC COMPANY.
(d) (1) The Commission shall require electric utilities to develop a standard
contract or tariff for net energy metering and make it available to eligible
customer–generators on a first–come, first–served basis until THE EARLIER OF:
(I) THE DATE ON WHICH the rated generating capacity owned and
operated by eligible customer–generators in the State reaches 3,000 megawatts; OR
(II) JULY 1, 2027.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE
3,000–MEGAWATT LIMIT IN PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION HAS NOT BEEN
MET, A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT IS PLACED IN
SERVICE AFTER JULY 1, 2027, SHALL BE ELIGIBLE FOR NET ENERGY METERING
UNDER THIS SECTION IF:
(I) THE SYSTEM:
1. ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, RECEIVED A
COMMUNITY SOLAR PROGRAM QUEUE POSITION UNDER § 7–306.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE
AND PAID A DEPOSIT TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY EQUAL TO AT LEAST 50% OF THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY’S ESTIMATE OF ALL NECESSARY INTERCONNECTION FEES; AND
2. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IS PLACED IN SERVICE ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2030; AND
(II) THE ELECTRIC COMPANY IN WHOSE SERVICE TERRITORY
THE COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM IS LOCATED HAS NOT MET
THE NET ENERGY METERING CAPACITY LIMIT UNDER PARAGRAPH (3)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, FOR AN ELECTRIC COMPANY WITH A 2025 ANNUAL PEAK DEMAND OF
2,500 MEGAWATTS OR LESS, THE NET ENERGY METERING CAPACITY LIMIT FOR
COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS THAT ARE PLACED IN SERVICE
IN THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY ON OR AFTER APRIL 1, 2026,
SHALL BE 150% OF THE TOTAL COMBINED RATED GENERATING CAPACITY OF
– 121 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS THAT HAD NOT BEEN PLACED IN
SERVICE BUT HOLD QUEUE POSITIONS IN A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM PROGRAM IN THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY
ON APRIL 1, 2026.
(II) IF THE 150% NET ENERGY METERING CAPACITY LIMIT
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IN AN ELECTRIC
COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY IS REACHED, THE ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL:
1. CLOSE THE NET ENERGY METERING CONTRACT OR
TARIFF UNDER THIS SECTION TO ANY COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEMS THAT DO NOT ALREADY HOLD QUEUE POSITIONS; AND
2. NOTIFY THE COMMISSION.
(III) A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
HOLDING A QUEUE POSITION IN A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
PROGRAM IN THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY THAT IS PLACED IN
SERVICE ON OR AFTER APRIL 1, 2026, SHALL CONTINUE TO COUNT TOWARD THE
150% NET ENERGY METERING CAPACITY LIMIT ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(4) (I) IF THE COMMISSION DOES NOT IMPLEMENT A SUCCESSOR
PROGRAM UNDER § 7–306.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE BY JULY 1, 2027, A COMMUNITY
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT HAS NOT BEEN PLACED IN SERVICE BY
JULY 1, 2027, BUT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (2)(I)1 AND (II) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE ELIGIBLE FOR NET ENERGY METERING UNDER THIS
SECTION IF IT IS PLACED IN SERVICE ON OR BEFORE 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THAT
THE SUCCESSOR PROGRAM IS IMPLEMENTED.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY GRANT AN EXTENSION TO THE
DEADLINES UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH IF THE COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM WAS
UNABLE TO MEET THE DEADLINE, INCLUDING INABILITY TO MEET THE DEADLINE
DUE TO ANY OF THE FOLLOWING REASONS:
1. A FORCE MAJEURE EVENT, AS DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION;
2. FAILURE BY A GOVERNMENT OR MUNICIPAL
AUTHORITY TO TIMELY COMPLETE AN ACTION NECESSARY TO AUTHORIZE OR
ENABLE ANY PORTION OF THE PROJECT CONSTRUCTION;
– 122 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
3. FAILURE OF AN ELECTRIC COMPANY TO COMPLY WITH
A COMMISSION ORDER, REGULATION, STATUTE, OR TARIFF; OR
4. THE SYSTEM IS READY TO BE PLACED IN SERVICE AND
IS WAITING ONLY ON THE ELECTRIC COMPANY TO GRANT THE SYSTEM PERMISSION
TO OPERATE.
(5) AN ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR THAT, ON JULY 1, 2027, IS
UNDER A NET ENERGY METERING CONTRACT OR TARIFF UNDER THIS SECTION OR A
COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS
OF PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL REMAIN ELIGIBLE FOR NET ENERGY
METERING UNDER THIS SECTION UNTIL THE EARLIER OF WHEN:
(I) THE SYSTEM IS DECOMMISSIONED IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
7–218(G) OF THIS TITLE;
(II) THE SYSTEM IS MODIFIED TO INCREASE:
1. THE NET POWER FLOW INJECTION INTO THE
ELECTRIC SYSTEM DUE TO THE ADDITION OF MORE PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULES THAN
WERE PRESENT AS OF THE DATE THE SYSTEM WAS ORIGINALLY PLACED IN SERVICE
UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
2. THE ALTERNATING CURRENT OUTPUT CAPACITY TO
BE MORE THAN WHEN THE SYSTEM WAS ORIGINALLY PLACED INTO SERVICE UNDER
THIS SECTION;
(III) THE SYSTEM ENTERS INTO A NEW INTERCONNECTION
AGREEMENT; OR
(IV) THE SYSTEM IS REPOWERED.
(j) On or before November 1 of each year, the Commission shall report to the
General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the
status of the net ENERGY metering program under this section AND § 7–306.4 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, including:
(1) the amount of capacity of electric generating facilities owned and
operated by eligible customer–generators in the State by type of energy resource;
(2) based on the need to encourage a diversification of the State’s energy
resource mix to ensure reliability, whether the rated generating capacity limit in subsection
(d) of this section should be altered; [and]
– 123 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) THE STATUS OF THE IMPLEMENTATION AND EFFICACY OF THE
SUCCESSOR PROGRAM DEVELOPED AND IMPLEMENTED UNDER § 7–306.4 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(4) other pertinent information.
7–306.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) “NET ENERGY METERING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–306
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO TRANSITION TO A NET
ENERGY METERING PROGRAM THAT:
(1) INCREASES BENEFITS TO RATEPAYERS BY LOWERING ELECTRIC
SYSTEM COSTS THROUGH THE USE OF FLEXIBLE CUSTOMER–SITED RENEWABLE
ENERGY RESOURCES;
(2) PROVIDES FAIR COMPENSATION TO ELIGIBLE
CUSTOMER–GENERATORS;
(3) IS DESIGNED TO MAKE PROGRESS TOWARD MEETING THE STATE’S
DEMAND–SIDE, ENERGY STORAGE, AND CLEAN ENERGY GOALS; AND
(4) PROVIDES INCENTIVES FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF DISTRIBUTED
GENERATION THAT ARE LESS THAN THE INCENTIVES PROVIDED BY THE NET ENERGY
METERING PROGRAM UNDER § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) ON OR BEFORE FEBRUARY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION, BY ORDER OR
REGULATION, SHALL APPROVE, AS A SUCCESSOR PROGRAM TO THE NET ENERGY
METERING PROGRAM UNDER § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A FRAMEWORK FOR A NET
ENERGY METERING PROGRAM TO BEGIN JULY 1, 2027, THAT:
(1) PROVIDES INCENTIVES FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF DISTRIBUTED
GENERATION TO ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATORS UNDER §§ 7–306 AND 7–306.3
OF THIS SUBTITLE AND COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS UNDER §
7–306.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
– 124 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(2) MINIMIZES RATEPAYER COSTS IN THE SHORT TERM AND IN THE
LONG TERM; AND
(3) BALANCES, ON A STATEWIDE BASIS AND ACROSS TECHNOLOGIES
AND INDUSTRY SECTORS PARTICIPATING IN NET ENERGY METERING:
(I) 1. FAIR COMPENSATION FOR ENERGY EXPORTS; AND
2. THE BENEFITS OF AN ELIGIBLE
CUSTOMER–GENERATOR’S OR FACILITY’S REDUCED LOAD ON THE ELECTRIC
TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM; AGAINST
(II) 1. THE NEEDS OF THE TRANSMISSION AND
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM;
2. RATEPAYER COSTS AND BENEFITS; AND
3. POTENTIAL IMPACTS ON CUSTOMERS, INCLUDING
LOW– AND MODERATE–INCOME CUSTOMERS, WHO DO NOT PARTICIPATE IN THE NET
ENERGY METERING PROGRAM RESULTING FROM ELIGIBLE
CUSTOMER–GENERATORS’ REDUCED CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL PRIORITIZE THE REVIEW AND APPROVAL OF
APPLICATIONS FROM A PROSPECTIVE ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR FOR
PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM IMPLEMENTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION IF, AT THE TIME THE PROGRAM WAS IMPLEMENTED, THE PROSPECTIVE
ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR WAS IN THE APPLICABLE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S
INTERCONNECTION QUEUE FOR THE NET ENERGY METERING PROGRAM UNDER §
7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) THE PROGRAM IMPLEMENTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE AVAILABLE UNTIL THE COMBINED
TOTAL RATED GENERATING CAPACITY OWNED AND OPERATED UNDER THE NET
ENERGY METERING PROGRAM UNDER § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND THE NET
ENERGY METERING PROGRAM IMPLEMENTED UNDER THIS SECTION REACHES 6,000
MEGAWATTS.
7–505.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including subsection (d) of
this section, and subject to § 4–213 of this article, the Commission may regulate the regulated
services of an electric company through alternative forms of regulation.
– 125 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The Commission may adopt an alternative form of regulation under this
section if the Commission finds, after notice and hearing, that the alternative form of
regulation:
(i) protects consumers;
(ii) ensures the quality, availability, and reliability of regulated
electric services; and
(iii) is in the interest of the public, including shareholders of the
electric company.
(3) Alternative forms of regulation may include:
(i) price regulation, including price freezes or caps;
(ii) revenue regulation;
(iii) ranges of authorized return;
(iv) rate of return;
(v) categories of services; or
(vi) price–indexing.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
COMMISSION SHALL CONDUCT A PROCEEDING AND DETERMINE WHETHER
ALLOWING THE USE OF FORECAST TEST YEARS, HISTORIC TEST YEARS, OR A HYBRID
MODEL IS IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF AND PROTECTS RATEPAYERS.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE A REQUESTED RATE
INCREASE THAT IS BASED ON A FORECAST TEST YEAR IN A BASE RATE PROCEEDING
UNTIL THE LATER OF:
1. THE COMPLETION OF THE PROCEEDING UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; OR
2. APRIL 1, 2027.
(III) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE RESULTS OF THE PROCEEDING HELD UNDER
– 126 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, INCLUDING ANY COMMISSION
RECOMMENDATIONS FOR LEGISLATIVE ACTION.
7–1224.
(a) The Commission shall, by regulation or order, establish a competitive process
for the procurement of projects for the construction and deployment of front–of–the–meter
transmission energy storage devices in the State.
(b) (1) (i) On or before January 1, 2026, the Commission shall issue a
procurement solicitation for applications for projects for the construction and deployment of
front–of–the–meter transmission energy storage devices.
(ii) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE procurement solicitation shall be for [a maximum of] 800 megawatts of
cumulative energy storage capacity, as measured in effective nameplate capacity.
(III) THE PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION MAY EXCEED 800
MEGAWATTS OF CUMULATIVE ENERGY STORAGE CAPACITY, AS MEASURED IN
EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY, IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE
PROPOSALS ARE COST–EFFECTIVE AND ADEQUATELY SUPPORT THE GOALS
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING THE GOAL OF SECURING
AFFORDABLE, RELIABLE ELECTRICAL SERVICE FOR MARYLAND RESIDENTS.
(2) On or before October 1, 2026, the Commission shall issue a decision on
whether to approve one or more proposals in accordance with § 7–1226(c) of this subtitle.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
transmission energy storage devices procured in accordance with this subsection shall be
operational within 24 months after a project is selected by the Commission.
(ii) The Commission may extend the operating deadline under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for good cause shown.
(c) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the Commission shall issue a second
procurement solicitation for the procurement of projects for the construction and deployment
of front–of–the–meter transmission energy storage devices.
(2) (I) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE procurement solicitation shall be for [a maximum of] 800 megawatts of
cumulative energy storage capacity, as measured in effective nameplate capacity.
(II) THE PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION MAY EXCEED 800
MEGAWATTS OF CUMULATIVE ENERGY STORAGE CAPACITY, AS MEASURED IN
EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY, IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE
– 127 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
PROPOSALS ARE COST–EFFECTIVE AND ADEQUATELY SUPPORT THE GOALS
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING THE GOAL OF SECURING
AFFORDABLE, RELIABLE ELECTRICAL SERVICE FOR MARYLAND RESIDENTS.
(3) On or before October 1, 2027, the Commission shall issue a decision on
whether to approve one or more proposals in accordance with § 7–1226(c) of this subtitle.
(4) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
transmission energy storage devices procured in accordance with this subsection shall be
operational within 24 months after a project is selected by the Commission.
(ii) The Commission may extend the operating deadline under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for good cause shown.
7–1225.
(a) The Commission shall include specifications in a procurement solicitation
issued under § 7–1224 of this subtitle that require each proposal to:
(1) include a proposed pricing schedule for the transmission energy storage
project that:
(i) is for at least 15 years; and
(ii) represents the anticipated monthly wholesale value of capacity
per megawatt and other benefits identified in a cost–benefit analysis, but not including any
anticipated wholesale energy and ancillary services revenue;
(2) include a cost–benefit analysis of the project and proposed pricing
schedule comparison on a dollar–per–megawatt–hour basis, including an analysis of:
(i) the locational value and time to deployment of the energy storage
devices;
(ii) the value of long–duration storage, including its capacity
accreditation value for resource adequacy as measured in PJM Interconnection’s effective
load carrying capability class ratings;
(iii) avoided or delayed transmission, generation, and distribution
costs;
(iv) avoided emissions in the short term and projected avoided
emissions in the long term, measured using the social cost of carbon, as determined by the
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency as of January 1, 2025;
(v) the value of the rapid deployment of energy storage devices;
– 128 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(vi) the value of reliability during periods of electric system stress,
including the ability to deliver capacity during periods of extreme weather, fuel scarcity, and
large unplanned resource outages; and
(vii) any other avoided costs;
(3) ensure that the owner or operator of the project has the capability to
export electricity for sale on the wholesale market and bid into the PJM capacity market
under an agreement with PJM Interconnection;
(4) ensure that the energy storage devices can deliver their effective
nameplate capacity;
(5) incorporate a community benefit agreement;
(6) attest in writing that all contractors and subcontractors working on the
project have been in compliance with federal and State wage and hour laws for the
immediately preceding 3 years or the duration of the contractor’s or subcontractor’s business
operation, whichever is longer; and
(7) ensure a competitive bidding process, including by redacting proprietary
information provided to the Commission.
(b) An energy storage device shall be considered capable of delivering its effective
nameplate capacity under this section if:
(1) the energy storage device will have the capacity interconnection rights
with PJM Interconnection equal to its effective nameplate capacity; or
(2) (i) the energy storage device will have surplus interconnection service
with PJM Interconnection; and
(ii) the ability of the energy storage device to deliver its effective
nameplate capacity will be limited only by the generation of another nonenergy storage
generation resource with which the energy storage device shares a point of interconnection
to the electric transmission system.
(c) [Front–of–the–meter] PROJECTS THAT INCLUDE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING
DEVICES MAY BE INCLUDED IN A PROPOSAL IN RESPONSE TO A PROCUREMENT
SOLICITATION UNDER § 7–1224 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) FRONT–OF–THE–METER transmission energy storage devices paired
with Tier 1 or Tier 2 renewable sources, as defined under § 7–701 of this title[, may be
included in a proposal in response to a procurement solicitation under § 7–1224 of this
subtitle]; AND
– 129 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES:
(I) INTERCONNECTED TO A FACILITY WITHIN THE STATE; AND
(II) THAT HAVE BEEN ASSIGNED A PROJECT IDENTIFIER IN THE
PJM INTERCONNECTION PROCESS IN RESPONSE TO A REQUEST FOR NEW SERVICE.
Chapter 623 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Public Service Commission shall conduct a study on the feasibility of and
technical barriers to establishing:
(1) within the Commission a community solar automatic enrollment
program for local jurisdictions; AND
(2) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES,
AN AUTOMATIC COMMUNITY SOLAR ENROLLMENT PROCESS TO PROVIDE BILL
CREDITS FOR LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME SUBSCRIBERS THROUGH THE OFFICE OF
HOME ENERGY PROGRAMS IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(b) In conducting the study under subsection (a) of this section[,]:
(1) FOR AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROGRAM UNDER SUBSECTION
(A)(1) OF THIS SECTION, the PUBLIC SERVICE Commission shall consider:
[(1)] (I) how low– to moderate–income subscribers would be subscribed
under the program;
[(2)] (II) whether subscribers automatically enrolled in the program
should receive a bill credit;
[(3)] (III) how to ensure that local jurisdictions comply with all parameters
of the program; and
[(4)] (IV) any necessary notification requirements and consumer
protections that the program should have; AND
(2) FOR THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS UNDER SUBSECTION
(A)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, SHALL CONSIDER:
– 130 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(I) ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME
SUBSCRIBERS;
(II) OPT–OUT PROCEDURES FOR SUBSCRIBERS;
(III) THE AMOUNT OF BILL SAVINGS FOR LOW– TO
MODERATE–INCOME SUBSCRIBERS;
(IV) THE ROLE OF ANY OTHER STATE OR LOCAL AGENCY IN THE
AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS;
(V) THE AMOUNT OF ENERGY GENERATED BY A COMMUNITY
SOLAR PROJECT THAT SHOULD BE DEDICATED TO LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME
SUBSCRIBERS; AND
(VI) THE IMPACT TO RATEPAYERS THAT DO NOT PARTICIPATE IN
THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS.
(c) On or before [July 1, 2026,] JULY 1, 2027, the Public Service Commission
shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly on the results of the study.
Chapter 624 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Public Service Commission shall conduct a study on the feasibility of and
technical barriers to establishing:
(1) within the Commission a community solar automatic enrollment
program for local jurisdictions; AND
(2) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES,
AN AUTOMATIC COMMUNITY SOLAR ENROLLMENT PROCESS TO PROVIDE BILL
CREDITS FOR LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME SUBSCRIBERS THROUGH THE OFFICE OF
HOME ENERGY PROGRAMS IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(b) In conducting the study under subsection (a) of this section[,]:
(1) FOR AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROGRAM UNDER SUBSECTION
(A)(1) OF THIS SECTION, the PUBLIC SERVICE Commission shall consider:
[(1)] (I) how [low–to–moderate income] LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME
subscribers would be subscribed under the program;
– 131 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(2)] (II) whether subscribers automatically enrolled in the program
should receive a bill credit;
[(3)] (III) how to ensure that local jurisdictions comply with all parameters
of the program; and
[(4)] (IV) any necessary notification requirements and consumer
protections that the program should have; AND
(2) FOR THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS UNDER SUBSECTION
(A)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME
SUBSCRIBERS;
(II) OPT–OUT PROCEDURES FOR SUBSCRIBERS;
(III) THE AMOUNT OF BILL SAVINGS FOR LOW– TO
MODERATE–INCOME SUBSCRIBERS;
(IV) THE ROLE OF ANY OTHER STATE OR LOCAL AGENCY IN THE
AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS;
(V) THE AMOUNT OF ENERGY GENERATED BY A COMMUNITY
SOLAR PROJECT THAT SHOULD BE DEDICATED TO LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME
SUBSCRIBERS; AND
(VI) THE IMPACT TO RATEPAYERS THAT DO NOT PARTICIPATE IN
THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS.
(c) On or before [July 1, 2026,] JULY 1, 2027, the Public Service Commission
shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly on the results of the study.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – State Government
9–2016.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 132 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(2) “Eligible customer–generator” has the meaning stated in § 7–306 of the
Public Utilities Article.
(3) “Low to moderate income” means a household with an annual household
income at or below 150% of the average median income for the State.
(4) “Program” means the Customer–Sited Solar Program established in this
section.
(b) There is a Customer–Sited Solar Program in the Administration.
(e) The Program may provide grants to an income–verified eligible
customer–generator with a low to moderate income in an amount equal to $750 per kilowatt
of nameplate capacity for a solar energy generating system, up to a maximum of $7,500 per
system.
(f) A grant awarded under subsection (e) of this section shall be funded from [fees
collected under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities Article and allocated in accordance
with § 9–20B–05(g–1) of this title] THE MARYLAND STRATEGIC ENERGY INVESTMENT
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from the compliance fees paid into
the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund in accordance with § 7–705 of the Public
Utilities Article:
(1) $100,000,000 shall be used to provide grants for renewable energy
projects through the auction process established under § 9–20E–02 of the State Government
Article, as enacted by Section 4 of this Act;
(2) $100,000,000 shall be used to provide grants to electric companies,
including electric cooperatives, to pay down the costs incurred by the electric companies for
implementing and administering the programs and services under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part
II of the Public Utilities Article;
(3) $38,000,000 shall be used to offset residential electric customer costs
associated with the limited–income rate mechanism required under § 4–309 of the Public
Utilities Article;
(4) $150,000 shall be used to provide funding for a comprehensive study of
public school HVAC systems in Baltimore City;
(5) $9,850,000 shall be used to provide funding for upgrades to public school
HVAC systems in Baltimore City; and
– 133 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) $2,000,000 shall be used to provide additional funding for the Maryland
Energy Administration’s Residential and Commercial Energy Storage Grant Program.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from the proceeds paid into the
Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund in accordance with § 2–1002(g) of the
Environment Article, $9,000,000 shall be used for upgrades to public school HVAC systems
in Baltimore City.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from the funds in the Maryland
Strategic Energy Investment Fund:
(1) $3,000,000 shall be used to provide additional funding for the
Department of Natural Resources’ Power Plant Research Program to review renewable and
clean energy projects; and
(2) $72,650,000 shall be transferred to the Dedicated Purpose Account
established under § 7–310 of the State Finance and Procurement Article to provide
additional funding for the Maryland Energy Administration’s Residential Energy Equity
Program for heat pump installations and replacements for low– and moderate–income
households.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and subject to paragraph
(2) of this subsection, on or before June 30, 2027, the Governor may transfer:
(i) the funds described in subsection (a)(1) of this section to the
Maryland Energy Administration to be awarded as grants under § 9–20E–02 of the State
Government Article, as enacted by Section 4 of this Act;
(ii) the funds described in subsection (a)(2) of this section to the Public
Service Commission to be awarded as grants to electric companies, including electric
cooperatives, to pay down the costs incurred by the electric companies for implementing and
administering the programs and services under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public
Utilities Article;
(iii) the funds described in subsection (a)(3) of this section to the Public
Service Commission to be awarded as grants to electric companies to be refunded or credited
to residential electric customers to offset costs associated with the limited–income rate
mechanism required under § 4–309 of the Public Utilities Article;
(iv) the funds described in subsection (a)(4) of this section to the
Comptroller to be used to provide funding for a comprehensive study of public school HVAC
systems in Baltimore City;
– 134 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(v) the funds described in subsections (a)(5) and (b) of this section to
the Interagency Commission on School Construction to be used for upgrades to public school
HVAC systems in Baltimore City;
(vi) the funds described in subsection (a)(6) of this section to the
Maryland Energy Administration to be awarded as grants under the Residential and
Commercial Energy Storage Grant Program;
(vii) the funds described in subsection (c)(1) of this section to the
Department of Natural Resources to be used to review renewable and clean energy projects
through the Power Plant Research Program; and
(viii) the funds described in subsection (c)(2) of this section to the
Dedicated Purpose Account established under § 7–310 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article for the Maryland Energy Administration to use to provide heat pump installations
and replacements for low– and moderate–income households under the Residential Energy
Equity Program.
(2) The Governor may not include in the transfers authorized under
paragraph (1) of this subsection any funds in the Energy Assistance Account in the Maryland
Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the requirements established
under § 7–207(b)(3)(iv), as enacted under Section 4 of this Act, apply to an application for a
certificate of public convenience and necessity submitted on or after July 1, 2026, and may
not be construed to apply to a certificate of public convenience and necessity submitted before
July 1, 2026.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible customer–generator” has the meaning stated in § 7–306 of the
Public Utilities Article.
(3) “Net energy metering” has the meaning stated in § 7–306 of the Public
Utilities Article.
(b) (1) The Public Service Commission shall conduct a proceeding exploring the
development and implementation of a successor program to the net energy metering program
under § 7–306 of the Public Utilities Article.
(2) In conducting the proceeding, the Public Service Commission shall
accept input from:
(i) utility companies;
– 135 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) owners and developers of net metered projects, including projects
that are:
1. residential behind–the–meter;
2. commercial behind–the–meter; and
3. front–of–the–meter;
(iii) renewable energy industry experts, including representatives from
the solar energy industry;
(iv) consumer advocates; and
(v) other stakeholders.
(c) On or before December 15, 2026, the Public Service Commission shall submit
a report on the proceeding held under subsection (b) of this section to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(d) The report shall include:
(1) recommendations for a successor program to the net energy metering
program under § 7–306 of the Public Utilities Article that:
(i) provides incentives for the development of distributed generation
to eligible customer–generators under §§ 7–306 and 7–306.3 of the Public Utilities Article
and community solar energy generating systems under § 7–306.2 of the Public Utilities
Article, as enacted by Section 4 of this Act;
(ii) minimizes ratepayer costs in the short term and in the long term;
and
(iii) balances, on a statewide basis and across technologies and
industry sectors participating in net energy metering:
1. A. fair compensation for energy exports; and
B. the benefits of an eligible customer–generator’s or facility’s
reduced load on the electric transmission and distribution system; against
2. A. the needs of the transmission and distribution
system;
B. ratepayer costs and benefits; and
– 136 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
C. potential impacts on customers, including low– and
moderate–income customers, who do not participate in the net energy metering program
resulting from eligible customer–generators’ reduced contributions to the distribution
system;
(2) recommendations for any legislative changes necessary to implement the
successor program; and
(3) any administrative concerns with transitioning to the successor program
on July 1, 2027, and whether those concerns may cause a delay in implementation.
SECTION 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Public Service Commission, in
consultation with electric companies, work to resolve any administrative and technical
issues in order to provide rate relief to all residential electric customers, including residents
of apartments, condominiums, and other multi–occupancy residences, in accordance with
this section.
(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from the compliance fees
paid into the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund in accordance with § 7–705 of
the Public Utilities Article, $100,000,000 shall be used to provide grant awards to electric
companies to be refunded or credited to residential electric customers to offset any surcharges
imposed as a result of the operating costs of the programs and services under Title 7, Subtitle
2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article in calendar year 2027 in accordance with subsection
(c) of this section.
(2) The Governor may transfer by budget amendment the funds described
in paragraph (1) of this subsection to the Public Service Commission to be awarded to electric
companies.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the funds described in subsection (b)(1)
of this section shall be distributed:
(1) in accordance with § 9–20B–05(f)(4) of the State Government Article, as
enacted by Section 4 of this Act; and
(2) in equal monthly amounts during the calendar year 2027.
(d) (1) To the greatest extent practicable the Public Service Commission, in
consultation with each electric company that collects a surcharge under § 7–222(d) of the
Public Utilities Article, shall:
– 137 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) determine the commercial customers of each electric company that
use a master meter to allocate costs of retail electric service to the residents of apartments,
condominiums, and other multi–occupancy residences;
(ii) determine the estimated energy use by the commercial customers
identified under item (i) of this paragraph;
(iii) determine the number of multi–occupancy residential dwelling
units served by each master meter; and
(iv) provide the information specified in items (i) through (iii) of this
paragraph to the Commission in a spreadsheet format at a date determined by the
Commission.
(2) If the Public Service Commission is able to determine, with a reasonable
degree of certainty, the commercial customer information specified in paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Commission may require that a pro rata share of the funds described in
subsection (b)(1) of this section be provided as grants to electric companies to be refunded or
credited to commercial customers that use a master meter to allocate costs of retail electric
service to residents of apartment houses, condominiums, or other multi–occupancy
residences.
(3) A commercial customer that receives funding under this subsection:
(i) shall refund or credit each residential dwelling unit with its pro
rata share of the funding provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection;
(ii) may not provide a refund or credit to any person known to be
using electric service for a commercial purpose;
(iii) may retain up to 3% of the credited amount for administrative
expenses; and
(iv) if the commercial customer received the funding in error, shall
refund the funding to the electric company for redistribution.
(4) The Public Service Commission and each electric company shall be held
harmless for any failure by a commercial customer that receives funding under this
subsection to use the funding as required under paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(5) If the Public Service Commission is unable to determine, with a
reasonable degree of certainty, the commercial customer information specified in paragraph
(1) of this subsection or determines that providing funding to commercial customers in
accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection is not in the public interest, the
Commission, on or before December 1, 2026:
– 138 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(i) may direct electric companies to refund or credit only those
residential customers taking service under a residential tariff; and
(ii) shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, report to the General Assembly, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment, and the House Environment and Transportation Committee on the
reasoning for the Commission’s decision to direct electric companies to refund or credit
residential customers in accordance with item (i) of this paragraph.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2026, the Public Service Commission shall provide notice to the Senate Committee on
Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House Environment and Transportation
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, if the Commission
determines that the timelines set forth in § 7–233(c) of the Public Utilities Article, as enacted
by Section 4 of this Act, are insufficient for load forecasting.
SECTION 12. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before August 1, 2026,
the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House
Environment and Transportation Committee may jointly request that the Strategic Energy
Planning Office assess up to five policy scenarios and submit, on or before December 31,
2026, a report of the results of the requested policy scenarios to the Senate Committee on
Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House Environment and Transportation
Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 13. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Public Service Commission shall prepare recommendations for changes to
the next following program cycle under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public Utilities
Article.
(b) The recommendations prepared under subsection (a) of this section shall
address:
(1) the goals established for programs and services under Title 7, Subtitle
2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article, including the size and scope of the goals as applied
to each electric company;
(2) ways in which the programs and services required under Title 7, Subtitle
2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article should be restructured to further avoid electric system
reliability risk and wholesale energy costs;
(3) methods for selecting programs and services for inclusion under Title 7,
Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article, including cost–effectiveness testing with
exceptions to the testing to enable the inclusion of appropriate programs and services, as
determined by the Public Service Commission; and
– 139 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) any other information the Public Service Commission considers
appropriate.
(c) On or before November 1, 2027, the Public Service Commission shall submit
the recommendations required under this section to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment and the House Environment and Transportation Committee.
SECTION 14. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) The Public Service Commission shall issue a request for information on
the use of a third–party, single–implementer program for the administration of the programs
and services under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article.
(2) The Public Service Commission shall use the information provided
through the request for information to assess the use of a third–party, single–implementer
program for the administration of the programs and services offered by:
(i) only electric companies under § 7–223 of the Public Utilities
Article; and
(ii) both electric companies under § 7–223 of the Public Utilities
Article and the Department of Housing and Community Development under § 7–224 of the
Public Utilities Article.
(3) For each option described in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the request
for information shall seek:
(i) determinations of what effect the use of a single, third–party
administrator would have on costs;
(ii) identification of technical and logistical barriers to transitioning
to a single, third–party administrator; and
(iii) an analysis of the advantages and disadvantages of a private,
third–party administrator as opposed to a State administrator.
(4) The Public Service Commission may conduct research and produce a
report independent of, and in order to supplement any information received through, the
request for information under this subsection.
(5) The Public Service Commission shall require that responses to the
request for information be received not later than July 1, 2027.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this subsection, as soon as
practicable after receiving the information requested in subsection (a) of this section, the
– 140 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
Public Service Commission shall issue a request for proposals for a third–party
administrator for the programs and services under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public
Utilities Article.
(2) Based on the information received under subsection (a) of this section,
the Public Service Commission may issue the request for proposals for a third–party
administrator for the administration of the programs offered by:
(i) only electric companies under § 7–223 of the Public Utilities
Article; or
(ii) both electric companies under § 7–223 of the Public Utilities
Article and the Department of Housing and Community Development under § 7–224 of the
Public Utilities Article.
(3) The request for proposals shall specify that responses to the request
should minimize short–term and long–term costs for utility ratepayers.
(4) The request for proposals shall specify that the Public Service
Commission shall have access to relevant materials of a third–party administrator selected
by the Commission under this subsection to ensure effective program oversight and
protection of ratepayer funds.
(5) The Public Service Commission may decline to issue a request for
proposals if the Commission determines that the use of a third–party administrator would
not be cost–effective.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, on or before June
1, 2028, the Public Service Commission shall select, through the request for proposals
process initiated under subsection (b) of this section, a third–party administrator for the
administration of the programs and services under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public
Utilities Article, as applicable, beginning with the 3–year program cycle starting in 2030.
(2) The Public Service Commission may decline to select a third–party
administrator if the Commission determines that:
(i) the use of a third–party administrator would not be cost–effective;
or
(ii) the responses to the request for proposals issued under subsection
(b) of this section are materially less favorable than the responses to the request for
information issued under subsection (a) of this section.
(3) The Public Service Commission shall notify the General Assembly of a
decision to decline to select a third–party administrator within 5 days after making the
decision.
– 141 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 15. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Power Plant Research Program, in consultation with the Department of
the Environment and the Maryland Energy Administration, shall conduct a study to identify
ways to streamline the permitting process for energy development in the State.
(b) In conducting the study under subsection (a) of this section, the Power Plant
Research Program shall:
(1) identify up to 50 priority energy sites suitable for new or expanded
generating stations or energy storage devices, including:
(i) brownfields;
(ii) industrial sites surrounded by areas with low–population
density;
(iii) sites with old or decommissioned generating units that may be
repowered or repurposed, with special consideration given to sites with surplus
interconnection capacity; and
(iv) State–owned land;
(2) identify current bottlenecks and barriers in the State that extend State
and local permitting timelines; and
(3) develop recommendations on what a State–level zoning or permitting
structure should look like in order to promote fast–tracked development at the priority energy
sites identified in item (1) of this subsection.
(c) On or before December 31, 2026, the Power Plant Research Program shall
report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
the General Assembly on the results of the study.
SECTION 16. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, 2027,
the Maryland Clean Energy Center shall:
(1) establish an application process for loans made under the Green and
Renewable Energy Efficiency for Nonprofits Loan Program in Title 10, Subtitle 8 of the
Economic Development Article, as enacted by Section 4 of this Act;
(2) set guidelines and considerations for application, selection, and
repayment that include:
– 142 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(i) nonprofit organizations that own, rather than rent, their
buildings;
(ii) property size and kilowatt–hours of energy used;
(iii) geographic diversity;
(iv) ethnic and racial diversity;
(v) economic diversity;
(vi) nonprofit organization mission diversity;
(vii) access to the borrower’s portion of the cost of the qualifying energy
system; and
(viii) process and frequency of loan repayment; and
(3) develop and implement an advertising campaign for the Green and
Renewable Energy Efficiency for Nonprofits Loan Program.
SECTION 17. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that the Public Service Commission may allow an electric company or a gas
company to implement a limited–income mechanism authorized under § 4–309 of the Public
Utilities Article on or before December 31, 2026, if the limited–income mechanism is fully
compliant with all Commission requirements.
SECTION 18. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Public Service
Commission may contract for the services of independent consultants and experts to
implement and execute any part of this Act.
SECTION 19. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That all employees who are
transferred to the Department of Human Services as a result of this Act shall be transferred
without diminution of their rights, benefits, employment, or retirement status.
SECTION 20. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 21. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 6 of this Act shall
terminate on the taking effect of the termination provision specified in Section 10 of Chapter
595 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2024. If that termination provision takes effect,
Section 6 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
– 143 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
abrogated and of no further force and effect. This Act may not be interpreted to have any
effect on that termination provision.
That Section(s) 5–5A–08 through 5–5A–10 of Article – Human Services of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 5–5A–09 through 5–5A–11, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 7–512.1 of
Article – Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of Maryland be transferred to be Section(s)
5–5A–08 of Article – Human Services of the Annotated Code of Maryland.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
2–102.
(a) The Department shall:
(10) develop and implement a weatherization program in accordance with
Title 4 of this article and administer the low–income weatherization component of the
electric universal service program in accordance with [§ 7–512.1 of the Public Utilities
Article] § 5–5A–08 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE.
Article – Human Services
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Family Investment Administration.
(c) “Department” means the Department of Human Services.
5–5A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION.
[(b)] (C) “Energy emergency” means a lack of fuel or the imminent
discontinuation of energy services supplied by a fuel vendor or utility vendor that will
endanger health, safety, or welfare.
– 144 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
[(c)] (D) “Fuel vendor” means a person that distributes, transports, produces, or
offers for sale coal products, fuel oil, kerosene, bottled gas, propane, or wood for fuel use or
consumption in the State.
[(d)] (E) “Office” means the Office of Home Energy Programs.
[(e)] (F) “Program” means the Energy Assistance Program.
[(f)] (G) “Utility vendor” means a person that distributes, transports, or
produces natural gas or electricity for use or consumption in the State.
5–5A–02.
There is an Office of Home Energy Programs in the Administration.
5–5A–03.
The purpose of the Office is to carry out this subtitle.
5–5A–08.
(a) (1) (I) [The Commission shall establish] THERE IS an electric
universal service program [to assist electric customers with annual incomes at or below
200% of the federal poverty level] IN THE OFFICE.
(II) THE OFFICE SHALL IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE
ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE PROGRAM.
(III) THE PURPOSE OF THE ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE
PROGRAM IS TO ASSIST ELECTRIC CUSTOMERS WITH ANNUAL INCOMES AT OR
BELOW 200% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL.
(2) The components of the electric universal service program shall include:
(i) bill assistance;
(ii) low–income residential weatherization; and
(iii) the retirement of arrearages for electric customers who have not
received assistance in retiring arrearages under the ELECTRIC universal service program
within the preceding 5 fiscal years.
(3) The Department of Housing and Community Development is
responsible for administering the low–income residential weatherization component of the
electric universal service program.
– 145 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) [(i) The Department of Human Services, through the Office of Home
Energy Programs, is responsible for administering the bill assistance and the arrearage
retirement components of the electric universal service program.
(ii)] The [Department of Human Services] OFFICE may:
[1.] (I) establish minimum and maximum benefits
available to an electric customer under the bill assistance and arrearage retirement
components; and
[2.] (II) coordinate benefits under the electric universal
service program with benefits under the Maryland Energy Assistance Program and other
available energy assistance programs.
(5) The [Department of Human Services] OFFICE may, with input from a
panel or roundtable of interested parties, contract to assist in administering the bill
assistance and the arrearage retirement components of the electric universal service
program.
(6) The Commission has oversight responsibility for the bill assistance and
the arrearage retirement components of the electric universal service program and any
other funds expended under this section.
(7) In a specific case, the electric universal service program may waive the
income eligibility limitation under paragraph (1) of this subsection in order to provide
assistance to an electric customer who would qualify for a similar waiver under [the
Maryland Energy Assistance Program established under Title 5, Subtitle 5A of the Human
Services Article] ANOTHER PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(8) (i) If an applicant for bill assistance or arrearage retirement is to be
denied due to deficient documentation, the [Department of Human Services] OFFICE shall:
1. promptly provide notice of the deficiency to the applicant;
and
2. afford the applicant ample opportunity of not less than 3
months to cure the deficiency.
(ii) An electric company may not begin the process to terminate
service to an applicant while the applicant is curing a deficiency under this paragraph.
(9) Notwithstanding paragraph (2)(iii) of this subsection, any assistance
received for arrearage retirement by a customer in calendar years 2020 and 2021 may not
– 146 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
be counted toward the limitation on the number of times the customer may receive
assistance for arrearage retirement.
(b) (1) All customers shall contribute to the funding of the electric universal
service program through a charge collected by each electric company.
(2) The Commission shall determine a fair and equitable allocation for
collecting the charges among all customer classes pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.
(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, in accordance
with subsection (f)(6) of this section, any unexpended bill assistance and arrearage
retirement funds returned to customers under subsection (f) of this section shall be
returned to each customer class as a credit in the same proportion that the customer class
contributed charges to the fund.
(4) The Department [of Human Services] shall expend any unexpended bill
assistance and arrearage funds that were collected in fiscal years 2010 through 2017, in
excess of the total amount authorized under subsection (e) of this section, for one or more
of the following purposes:
(i) bill assistance and the retirement of arrearages for customers
who are eligible to receive assistance at the time services are provided;
(ii) targeted and enhanced low–income residential weatherization
designed to remediate households that are considered ineligible to participate in other
State energy efficiency programs due to significant health and safety hazards;
(iii) an arrearage management program for low–income customers in
arrears, including providing credits or matching payments for customers who make timely
payments on current bills; or
(iv) an arrearage prevention program for low–income customers.
(5) An electric company shall recover electric universal service program
costs in accordance with § 7–512 of [this subtitle] THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(6) As determined by the Office [of Home Energy Programs], bill assistance
payments to an electric company may be on a monthly basis for each customer.
(7) The Commission shall determine the allocation of the electric universal
service charge among the generation, transmission, and distribution rate components of all
classes.
(8) The Commission may not assess the electric universal service
surcharge on a per kilowatt–hour basis.
– 147 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) On or before January 1 of each year, the Commission shall report,
subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly on the electric
universal service program, including:
(i) subject to subsection (e) of this section, a recommendation on the
total amount of funds for the ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE program for the following
fiscal year based on:
1. the level of participation in and the amounts expended on
bill assistance and arrearage retirement during the preceding fiscal year;
2. how bill assistance and arrearage retirement payments
were calculated during the preceding fiscal year;
3. the projected needs for the bill assistance and the
arrearage retirement components for the next fiscal year; and
4. the amount of any bill assistance or arrearage retirement
surplus carried over in the electric universal service program fund under subsection (f)(6)(i)
of this section;
(ii) for bill assistance, the total amount of need, as determined by the
Commission, for electric customers with annual incomes at or below 175% of the federal
poverty level and the basis for this determination;
(iii) the amount of funds needed, as determined by the Commission,
to retire arrearages for electric customers who have not received assistance in retiring
arrearages under the electric universal service program within the preceding 7 fiscal years,
and the basis for this determination;
(iv) the amount of funds needed, as determined by the Commission,
for bill assistance and arrearage retirement, respectively, for customers for whom income
limitations may be waived under subsection (a)(7) of this section, and the basis for each
determination;
(v) the impact on customers’ rates, including the allocation among
customer classes, from collecting the total amount recommended by the Commission under
item (i) of this paragraph; and
(vi) the impact of using other federal poverty level benchmarks on
costs and the effectiveness of the electric universal service program.
(2) (i) To assist the Commission in preparing its recommendations
under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Office [of Home Energy Programs] shall report
to the Commission each year on:
– 148 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
1. the number of customers and the amount of distributions
made to fuel customers under the Maryland Energy Assistance Program established under
[Title 5, Subtitle 5A of the Human Services Article] THIS SUBTITLE, identified by funding
source and fuel source;
2. the cost of outreach and education materials provided by
the Office [of Home Energy Programs] for the electric universal service program; and
3. the amount of money that the Department [of Human
Services] receives, and is projected to receive, for low–income energy assistance from:
A. the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund under §
9–20B–05 of the State Government Article;
B. with respect to electric customers only, the Maryland
Energy Assistance Program; and
C. any other federal, State, local, or private source.
(ii) The Office [of Home Energy Programs] may satisfy the reporting
requirement of subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph by providing the Commission with a
copy of material that contains the required information and that the Office [of Home
Energy Programs] submits to the federal government.
(iii) The Commission shall include the information provided by the
Office [of Home Energy Programs] under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph in its report
to the General Assembly under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) Subject to subsection (d)(2) of this section, the Commission shall include
the information provided by the Department of Housing and Community Development
under subsection (d)(1) of this section in its report to the General Assembly under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(4) The electric universal service program shall be subject to audit by the
Office of Legislative Audits in accordance with §§ 2–1220 through 2–1227 of the State
Government Article.
(d) (1) On or before January 1 of each year, the Department of Housing and
Community Development shall report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, to the General Assembly on the low–income residential
weatherization component of the electric universal service program, including:
(i) the amount of funds expended during the preceding fiscal year;
(ii) the level of participation during the preceding fiscal year,
including the number of households served in each area of the State; and
– 149 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) the types of projects, including the average cost per unit,
provided to households during the preceding fiscal year.
(2) The Department of Housing and Community Development may satisfy
the reporting requirement under paragraph (1) of this subsection by requesting the
Commission to include the information in the Commission’s report required under
subsection (c) of this section and providing the information to the Commission by the date
specified by the Commission.
(e) The total amount of funds to be collected for the electric universal service
program each year shall be $37 million, allocated in the following manner:
(1) $27.4 million shall be collected from the industrial and commercial
classes; and
(2) $9.6 million shall be collected from the residential class.
(f) (1) In this subsection, “fund” means the electric universal service program
fund.
(2) There is an electric universal service program fund.
(3) (i) 1. The Comptroller shall collect the revenue collected by
electric companies under subsection (b) of this section and place the revenue into the fund.
2. The General Assembly may appropriate funds
supplemental to the funds collected under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph.
(ii) The fund is a continuing, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(iii) The purpose of the fund is to assist electric customers as provided
in subsection (a)(1) of this section.
(4) The Department [of Human Services], with oversight by the
Commission, shall disburse the bill assistance and arrearage retirement funds in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
(5) The Comptroller annually shall disburse up to $1,000,000 of
low–income residential weatherization funds to the Department of Housing and
Community Development, as provided in the State budget.
(6) (i) At the end of a given fiscal year, any unexpended bill assistance
and arrearage retirement funds that were collected for that fiscal year shall be retained in
– 150 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
the fund and shall be made available for disbursement through the first 6 months of the
next fiscal year to customers who:
1. qualify for assistance from the fund during the given fiscal
year;
2. apply for assistance from the fund before the end of the
given fiscal year; and
3. remain eligible for assistance at the time services are
provided.
(ii) If the Commission determines that an extension is needed, the
Commission may extend up to an additional 6 months the period in which unexpended bill
assistance and arrearage retirement funds may be made available for disbursement under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(iii) 1. Any bill assistance and arrearage retirement funds
collected for a given fiscal year that are retained under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
and that remain unexpended at the end of the period allowed under subparagraphs (i) and
(ii) of this paragraph shall be returned to each customer class in the proportion that the
customer class contributed charges to the fund for the given fiscal year in the form of a
credit toward the charge assessed in the following fiscal year.
2. If the Commission determines that it is impractical to
establish a rate credit for the amount to be returned for a given fiscal year to customers
under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph, the Commission:
A. may defer the return for not more than 2 additional fiscal
years; and
B. shall combine the returned amount for that fiscal year
with amounts to be returned for the following fiscal years when calculating the rate credit
for the final fiscal year of the period.
(g) (1) If a party to a merger or acquisition of an electric company or an affiliate
of an electric company is required to distribute a credit to the customers in the electric
company’s service territory under an agreement with the Commission in connection with
the merger or acquisition, the Commission shall consider the adequacy of the current
funding of the electric universal service program in providing assistance to customers who
qualify under this section.
(2) Any funds deposited into the electric universal service program fund as
a result of an agreement with the Commission in connection with a merger or acquisition
of an electric company or an affiliate of an electric company are in addition to, and may not
substitute for, funds collected under subsection (e) of this section.
– 151 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(h) (1) An arrearage prevention program under subsection (b)(4)(iv) of this
section is intended to prevent or reduce arrearages for low–income customers who have
participated in a low–income residential weatherization program.
(2) (i) The ARREARAGE PREVENTION program is intended as a
one–time grant of money to establish ongoing arrearage prevention activities in the State.
(ii) The Department [of Human Services], in consultation with the
Commission, will select for the ARREARAGE PREVENTION program up to two public or
private entities as program recipients to administer the program.
(iii) At least one ARREARAGE PREVENTION program recipient must
primarily serve customers in a major urban area of the State.
(3) [A] AN ARREARAGE PREVENTION program recipient must
demonstrate significant efforts to:
(i) secure additional private investment in rooftop solar
installation, including the use of ARREARAGE PREVENTION program money for credit
enhancement, direct project support, or support for program recipients and customers; and
(ii) provide employment in solar installation to unemployed and
underemployed individuals, with preference for those who reside in the local jurisdiction
where the installations will occur.
(4) The ARREARAGE PREVENTION program may include the installation
of rooftop solar electricity generation equipment after energy efficiency measures at the
residential property have been completed.
Article – Local Government
1–1320.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Administration” means the Maryland Energy Administration.
(3) “Residential energy storage system” means a system, on a residential
customer’s side of the meter, used to store electrical energy, or mechanical, chemical, or
thermal energy that was once electrical energy, for use as electrical energy at a later date
or in a process that offsets electricity use at peak times.
– 152 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(4) “Residential solar energy system” means any configuration of solar
energy devices that collects and distributes solar energy for the purpose of generating
electricity and that has a single residential interconnection with the electrical grid.
(5) “SOLAR PERMITTING FEE” MEANS A FEE EQUAL TO THE SUM OF
ALL CHARGES IMPOSED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY, INCLUDING CHARGES
IMPOSED BY A PROVIDER OF SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE, IN CONNECTION WITH
AN APPLICATION FOR A RESIDENTIAL SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEM.
(6) “Solar permitting software” means[:
(i) the most recent version of a web–based platform, developed by
the National Renewable Energy Laboratory, that provides a standard portal for receiving
and processing residential solar energy system and residential energy storage system
permit information; or
(ii) automated software that functions to support the tracking and
approval of residential building permits for residential solar energy systems, residential
energy storage systems, main electrical panel upgrades, and main electrical panel devices]
SOFTWARE OR A COMBINATION OF SOFTWARE THAT:
(I) AUTOMATES PLAN REVIEW FOR RESIDENTIAL SOLAR
ENERGY SYSTEMS TO THE MOST RECENT VERSION OF, AS APPLICABLE:
1. THE MARYLAND BUILDING PERFORMANCE
STANDARDS;
2. THE NATIONAL ELECTRICAL CODE, INCLUDING
LEGALLY ADOPTED LOCAL AMENDMENTS; AND
3. THE STATE FIRE PREVENTION CODE;
(II) PRODUCES CODE–COMPLIANT APPROVALS;
(III) ISSUES A CODE–COMPLIANT PERMIT;
(IV) ACCEPTS ONLINE PAYMENTS FOR ANY PERMITTING FEES
IMPOSED; AND
(V) ISSUES PERMITS OR PERMIT REVISIONS IMMEDIATELY ON
RECEIPT OF ONLINE SUBMISSION OF PERMITTING FEE PAYMENTS, IF APPLICABLE.
(b) This section applies to all counties and municipalities.
– 153 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) Subject to subsection (d) of this section and except as provided in
subsection (e) of this section, on or before August 1, [2025] 2027, each county and
municipality shall implement solar permitting software for features supporting the
[tracking] APPLICATION SUBMISSION, TRACKING, and approval of residential building
permits for:
[(1)] (I) residential solar energy systems;
[(2)] (II) residential energy storage systems;
[(3)] (III) main electrical panel upgrades; and
[(4)] (IV) main electrical panel derates.
(2) (I) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL:
1. COMPLETE A REMOTE OR IN–PERSON INSPECTION
REQUIRED FOR A PROJECT PERMITTED BY SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE WITHIN
5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A PROPERLY COMPLETED REQUEST FOR
INSPECTION; AND
2. MAKE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE FOR THE MOST RECENT
PREVIOUS QUARTER FOR WHICH DATA IS AVAILABLE THE AVERAGE INSPECTION
TIME FOR PROJECTS PERMITTED BY SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE.
(II) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, IF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY
HAS HAD AN AVERAGE IN–PERSON INSPECTION TIME THAT IS GREATER THAN 5
BUSINESS DAYS, BASED ON THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD, THE
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE AN OPTION FOR REMOTE
INSPECTION THAT IS CAPABLE OF PROVIDING INSPECTION WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS
AFTER RECEIPT OF A REQUEST FOR AN IN–PERSON INSPECTION.
(III) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY USING REMOTE INSPECTION
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION MAY REQUIRE THIRD–PARTY CERTIFICATION
THAT THE PROJECT HAS BEEN INSTALLED IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE
STATE AND LOCAL CODES.
(3) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY WITH AUTHORITY OVER
PERMITTING A RESIDENTIAL SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEM MAY PERFORM, AT THE
COUNTY’S OR MUNICIPALITY’S DISCRETION, AN IN–PERSON INSPECTION FOR A
PERMIT APPLICATION SUBMITTED THROUGH SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE:
(I) IF REMOTE INSPECTION IS UNABLE TO BE COMPLETED;
– 154 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(II) ON REQUEST OR CONCERN OF AN INSPECTOR;
(III) IF SUFFICIENT DATA IS NOT AVAILABLE TO EVALUATE THE
PERMIT APPLICATION; OR
(IV) IF A DOCUMENTED HEALTH OR SAFETY ISSUE EXISTS.
(4) REVIEW OF A PERMIT APPLICATION TO INSTALL A RESIDENTIAL
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT IS SUBMITTED USING SOLAR
PERMITTING SOFTWARE SHALL BE LIMITED TO A DETERMINATION WHETHER THE
APPLICATION MEETS ALL HEALTH AND SAFETY REQUIREMENTS UNDER STATE AND
LOCAL LAW.
(5) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY USING SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE MAY CONDUCT A
MANUAL REVIEW OF SOFTWARE–APPROVED PERMITS TO:
1. PERFORM QUALITY–ASSURANCE AUDITS;
2. REVIEW SUBMISSIONS FLAGGED BY THE SOFTWARE;
3. REVIEW PERMIT APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED BY A
PERSON THAT HAS REPEATEDLY FAILED TO OBTAIN REQUIRED PERMITS OR
REPEATEDLY FAILED TO PASS PERMIT INSPECTIONS;
4. CONSIDER PERMIT APPLICATIONS WITH
NONSTANDARD STRUCTURAL CONDITIONS; OR
5. ADDRESS DOCUMENTED PUBLIC SAFETY CONCERNS.
(II) MANUAL REVIEW OF SOFTWARE–APPROVED PERMITS
SHALL BE COMPLETED WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE PERMIT IS APPROVED.
(6) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO A RESIDENTIAL SOLAR
ENERGY SYSTEM:
1. THAT IS OR WILL BE INSTALLED ON A RESIDENTIAL
ROOFTOP; AND
2. WITH A GENERATING CAPACITY OF LESS THAN 30
KILOWATTS, AS MEASURED BY THE ALTERNATING CURRENT RATING OF THE
SYSTEM’S INVERTER.
– 155 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, BEGINNING AUGUST 1, 2027, A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT
SET A PERMITTING FEE FOR PERMITS ISSUED BY SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE
THAT EXCEEDS $500 FOR RESIDENTIAL SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEMS.
(III) A THIRD–PARTY PAYMENT PROCESSING CHARGE MAY BE
ASSESSED FOR PERMITS ISSUED BY SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE IN ADDITION TO
THE MAXIMUM PERMITTING FEE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(7) AN INSPECTOR MAY REVIEW CONSTRUCTION DOCUMENTS THAT
ARE PRODUCED BY THE SOLAR PERMITTING SOFTWARE.
(d) A county or municipality may not be required to comply with the requirements
of subsection (c) of this section if:
(1) the county or municipality does not require a permit for:
(i) residential solar energy systems; or
(ii) residential solar energy systems paired with a residential solar
energy storage system; or
(2) as determined by the Administration, the automated software is no
longer updated or maintained.
(e) The Administration shall delay the initial implementation or suspend the
requirements of subsection (c) of this section if there are insufficient State or federal funds
available to the Administration to provide financial support to a county or municipality
implementing solar permitting software as defined in subsection (a)(5)(i) of this section.
(F) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY, OTHER THAN A MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC UTILITY
OR A THIRD–PARTY CONTRACTOR FOR THE ELECTRIC COMPANY, SHALL PERFORM
ANY METER DISCONNECTION AND RECONNECTION NECESSARY FOR THE
INTERCONNECTION OF A RESIDENTIAL SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEM, RESIDENTIAL
ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM, OR BOTH, WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A
PROPERLY COMPLETED REQUEST FROM THE OWNER OR INSTALLER OF THE SYSTEM.
(G) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY SEEK JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT AGAINST
A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY THAT FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION.
Article – Natural Resources
3–302.
– 156 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(a) (1) There is an Environmental Trust Fund.
(2) (i) For the purpose of this subtitle, there is established as an added
cost of electricity distributed to retail electric customers within the State, an environmental
surcharge per kilowatt hour of electric energy distributed in the State to be paid by any
electric company as defined in § 1–101 of the Public Utilities Article.
(ii) The Public Service Commission shall impose the surcharge per
kilowatt hour of electric energy distributed to retail electric customers within the State and
shall authorize the electric companies to add the full amount of the surcharge to retail
electric customers’ bills.
(iii) To the extent that the surcharge is not collected from retail
electric customers, the surcharge shall be deemed a cost of distribution and shall be allowed
and computed as such, together with other allowable expenses, for rate–making purposes.
(iv) Revenues from the surcharge shall be collected by the
Comptroller and placed in the Fund.
(b) (1) (i) The Secretary, in consultation with the Director of the Maryland
Energy Administration, annually shall coordinate the preparation of a budget required to
carry out the provisions of this subtitle.
(ii) On approval of the budget by the General Assembly, the Public
Service Commission shall establish the amount of the surcharge per kilowatt hour for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 1972, and for each subsequent fiscal year.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subtitle, the amount of the
surcharge for each account for each retail electric customer may not exceed the lesser of
0.15 mill per kilowatt hour or $1,000 per month and the surcharge may not continue beyond
fiscal year 2030.
(3) (i) The Comptroller shall maintain the method of collection of the
surcharge from the companies and the collections shall accrue to the Fund.
(ii) The Department shall credit against the amount required to be
paid into the Environmental Trust Fund by each electric company an amount equal to
0.75% of the total surcharge attributed to each company on the basis of the electricity
distributed within Maryland.
(c) (1) (i) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(ii) The Fund is subject to the provisions for financial management
and budgeting established by the Department of Budget and Management.
– 157 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the
General Fund of the State.
(iv) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(v) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the money
in the Fund shall be used to carry out the provisions of this subtitle as provided for in the
budget.
(vi) For the purposes of this subtitle, the Secretary, in consultation
with the Director of the Maryland Energy Administration, may execute appropriate
contracts with any State or federal agency, research organization, industry, or academic
institution to conduct the necessary research, construct or acquire, or both, real property
including physical predictive models, laboratories, buildings, land, and appurtenances, or
support the technological development of extraordinary systems related to power plants
designed to minimize environmental impact.
(vii) The Secretary may utilize available expertise in any other State
unit in the development, execution, and management of contracts and agreements on
projects relating to their areas of prime responsibility.
(2) Money in the Fund may be used for administrative costs calculated in
accordance with § 1–103(b)(2) of this article.
(d) [(1) The Maryland Energy Administration shall receive administrative and
fiscal support from the Fund for studies relating to the conservation or production of electric
energy.
(2) Fiscal support to the Maryland Energy Administration from the Fund
may not exceed $250,000 in any fiscal year.
(3)] The Chesapeake Bay Trust shall receive $375,000 from the Fund each
fiscal year for the purpose of funding energy conservation projects through the Thomas V.
Mike Miller, Jr., Chesapeake Conservation and Climate Corps Program, as provided under
§§ 8–1913 through 8–1924 of this article.
(e) The Legislative Auditor may conduct post audits of a fiscal and compliance
nature of the Fund and of the appropriations and expenditures made for the purposes of
this subtitle. The cost of the fiscal portion of the post audit examinations shall be an
operating cost of the Fund.
Article – Public Utilities
2–124.
– 158 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(A) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE COMMISSION:
(1) INCORPORATE KEYWORD SEARCH FUNCTIONALITY FOR, AT A
MINIMUM, MATERIALS PUBLISHED ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE ON AND AFTER
JULY 1, 2026, INCLUDING KEYWORD SEARCH FUNCTIONALITY WITHIN:
(I) THE CASE AND MAILLOG SEARCH;
(II) EACH CASE;
(III) EACH RULEMAKING;
(IV) EACH PUBLIC CONFERENCE TRANSCRIPT; AND
(V) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, EACH PUBLICATION; AND
(2) DEVELOP A LANDING PAGE TEMPLATE FOR MAJOR PROCEEDINGS,
INCLUDING RATE CASES, THAT VISUALLY TRACKS THE MAJOR PROCEEDING
THROUGH EACH STEP OF THE PROCESS.
(B) THE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION AND THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM, SHALL DEVELOP
DASHBOARDS TO TRACK PROGRESS TOWARD MAJOR STATE ENERGY PROGRAMS
AND GOALS UNDER COMMISSION OVERSIGHT, INCLUDING:
(1) NET ENERGY METERING; AND
(2) THE STATEWIDE ENERGY STORAGE GOAL UNDER § 7–216.1 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
4–203.1.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY
THAT IS AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY, A GAS COMPANY, OR A
COMBINATION GAS AND ELECTRIC COMPANY.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC
UTILITY OR AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN § 4–203 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY MAY NOT INITIATE A PROCEEDING THAT
MAY LEAD TO A RATE CHANGE UNLESS THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY:
– 159 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) NOTIFIES CUSTOMERS, THROUGH A BILL INSERT OR SEPARATE
E–MAIL AND IN A FORM AND MANNER APPROVED THE COMMISSION:
(I) THAT THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY IS INITIATING A
PROCEEDING THAT MAY LEAD TO A RATE CHANGE; AND
(II) THAT INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROCEEDING IS OR WILL
BE AVAILABLE ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE; AND
(2) INCLUDES IN THE BILL INSERT OR SEPARATE E–MAIL REQUIRED
UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THE PORTION OF THE ANNUAL RATE REPORT
PUBLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION THAT PERTAINS TO THE
PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY INITIATING THE PROCEEDING.
(C) A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY SHALL INCLUDE IN EACH RETAIL
CUSTOMER’S BILL AND AUTOMATIC PAYMENT E–MAIL THE FOLLOWING STATEMENT:
“THE MARYLAND GENERAL ASSEMBLY ESTABLISHED THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMMISSION TO REGULATE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANIES DOING BUSINESS IN
MARYLAND TO ENSURE THE ACTIVITIES OF THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANIES ARE
CONSISTENT WITH THE PUBLIC INTEREST. FOR INFORMATION ON HOW TO
PARTICIPATE IN OR OBSERVE A PROCEEDING BEFORE THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMMISSION, PLEASE VISIT THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE.”.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, AND EACH JANUARY 1
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE OF
PEOPLE’S COUNSEL, SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE AN ANNUAL
RATE REPORT FOR EACH PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY OPERATING IN THE STATE.
(2) THE ANNUAL RATE REPORT SHALL EXPLAIN, IN NONTECHNICAL
TERMS, THE OBSERVED RATE TRENDS FOR EACH PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY,
INCLUDING:
(I) A VISUAL GRAPHIC DEPICTING THE 10–YEAR RATE CHANGE
TREND BY YEAR;
(II) IDENTIFYING COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH TRANSMISSION,
DISTRIBUTION, AND STANDARD–OFFER OR COMMODITY SERVICE; AND
(III) ACCOUNTING FOR ALL CUSTOMER BILL LINE ITEMS,
INCLUDING RATE RIDERS.
– 160 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(3) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1, 2028, AND EACH MARCH 1
THEREAFTER, A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY SHALL:
(I) POST THE ANNUAL RATE REPORT ON THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY’S WEBSITE; AND
(II) PROVIDE TO EACH RETAIL CUSTOMER, THROUGH A BILL
INSERT OR SEPARATE E–MAIL, A LINK TO THE ANNUAL RATE REPORT.
(4) THE OFFICE OF PEOPLE’S COUNSEL SHALL BRING A CASE TO THE
COMMISSION IF THE OFFICE DETERMINES THAT AN ANNUAL RATE REPORT
PUBLISHED BY THE COMMISSION INCLUDES INCORRECT OR MISLEADING
INFORMATION.
4–212.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Contract capacity” means the amount of monthly peak load
requirements:
(i) that is mutually agreed to by an electric company and a large
load customer for each month remaining in a contract term after the load ramp period has
ended; and
(ii) for which:
1. the electric company agrees to provide all of the
components of retail electric service subject to the terms and conditions in its tariffs; and
2. the large load customer agrees to purchase service at that
load level for the stated term of the contract and under the same terms and conditions as
those stated in the contract.
(3) “Large load customer” means a commercial or industrial customer for
retail electric service that:
(i) has or is projected to have an aggregate monthly demand of at
least [100] 25 megawatts; and
(ii) has or is projected to have a load factor of over [80%] 75%.
(4) “Load ramp period” means the period of time from commencement of
service until a large load customer’s billing calculation is based on the full contract capacity.
– 161 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that residential retail electric
customers in the State should not bear the financial risks associated with large load
customers interconnecting to the electric system serving the State.
(c) (1) (i) On or before September 1, 2026, each investor–owned electric
company and each electric cooperative shall submit to the Commission for approval a
specific rate schedule for large load customers that accomplishes the intent of subsection
(b) of this section.
(ii) Each municipal electric utility that receives an application for
retail electric service from a large load customer shall submit to the Commission for
approval a specific rate schedule for large load customers.
(2) (i) Service under a specific rate schedule shall be available to large
load customers that will use, within the initial contract term:
1. a monthly maximum demand of more than [100] 25
megawatts at a single location; or
2. an aggregated contract capacity in the electric company’s
service territory of more than [100] 25 megawatts.
(ii) Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, large
load customers that qualify for a specific rate schedule after the effective date of that
schedule:
1. shall take service under the specific rate schedule; and
2. may not be allowed to take service under any other
existing schedule.
(iii) A specific rate schedule does not apply to:
1. the facility of an existing large load customer that has
signed a service agreement before the effective date of the schedule if:
[1.] A. the large load customer’s existing load does not
expand by more than 25 megawatts at that facility under the existing service agreement;
or
[2.] B. the large load customer does not sign a new service
agreement to expand the facility’s load by more than 25 megawatts above the contract
capacity of the existing service agreement; OR
– 162 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
2. ELECTRIFIED THERMAL ENERGY GENERATION
ASSETS INTERCONNECTED WITH A DISTRICT ENERGY SYSTEM IF, AS DETERMINED
BY THE COMMISSION, THE OPERATIONAL CHARACTERISTICS OF THE GENERATION
ASSETS DO NOT POSE A MATERIAL RELIABILITY RISK.
(d) In making a determination on whether to approve a specific rate schedule
submitted under subsection (c) of this section, the Commission shall consider whether the
rate schedule:
(1) requires a large load customer to cover the just and reasonable costs
associated with any electric transmission or distribution system buildout required to:
(i) interconnect the large load customer to the electric system
serving the State; or
(ii) serve the large load customer;
(2) protects residential retail electric customers from the financial risks
associated with large load customers through the use of:
(i) load ramp periods;
(ii) minimum billing demand for electric distribution and
transmission service that is a high percentage of a large load customer’s contract capacity;
(iii) long–term contractual commitments and exit fees;
(iv) guarantee or collateral requirements; and
(v) penalties and reimbursement requirements for the large load
customer if the large load customer delays or cancels a project after the electric company
has begun buildout to accommodate the large load customer; and
(3) sufficiently ensures that the allocation of costs to large load customers
under the schedule does not result in customers that are not large load customers
unreasonably subsidizing the costs of large load customers under the schedule.
(e) Before signing a contract for service under a specific rate schedule submitted
under subsection (c) of this section, a large load customer under the schedule is required
to:
(1) submit a request for a load study to determine the necessary contract
capacity for the large load customer and pay any applicable fees associated with the study;
(2) designate a specific site where the large load customer’s project will be
constructed and served by the electric company;
– 163 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) own or have the exclusive right to use the land designated in item (2) of
this subsection for the project; and
(4) meet any other requirements specified under the rate schedule.
(f) (1) On or before June 1, 2026, the Commission shall adopt regulations to
carry out this section.
(2) The regulations shall:
(i) establish minimum notice requirements and deadlines related to
load study requests and contract terminations and adjustments;
(ii) if considered necessary by the Commission, specify common
forms of acceptable collateral to satisfy the requirements of this section; and
(iii) establish deadlines related to completion of load studies and
payment of fees.
(G) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A DATA CENTER, AS DEFINED
IN § 11–239 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE, THAT IS A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER.
(2) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT A DATA
CENTER THAT LOCATES IN THE STATE ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026:
(I) HIRE, TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT POSSIBLE, IN–STATE
WORKERS FOR CONSTRUCTION AND ONGOING OPERATIONS;
(II) PROVIDE SIGNIFICANT INTERCONNECTION CAPACITY FOR
THE DATA CENTER’S LOAD THROUGH:
1. BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE;
2. PURCHASING CAPACITY WITH NEWLY
INTERCONNECTED ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES WITHIN THE LOAD ZONE OR LOCAL
DELIVERY AREA;
3. PURCHASING CAPACITY WITH NEW CARBON–FREE
ASSETS WITHIN THE LOAD ZONE OR LOCAL DELIVERY AREA; AND
4. DEMAND RESPONSE;
– 164 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(III) PROACTIVELY ENGAGE WITH LOCAL COMMUNITIES, LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS, AND THE STATE DURING PLANNING, CONSTRUCTION, AND
OPERATION OF THE DATA CENTER; AND
(IV) DEVELOP AND MAKE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE A WRITTEN
PLAN FOR ACHIEVING ITEMS (I), (II), AND (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
7–109.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE.
(B) A PERSON THAT OWNS OR OPERATES A TRANSMISSION LINE THAT IS
DESIGNED TO CARRY A VOLTAGE IN EXCESS OF 69,000 VOLTS AND IS LOCATED IN
THE STATE SHALL PARTICIPATE AS A MEMBER IN A REGIONAL TRANSMISSION
ORGANIZATION.
7–207.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES” MEANS:
(I) GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES;
(II) HIGH PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS; OR
(III) STORAGE AS A TRANSMISSION ASSET.
(3) “Brownfields site” means:
(i) a former industrial or commercial site identified by federal or
State laws or regulation as contaminated or polluted;
(ii) a closed landfill regulated by the Department of the
Environment; or
(iii) mined land.
[(3)] (4) (i) “Construction” means:
1. any physical change at a site, including fabrication,
erection, installation, or demolition; or
– 165 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. the entry into a binding agreement or contractual
obligation to purchase equipment exclusively for use in construction in the State or to
undertake a program of actual construction in the State which cannot be canceled or
modified without substantial loss to the owner or operator of the proposed generating
station.
(ii) “Construction” does not include a change that is needed for the
temporary use of a site or route for nonutility purposes or for use in securing geological
data, including any boring that is necessary to ascertain foundation conditions.
[(4)] (5) “Generating station” does not include:
(i) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity;
2. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current; and
3. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid during time periods when the electric grid is out of service;
(ii) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that:
1. are used for the production of electricity from a solar
photovoltaic system or an eligible customer–generator that is subject to the provisions of §
7–306 of this title;
2. are located on the same property or adjacent properties;
3. have the capacity to produce, when calculated
cumulatively for all generating units or facilities on the property or adjacent property, more
than 2 megawatts but not more than 14 megawatts of alternating current; and
4. for each individual generating unit or facility:
A. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current;
B. is separately metered by the electric company; and
C. does not export electricity for sale on the wholesale market
under an agreement with PJM Interconnection, LLC;
(iii) a generating unit or facility that:
– 166 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
1. is used for the production of electricity for the purpose of:
A. onsite emergency backup at a facility when service from
the electric company is interrupted due to electric distribution or transmission system
failure or when there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
and
B. test and maintenance operations necessary to ensure
functionality of the generating unit or facility in the event of a service interruption from
the electric company due to electric distribution or transmission system failure or when
there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
2. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid;
3. is subject to a permit to construct issued by the
Department of the Environment; and
4. is installed at a facility that is part of critical
infrastructure if the facility complies with all applicable regulations regarding noise level
and testing hours; or
(iv) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that
satisfy item (iii) of this paragraph.
[(5)] (6) (I) “GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGY” MEANS
HARDWARE OR SOFTWARE THAT INCREASES THE CAPACITY, EFFICIENCY, OR
RELIABILITY OF EXISTING TRANSMISSION SYSTEMS.
(II) “GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGY” INCLUDES:
1. A SYSTEM THAT USES REAL–TIME OR FORECASTED
WEATHER AND OPERATING CONDITIONS TO DETERMINE THE TRANSFER CAPACITY
OF TRANSMISSION SYSTEMS;
2. TECHNOLOGY THAT MODULATES CIRCUIT
IMPEDANCE OR OTHER ELECTRICAL PROPERTIES TO REROUTE POWER FLOWS AND
RELIEVE CONGESTION; AND
3. SOFTWARE THAT IDENTIFIES SWITCHING
CONFIGURATIONS TO REROUTE ELECTRICITY AND ALLEVIATE TRANSMISSION
CONSTRAINTS.
(7) “HIGH PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS” MEANS CONDUCTORS,
INCLUDING ADVANCED STEEL CORE CONDUCTORS, CARBON FIBER AND COMPOSITE
– 167 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
CORE CONDUCTORS, AND SUPERCONDUCTORS, THAT, COMPARED TO TRADITIONAL
ALUMINUM–CONDUCTOR STEEL–REINFORCED CONDUCTORS:
(I) HAVE A SIMILAR DIAMETER AND WEIGHT; AND
(II) 1. HAVE A DIRECT CURRENT ELECTRICAL RESISTANCE
THAT IS AT LEAST 10% LESS;
2. INCREASE THE POTENTIAL ENERGY CARRYING
CAPACITY BY AT LEAST 75%; OR
3. HAVE A COEFFICIENT OF THERMAL EXPANSION THAT
IS AT LEAST 30% LESS.
(8) (i) “Mined land” means the surface or subsurface of an area in which
surface mining operations will be, are being, or have been conducted.
(ii) “Mined land” includes:
1. private ways and roads used for mining appurtenant to
any surface mining area;
2. land excavations;
3. workings; and
4. overburden.
[(6)] (9) “Qualified generator lead line” means [an overhead] A
transmission line [that is] AND ANY ASSOCIATED ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGY designed to carry, OR SUPPORT THE CARRYING OF, a voltage in excess of
69,000 volts and would allow an out–of–state Tier 1 or Tier 2 renewable source to
interconnect with a portion of the electric system in Maryland that is owned by an electric
company.
(10) “STORAGE AS A TRANSMISSION ASSET” MEANS AN ENERGY
STORAGE FACILITY THAT:
(I) IS PLANNED, OPERATED, AND RECOVERS COSTS AS A
TRANSMISSION FACILITY THAT PROVIDES ONE OR MORE TRANSMISSION SERVICES,
INCLUDING CONGESTION RELIEF, VOLTAGE SUPPORT, POWER–FLOW CONTROL, OR
STABILITY UNDER ANY PJM TARIFFS AND APPLICABLE FERC ORDERS;
– 168 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(II) EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED FOR TRANSMISSION ASSETS, IS
NOT DISPATCHED FOR WHOLESALE ENERGY STORAGE; AND
(III) IS ELIGIBLE FOR COST RECOVERY IN TRANSMISSION RATES.
(b) (3) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, unless a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for the construction is first obtained from the
Commission, a person may not begin construction of [an overhead] A transmission line that
is designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts or exercise a right of condemnation
with the construction.
(ii) [For] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, FOR construction related to an existing [overhead] transmission line, the
Commission may waive the requirement in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for good
cause.
(III) WHEN DETERMINING WHETHER TO WAIVE THE
REQUIREMENT IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR GOOD CAUSE, THE
COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER:
1. THE COST OF THE CONSTRUCTION ON RATEPAYERS;
2. THE IMPACT OF THE CONSTRUCTION ON THE
ENVIRONMENT; AND
3. ANY OTHER MATTER THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS
APPROPRIATE.
(IV) AN APPLICANT FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A TRANSMISSION LINE
SHALL INCLUDE IN ITS APPLICATION:
1. EVIDENCE THAT THE APPLICANT CONSIDERED, AS
PART OF THE APPLICANT’S INTERNAL PLANNING PROCESS, ANY LOCAL, STATE, OR
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT TRANSMISSION PLANNING PROCESSES AND ANY
TRANSMISSION PLANNING PROCESSES REQUIRED BY PJM, INCLUDING:
A. ALTERNATIVES TO THE PROPOSED TRANSMISSION
LINE;
B. AN ANALYSIS OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGIES AND WHETHER THE USE OF THE TECHNOLOGIES WILL ADDRESS THE
SAME NEED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, MORE EFFICIENTLY OR COST–EFFECTIVELY
THAN THE PROPOSED TRANSMISSION LINE;
– 169 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
C. ALTERNATIVE ROUTINGS;
D. TECHNOLOGIES OR MODIFICATIONS TO ONE OR MORE
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS IN THE STATE THAT ARE OWNED BY THE
APPLICANT OR ITS AFFILIATES AND THAT COULD AVOID THE NEED FOR THE
TRANSMISSION LINE;
E. THE COST TO RATEPAYERS;
F. RESOURCE ADEQUACY;
G. ENERGY EFFICIENCY AND DEMAND RESPONSE;
H. THE IMPACT OF THE PROJECT ON THE ENVIRONMENT;
I. A REVIEW OF ANY RELEVANT DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM
INFORMATION MADE AVAILABLE TO THE APPLICANT THAT WOULD DEMONSTRATE
THAT THE TRANSMISSION LINE WOULD COST–EFFECTIVELY SERVE THE
INTEGRATED ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION–DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM; AND
J. ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION
CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE; AND
2. AN ANALYSIS OF THE TRANSMISSION LINE ROUTE
SELECTION, INCLUDING:
A. RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH THE COSTS ESTIMATES;
B. COST CONTAINMENT EFFORTS;
C. CONSTRUCTION SCHEDULE;
D. ACQUISITION OF LAND AND RIGHTS–OF–WAY;
E. OUTAGE COORDINATION; AND
F. THE APPLICANT’S EXPERIENCE WORKING WITH
COMMUNITIES AND STAKEHOLDERS ON ROUTE CONSIDERATION.
[(iii)] (V) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and
subject to subparagraph [(iv)] (VI) of this paragraph, the Commission may issue a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for the construction of [an overhead] A
– 170 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
transmission line only if the applicant for the certificate of public convenience and
necessity:
1. is an electric company; or
2. is or, on the start of commercial operation of the
[overhead] transmission line, will be subject to regulation as a public utility by an officer
or an agency of the United States.
[(iv)] (VI) The Commission may not issue a certificate of public
convenience and necessity for the construction of [an overhead] A transmission line in the
electric distribution service territory of an electric company to an applicant other than an
electric company if:
1. the [overhead] transmission line is to be located solely
within the electric distribution service territory of that electric company; and
2. the cost of the [overhead] transmission line is to be paid
solely by that electric company and its ratepayers.
[(v)] (VII) 1. This subparagraph applies to the construction of
[an overhead] A transmission line for which a certificate of public convenience and
necessity is required under this section.
2. On issuance of a certificate of public convenience and
necessity for the construction of [an overhead] A transmission line, a person may acquire
by condemnation, in accordance with Title 12 of the Real Property Article, any property or
right necessary for the construction or maintenance of the transmission line.
(4) (i) [Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, for
construction related to an existing overhead transmission line designed to carry a voltage
in excess of 69,000 volts, the Commission shall waive the requirement to obtain a certificate
of public convenience and necessity if the Commission finds that the construction does not:
1. require the person to obtain new real property or
additional rights–of–way through eminent domain; or
2. require larger or higher structures to accommodate:
A. increased voltage; or
B. larger conductors.
(ii) 1. For construction related to an existing overhead
transmission line, including repairs, that is necessary to avoid an imminent safety hazard
or reliability risk, a person may undertake the necessary construction] A PERSON MAY
– 171 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
COMPLETE CONSTRUCTION RELATED TO AN EXISTING TRANSMISSION LINE,
INCLUDING REPAIRS, IF THE CONSTRUCTION IS NECESSARY TO AVOID AN IMMINENT
SAFETY HAZARD OR RELIABILITY RISK.
[2.] (II) Within 30 days after construction is completed
under [subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph] SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, a person shall file a report with the Commission describing the work that
was completed.
(c) (1) On receipt of an application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under this section, the Commission shall provide notice immediately or require
the applicant to provide notice immediately of the application to:
(i) the Department of Planning;
(ii) the governing body, and if applicable the executive, of each
county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line is proposed to be constructed;
(iii) the governing body, and if applicable the executive, of each
county or municipal corporation within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating
station, [overhead] transmission line, or qualified generator lead line;
(iv) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
a county in which any portion of the generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or
qualified generator lead line is proposed to be constructed;
(v) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
each county within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line;
(vi) for a proposed [overhead] transmission line, each owner of land
and each owner of adjacent land; and
(vii) all other interested persons.
(2) The Commission, when sending the notice required under paragraph
(1) of this subsection, shall forward a copy of the application to:
(i) each appropriate State unit and unit of local government for
review, evaluation, and comment regarding the significance of the proposal to State,
area–wide, and local plans or programs; and
(ii) each member of the General Assembly included under paragraph
(1)(iv) and (v) of this subsection who requests a copy of the application.
– 172 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(3) On receipt of an application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under this section, the Commission shall provide notice of the application on the
Commission’s social media platforms and website.
(d) (1) (i) The Commission shall provide an opportunity for public
comment and hold a public hearing on the application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity in each county and municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of a generating station, [an overhead] A transmission line designed to carry a
voltage in excess of 69,000 volts, or a qualified generator lead line is proposed to be located.
(ii) The Commission may hold the public hearing virtually rather
than in person if the Commission provides a comparable opportunity for public comment
and participation in the hearing.
(2) The Commission shall hold the public hearing jointly with the
governing body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of the generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or qualified generator
lead line is proposed to be located, unless the governing body declines to participate in the
hearing.
(3) (i) Once in each of the 4 successive weeks immediately before the
hearing date, the Commission shall provide weekly notice of the public hearing and an
opportunity for public comment:
1. by advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county or municipal corporation affected by the application;
2. on two types of social media; and
3. on the Commission’s website.
(ii) Before a public hearing, the Commission shall coordinate with
the governing body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of the generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or qualified generator
lead line is proposed to be located to identify additional options for providing, in an efficient
and cost–effective manner, notice of the public hearing through other types of media that
are familiar to the residents of the county or municipal corporation.
(4) (i) On the day of a public hearing, an informational sign shall be
posted prominently at or near each public entrance of the building in which the public
hearing will be held.
(ii) The informational sign required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall:
– 173 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. state the time, room number, and subject of the public
hearing; and
2. be at least 17 by 22 inches in size.
(iii) If the public hearing is conducted virtually rather than in person,
the Commission shall provide information on the hearing prominently on the Commission’s
website.
(5) (i) The Commission shall ensure presentation and
recommendations from each interested State unit, and shall allow representatives of each
State unit to sit during hearing of all parties.
(ii) The Commission shall allow each State unit 15 days after the
conclusion of the hearing to modify the State unit’s initial recommendations.
(e) The Commission shall take final action on an application for a certificate of
public convenience and necessity only after due consideration of:
(1) the recommendation of the governing body of each county or municipal
corporation in which any portion of the construction of the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line is proposed to be located;
(2) the effect of the generating station, [overhead] transmission line, or
qualified generator lead line on:
(i) the stability and reliability of the electric system;
(ii) economics;
(iii) esthetics;
(iv) historic sites;
(v) WHEN APPLICABLE, aviation safety as determined by the
Maryland Aviation Administration and the administrator of the Federal Aviation
Administration;
(vi) when applicable, air quality and water pollution; and
(vii) the availability of means for the required timely disposal of
wastes produced by any generating station;
(3) the effect of climate change on the generating station, [overhead]
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line based on the best available scientific
information recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change;
– 174 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(4) for a generating station:
(i) the consistency of the application with the comprehensive plan
and zoning of each county or municipal corporation where any portion of the generating
station is proposed to be located;
(ii) the efforts to resolve any issues presented by a county or
municipal corporation where any portion of the generating station is proposed to be located;
(iii) the impact of the generating station on the quantity of annual
and long–term statewide greenhouse gas emissions, measured in the manner specified in §
2–1202 of the Environment Article and based on the best available scientific information
recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change; and
(iv) the consistency of the application with the State’s climate
commitments for reducing statewide greenhouse gas emissions, including those specified
in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article; and
(5) for a solar energy generating station specified under § 7–218 of this
subtitle, whether the owner of a proposed solar energy generating station complies with
the site requirements under § 7–218(f) of this subtitle.
(f) For the construction of [an overhead] A transmission line, in addition to the
considerations listed in subsection (e) of this section, the Commission shall:
(1) take final action on an application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity only after due consideration of:
(i) the need to meet existing and future demand for electric service;
[and]
(ii) EVIDENCE THAT ALTERNATIVES HAVE BEEN CONSIDERED
BY THE APPLICANT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B)(3)(IV) OF THIS SECTION;
AND
(III) for construction related to a new [overhead] transmission line,
the alternative routes that the applicant considered, including the estimated capital and
operating costs of each alternative route and a statement of the reason why the alternative
route was rejected;
(2) require as an ongoing condition of the certificate of public convenience
and necessity that an applicant comply with:
– 175 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) all relevant agreements with PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., or its
successors, related to the ongoing operation and maintenance of the [overhead]
transmission line; and
(ii) all obligations imposed by the North America Electric Reliability
Council and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission related to the ongoing operation
and maintenance of the [overhead] transmission line; and
(3) require the applicant to identify whether the [overhead] transmission
line is proposed to be constructed on:
(i) an existing brownfields site;
(ii) property that is subject to an existing easement; or
(iii) a site where a tower structure or components of a tower structure
used to support an overhead transmission line exist.
(g) (1) The Commission may not authorize, and a person may not undertake,
the construction of an overhead transmission line that is aligned with and within 1 mile of
either end of a public airport runway, unless:
(i) the Federal Aviation Administration determines that the
construction of an overhead transmission line will not constitute a hazard to air navigation;
and
(ii) the Maryland Aviation Administration concurs in that
determination.
(2) A privately owned airport runway shall qualify as a public airport
runway under this subsection only if the runway has been on file with the Federal Aviation
Administration for at least 2 years as being open to the public without restriction.
(h) (1) A county or municipal corporation has the authority to approve or deny
any local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued
under this section or a distributed generation certificate of public convenience and necessity
issued under § 7–207.4 of this subtitle.
(2) A county or municipal corporation shall approve or deny any local
permits required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under this
section or a distributed generation certificate of public convenience and necessity issued
under § 7–207.4 of this subtitle:
(i) within a reasonable time; and
– 176 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(ii) to the extent local laws are not preempted by State law, in
accordance with local laws.
(3) A county or municipal corporation may not condition the approval of a
local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under
this section or a distributed generation certificate of public convenience and necessity
issued under § 7–207.4 of this subtitle on receipt of any of the following approvals for any
aspect of a generating station, [an overhead] A transmission line, or a qualified lead line
proposed to be constructed under the certificate:
(i) a conditional use approval;
(ii) a special exception approval; or
(iii) a floating zone approval.
7–207.6.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON OR
BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND EVERY 4 YEARS THEREAFTER, EACH OWNER OR
OPERATOR OF A TRANSMISSION LINE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION A REPORT
THAT:
(I) IDENTIFIES AREAS OF SIGNIFICANT TRANSMISSION
CONGESTION COSTS FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 3 YEARS AND ANY
REASONABLY FORESEEABLE TRANSMISSION CONSTRAINTS FOR THE 5 YEARS
IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE DATE OF THE REPORT;
(II) IDENTIFIES THE PROJECTED OR ACTUAL COST TO
RATEPAYERS AS A RESULT OF PAST AND PROJECTED FUTURE TRANSMISSION
CONGESTION;
(III) IDENTIFIES THE FEASIBILITY AND COST OF USING
ALTERNATIVE MEANS OF ADDRESSING TRANSMISSION CONGESTION, INCLUDING
THE USE OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES;
(IV) IDENTIFIES THE ECONOMIC, ENVIRONMENTAL, AND SOCIAL
ISSUES POSED BY THE USE OF EACH ALTERNATIVE MEANS IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM
(III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH;
– 177 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) DESCRIBES THE TRANSMISSION LINE RATING
METHODOLOGY USED, INCLUDING ANY RELIANCE ON STATIC RATINGS OR SEASONAL
ASSUMPTIONS;
(VI) DISTINGUISHES BETWEEN REGIONAL AND LOCAL
TRANSMISSION CONSTRAINTS;
(VII) IF FEASIBLE, PROPOSES AN ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGY IMPLEMENTATION PLAN TO ADDRESS AREAS OF TRANSMISSION
CONGESTION IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
(VIII) REFERENCES THE PJM PLANNING INPUTS, OR ANY OTHER
PLANNING INPUTS, USED TO SUPPORT THE CONGESTION FORECASTS AND, IF
APPLICABLE, PROPOSED ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGY
IMPLEMENTATION PLAN INCLUDED IN THE REPORT.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY MODIFY THE REPORTING SCHEDULE
SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A TRANSMISSION LINE MAY USE ANY
AVAILABLE DATA FROM PJM OR OTHER SOURCES IN COMPLETING THE REPORT
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE EACH REPORT
SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE REPORT.
7–208.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Construction” has the meaning stated in § 7–207 of this subtitle.
(3) “Generating station” does not include:
(i) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity for the purpose of:
A. onsite emergency backup at a facility when service from
the electric company is interrupted due to electric distribution or transmission system
failure or when there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
and
– 178 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
B. test and maintenance operations necessary to ensure
functionality of the generating unit or facility in the event of an interruption of service from
the electric company due to electric distribution or transmission system failure or when
there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
2. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid;
3. is subject to a permit to construct issued by the
Department of the Environment; and
4. is installed at a facility that is part of critical
infrastructure if the facility complies with all applicable regulations regarding noise level
and testing hours; or
(ii) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that
satisfy item (i) of this paragraph.
(4) “Qualified offshore wind project” has the meaning stated in § 7–701 of
this title.
(5) “Qualified submerged renewable energy line” means:
(i) a line carrying electricity supply and connecting a qualified
offshore wind project to the transmission system; and
(ii) a line in which the portions of the line crossing any submerged
lands or any part of a beach erosion control district are buried or submerged.
(b) This section applies to any person:
(1) constructing a generating station and its associated [overhead]
transmission lines designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts;
(2) exercising the right of condemnation in connection with the
construction; or
(3) constructing a qualified submerged renewable energy line.
(c) (1) To obtain the certificate of public convenience and necessity required
under § 7–207 of this subtitle for construction under this section, a person shall file an
application with the Commission at least 2 years before construction of the facility will
commence.
(2) The Commission may waive the 2–year requirement on a showing of
good cause.
– 179 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) The applicant shall:
(1) include in an application under this section the information that the
Commission requests initially; and
(2) furnish any additional information that the Commission requests
subsequently.
(e) (1) On the receipt of an application under this section, together with any
additional information requested under subsection (d)(2) of this section, the Commission
shall provide notice to:
(i) for a proposed [overhead] transmission line, each owner of land
and each owner of adjacent land;
(ii) all interested persons;
(iii) the Department of Agriculture;
(iv) the Department of Commerce;
(v) the Department of the Environment;
(vi) the Department of Natural Resources;
(vii) the Department of Transportation;
(viii) the Department of Planning; and
(ix) the Maryland Energy Administration.
(2) On receipt of an application under this section, and whenever
additional information is received under subsection (d)(2) of this section, the Commission
shall provide notice immediately or require the applicant to provide notice immediately to:
(i) the governing body of each county or municipal corporation in
which any portion of the generating station or the associated [overhead] transmission lines
is proposed to be constructed;
(ii) the governing body of each county or municipal corporation
within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating station or the associated [overhead]
transmission lines;
– 180 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(iii) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
a county in which any portion of the generating station or the associated [overhead]
transmission lines is proposed to be constructed; and
(iv) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
each county within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating station or the
associated [overhead] transmission lines.
(3) The Commission shall hold a public hearing on the application as
required by § 7–207 of this subtitle after:
(i) the receipt of any additional information requested under
subsection (d)(2) of this section that the Commission considers necessary; and
(ii) any publication of notice the Commission considers to be proper.
(4) (i) At the public hearing, the Commission shall ensure presentation
of the information and recommendations of the State units specified in paragraph (1) of
this subsection and shall allow the official representative of each unit to sit during hearing
of all parties.
(ii) Based on the evidence relating to the unit’s areas of concern, the
Commission shall allow each unit 15 days after the conclusion of the hearing to modify or
affirm the unit’s initial recommendations.
(f) Within 90 days after the conclusion of the hearing on an application under
this section, the Commission shall:
(1) (i) grant a certificate of public convenience and necessity
unconditionally;
(ii) grant the certificate, subject to conditions the Commission
determines to be appropriate; or
(iii) deny the certificate; and
(2) notify all interested parties of its decision.
(g) (1) The Commission shall include in each certificate it issues under
subsection (f) of this section:
(i) the requirements of the federal and State environmental laws
and standards that are identified by the Department of the Environment; and
(ii) the methods and conditions that the Commission determines are
appropriate to comply with those environmental laws and standards.
– 181 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The Commission may not adopt any method or condition under
paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection that the Department of the Environment determines is
inconsistent with federal and State environmental laws and standards.
(h) (1) A decision of the Commission regarding the issuance of a certificate
requires the vote of a majority of the members of the Commission.
(2) If a majority of the members of the Commission fails to reach agreement
on the conditions to be attached to a conditional certificate, the certificate shall be denied.
(i) The grant of a certificate by the Commission to any person under subsection
(f) of this section constitutes:
(1) authority for the person to dredge and construct bulkheads in the
waters or private wetlands of the State and to appropriate or use the waters; and
(2) registration and a permit to construct, as required under Title 2,
Subtitle 4 of the Environment Article.
(j) (1) A county or municipal corporation has the authority to approve or deny
any local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued
under this section.
(2) A county or municipal corporation shall approve or deny any local
permits required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under this
section:
(i) within a reasonable time; and
(ii) to the extent local laws are not preempted by State law, in
accordance with local laws.
(3) A county or municipal corporation may not condition the approval of a
local permit required under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under
this section on receipt of any of the following approvals for any aspect of a generating
station, an [overhead] transmission line, or a qualified lead line proposed to be constructed
under the certificate:
(i) a conditional use approval;
(ii) a special exception approval; or
(iii) a floating zone approval.
7–216.1.
– 182 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Program” means the Maryland Energy Storage Program.
(c) (1) The Commission shall establish the Maryland Energy Storage
Program.
(2) The Program shall be implemented no later than July 1, 2025.
(3) The Program shall include competitive procurement mechanisms to
reach a minimum of 3,000 megawatts of energy storage, or the maximum cost–effective
amount of energy storage that can be deployed, by the end of delivery year 2033.
(4) The Program may include:
(i) a system of energy storage credits and market–based incentives
designed to:
1. develop a robust energy storage market in the State; and
2. deploy energy storage devices in a cost–effective manner;
(ii) a requirement that investor–owned electric companies:
1. install or contract for energy storage devices; or
2. contract for credits from an energy storage project under §
7–216 of this subtitle;
(iii) a requirement that Program participants make reasonable
efforts to apply for all applicable State and federal grants, rebates, tax credits, loan
guarantees, and other similar benefits as the benefits become available; or
(iv) any other mechanism or policy that the Commission determines
is appropriate to achieve the goal of a robust, cost–effective energy storage system in the
State.
(D) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE STATUS OF THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING:
(1) THE CAPACITY OF OPERATIONAL ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES IN
THE STATE THAT IS BEING COUNTED TOWARD THE CAPACITY GOAL ESTABLISHED
UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION, DISAGGREGATED BY:
– 183 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) ELECTRIC COMPANY SERVICE TERRITORY;
(II) ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE CAPACITY;
(III) FRONT–OF–METER TRANSMISSION–LEVEL STORAGE;
(IV) FRONT–OF–METER DISTRIBUTION–LEVEL STORAGE;
(V) BEHIND–THE–METER STORAGE; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER RELEVANT CATEGORY, AS DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION;
(2) WHETHER THE CAPACITY GOAL ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION SHOULD BE ALTERED BASED ON CURRENT
TECHNOLOGY COSTS, ENERGY STORAGE DEPLOYMENT TRENDS, ELECTRIC SYSTEM
RELIABILITY, AND RATEPAYER IMPACTS;
(3) BARRIERS TO ACHIEVING THE GOALS IDENTIFIED UNDER THIS
SECTION; AND
(4) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS
PERTINENT.
7–221.
The General Assembly finds and declares that energy efficiency is:
(1) among the least expensive ways to meet the energy demands of the
State;
(2) a means of affordable, reliable, and clean energy for consumers of
Maryland; and
(3) one method to achieve Maryland’s climate commitments for reducing
statewide greenhouse gas emissions, including those required under Title 2, Subtitle 12 of
the Environment Article.
7–222.
(a) Subject to review and approval by the Commission, each electric company,
[each gas company other than a gas company subject to § 4–207(a) of this article,] the
Department, and, if required in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, each midsize
electric cooperative shall develop and implement programs and services in accordance with
– 184 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
§§ 7–223, 7–224, and 7–225 of this subtitle to encourage and promote the efficient use and
conservation of energy, demand response, and beneficial electrification by consumers,
electric companies, [gas companies,] and the Department in support of the greenhouse gas
emissions reduction goals and targets required under Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the
Environment Article.
(b) As directed by the Commission, [each gas company subject to § 4–207(a) of
this article,] each municipal electric [or gas] utility, each small rural electric cooperative,
and, if required in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, each midsize electric
cooperative shall include energy efficiency and conservation, demand response, and
beneficial electrification programs or services as part of their service to their customers.
(c) (1) In accordance with this subsection, each midsize electric cooperative
shall be subject to either subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section.
(2) Each midsize electric cooperative shall offer programs and services to
customers in accordance with:
(i) subsection (b) of this section through December 31, 2026; and
(ii) on or after January 1, 2027, and as the Commission directs,
either subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section.
(3) Not later than October 1, 2025, the Commission shall determine if it is
in the public interest for a midsize electric cooperative to offer programs and services to
customers in accordance with subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section starting
January 1, 2027, and for all subsequent years.
(4) Each midsize electric cooperative shall provide the following
information to the Commission to assist in making a determination under paragraph (3) of
this subsection:
(i) anticipated costs and bill impacts;
(ii) a description of the anticipated program offerings;
(iii) the anticipated cost–effectiveness of the residential, commercial,
and industrial sector subportfolios based on the cost–effectiveness tests in § 7–225(d)(3)(i)
of this subtitle;
(iv) the anticipated electricity savings and greenhouse gas emissions
reductions; and
(v) any other information the Commission requires.
– 185 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) The information provided to the Commission under paragraph (4) of
this subsection shall be based on a plan to offer programs and services to customers that
complies with the requirements of an electric company subject to subsection (a) of this
section for the 3–year program cycle starting January 1, 2027.
(6) When making a public interest determination under paragraph (3) of
this subsection the Commission, at a minimum, shall consider the requirements under §
7–225(d)(3) of this subtitle that are considered when approving a plan of an electric
company that is subject to subsection (a) of this section.
(7) Starting October 1, 2025, if the Commission determines that it is in the
public interest for a midsize electric cooperative to be subject to subsection (a) of this
section, the midsize electric cooperative shall comply with all requirements of an electric
company subject to subsection (a) of this section for program cycles starting on and after
January 1, 2027.
(8) On or before March 1 each year, starting in 2026, each midsize electric
cooperative directed by the Commission to include programs or services under subsection
(b) of this section shall submit to the Commission a report quantifying the gains in energy
efficiency and reductions in greenhouse gas emissions achieved during the previous year.
(d) The Commission shall encourage and promote the efficient use and
conservation of energy in support of the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and
targets required under Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the
Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle, and specified in § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle
by:
(1) requiring each electric company [and gas company] to establish any
program or service that the Commission determines to be appropriate and cost–effective;
(2) adopting rate–making policies that provide, through a surcharge line
item on customer bills:
(i) full cost recovery of reasonably incurred costs for programs and
services established under item (1) of this subsection, including full recovery on a current
basis on or before January 1, 2028;
(ii) on or before December 31, 2032, the elimination of any unpaid
costs and unamortized costs that:
1. A. existed on December 31, 2024; or
B. were incurred before January 1, 2028; and
2. were accrued for the purpose of achieving statutory
targets for annual incremental gross energy savings;
– 186 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(iii) compensation for any unpaid costs and unamortized costs under
item (ii) of this item at not more than each electric company’s and each gas company’s
average cost of outstanding debt; and
(iv) reasonable financial performance incentives and penalties for
investor–owned electric companies [and gas companies,] as appropriate; and
(3) ensuring that adoption of electric customer choice under Subtitle 5 of
this title [and gas customer choice under Subtitle 6 of this title] does not adversely impact
these goals and targets.
(e) The Commission shall, by regulation or order, require each electric company
[and each gas company subject to subsection (a) of this section] that has submitted to the
Commission, on or before July 1, 2024, a plan for achieving electricity [or gas] savings and
demand reduction targets to disclose the following information in a form and format readily
understandable to the average customer:
(1) that the surcharge imposed in accordance with subsection (d) of this
section includes the cost of paying down the unpaid costs and unamortized costs that were
accrued over time by programs and services required by the Commission dating back to
2008; and
(2) the period of time that the surcharge will include excess charges to pay
down the unpaid costs and unamortized costs.
(F) A GAS COMPANY THAT RECOVERED COSTS UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2)
OF THIS SECTION ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, SHALL CONTINUE TO RECOVER
ANY PROGRAM AND SERVICE COSTS REASONABLY INCURRED THROUGH DECEMBER
31, 2026, INCLUDING UNPAID AND UNAMORTIZED COSTS UNDER SUBSECTION
(D)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION, THROUGH THE RATE–MAKING POLICIES UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(2) OF THIS SECTION UNTIL ALL REASONABLY INCURRED PROGRAM
AND SERVICE COSTS HAVE BEEN RECOVERED.
7–223.
(a) On or before January 1, 2025, and on or before January 1 every 3 years,
starting in 2027, the Commission shall, by regulation or order, require each electric
company [and each gas company] subject to § 7–222(a) of this subtitle to develop and
implement a plan that:
(1) covers appropriate ratepayer classes;
(2) starting in 2027, covers a 3–year program cycle; and
– 187 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) achieves the greenhouse gas emissions reduction target established for
the electric company [or gas company] under subsection (b) of this section through
cost–effective energy efficiency and conservation programs and services, demand response
programs and services, and beneficial electrification programs and services.
(b) (1) For 2025 and 2026, and for each 3–year program cycle starting in 2027,
the Commission shall establish a greenhouse gas emissions reduction target for each
electric company [and each gas company] subject to § 7–222(a) of this subtitle as provided
in this subsection.
(2) When establishing greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets under
this subsection, the Commission shall measure the greenhouse gas emissions from
electricity and gas, and the intensities of those emissions, using current data and
projections from the Department of the Environment.
(3) The greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets established under this
subsection shall be measured:
(i) in metric tons; and
(ii) relative to the greenhouse gas emissions associated with the
electric company’s [or gas company’s] weather–normalized gross retail sales and losses in
a baseline year, as determined by the Commission.
(4) By the dates specified in § 7–225(a) of this subtitle, the Commission
shall establish greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets for each electric company plan
that will achieve at least the greenhouse gas emissions reduction equivalent, measured on
a lifecycle basis using the emission intensities under paragraph (2) of this subsection, of
the following annual electricity savings percentages, calculated as a percentage of the
electric company’s 2016 weather–normalized gross retail sales and electricity losses:
(i) 2.0% in 2024;
(ii) 2.25% each year in 2025 and 2026; [and]
(iii) [2.5% each year in 2027 and after] 1.75% EACH YEAR IN 2027
THROUGH 2029;
(IV) 2.0% EACH YEAR IN 2030 THROUGH 2032;
(V) 2.25% EACH YEAR IN 2033 THROUGH 2035; AND
(VI) 2.5% EACH YEAR IN 2036 AND AFTER.
– 188 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(5) [On or before January 1, 2025, and on or before January 1 every 3 years,
starting in 2027, the Commission shall establish greenhouse gas emissions reduction
targets for each gas company plan that will achieve at least the greenhouse gas emissions
reduction equivalent, measured on a lifecycle basis using the emission intensities under
paragraph (2) of this subsection, of the gas savings achieved by the gas company for the
2021–2023 program cycle.
(6)] The Commission shall take into consideration the most recent final plan
adopted under § 2–1205 of the Environment Article when establishing the greenhouse gas
emissions reduction targets under this subsection.
[(7)] (6) For 2025 and 2026:
(i) the Commission shall, after making appropriate findings,
determine whether existing electric company [and gas company] plans must be modified to
comply with § 7–225(d) of this subtitle; and
(ii) electric companies [and gas companies]:
1. shall provide information as required by the Commission
to assist in making the determination under item (i) of this paragraph; and
2. are only required to file new plans in accordance with this
section if directed by the Commission.
(c) The Commission may give priority to long–lived greenhouse gas emissions
reduction measures in the plans by establishing a minimum weighted average measure life
for the plan of each electric company [and gas company].
(d) Contributions to greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and targets in a
plan of an electric company [or a gas company]:
(1) may, notwithstanding § 7–222(d)(2) of this subtitle, include recovery of
the reasonable and prudent costs from programs that are not behind–the–meter programs
in a base rate proceeding, subject to Commission approval; and
(2) may not include the increased adoption of electric vehicles.
(e) (1) [Beginning] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
BEGINNING January 1, 2025,:
(I) at least 80% of the greenhouse gas emissions reductions counted
toward each electric company’s [and each gas company’s] greenhouse gas emissions
reduction targets established under this section shall [come from] INCLUDE:
– 189 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) behind–the–meter programs, which may include deployment of
energy storage facilities; AND
(II) FOR 2027 THROUGH 2029 SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, FOR 2027 THROUGH 2029, NOT MORE THAN 20% OF THE
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS COUNTED TOWARD EACH ELECTRIC
COMPANY’S GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION TARGETS ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
1. COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATION THAT IS
INTERCONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM; AND
2. SOLAR ENERGY GENERATION FACILITIES THAT ARE
INTERCONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED
TO AUTHORIZE AN ELECTRIC COMPANY TO BUILD, OWN, OR OPERATE ELECTRIC
GENERATING FACILITIES OR ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES TO MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(3) GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS FROM SOURCES
SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE USED TO
MEET THE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION TARGETS UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
7–225.
(a) As soon as possible in 2024, and at least 8 months before the filing deadline
for plans after 2024, the Commission shall issue an order that determines the greenhouse
gas emissions reduction targets required under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle and the
greenhouse gas emissions reductions required under § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(b) (1) (i) If directed by the Commission in 2024, and on or before July 1
every 3 years, starting in 2026, each electric company [and each gas company] subject to §
7–222(a) of this subtitle that submitted a plan for achieving electricity savings and demand
reduction targets to the Commission before July 1, 2024, and the Department, shall consult
with the technical staff of the Commission, the Office of People’s Counsel, the Maryland
Energy Administration, and the Department of the Environment regarding the design and
adequacy of its plans for achieving the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets
established by the Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle and specified in §
7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(ii) On or before October 1, 2024, and on or before July 1 every 3
years, starting in 2026, each electric company [and each gas company] subject to § 7–222(a)
– 190 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
of this subtitle that did not submit a plan for achieving electricity savings and demand
reduction targets to the Commission before July 1, 2024, shall comply with the consulting
requirements under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(2) Each electric company [and each gas company] subject to § 7–222(a) of
this subtitle shall provide the technical staff of the Commission, the Office of People’s
Counsel, the Maryland Energy Administration, and the Department of the Environment
with any additional information regarding its plan, as requested.
(c) (1) (i) If directed by the Commission in 2024, and on or before
September 1 every 3 years, starting in 2026, each electric company [and each gas company]
subject to § 7–222(a) of this subtitle that submitted a plan for achieving electricity savings
and demand reduction targets to the Commission before July 1, 2024, and the Department,
shall submit its plan to the Commission.
(ii) On or before December 1, 2024, and on or before September 1
every 3 years, starting in 2026, each electric company [and each gas company] that did not
submit a plan for achieving electricity savings and demand reduction targets to the
Commission before July 1, 2024, shall submit its plan to the Commission.
(2) Each plan shall detail a proposal for achieving greenhouse gas
emissions reduction targets for 3 subsequent calendar years.
(3) (i) Each plan shall:
1. include:
A. a description of the proposed programs and services;
B. anticipated costs;
C. projected benefits, including greenhouse gas emissions
reductions[,] AND electricity savings[, and gas savings]; and
D. any other information requested by the Commission; and
2. address residential, commercial, and industrial sectors as
appropriate, including low–income communities.
(ii) A plan of the Department shall include:
1. a definition of “low–income individual” to be used in the
procurement or provision of energy efficiency, conservation, and greenhouse gas emissions
reduction programs and services;
– 191 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. a description of the steps proposed to ensure insulation
materials meet the requirements under § 7–224 of this subtitle; and
3. a proposed average lifetime measure threshold that:
A. encourages the delivery of insulation and weatherization
measures; and
B. is developed through a stakeholder engagement process.
(iii) A plan of an electric company shall include the provision or
procurement of programs and services for residential beneficial electrification.
(d) (1) The Commission shall review the plan of each electric company[, each
gas company,] and the Department to determine whether the plan is adequate and
cost–effective in achieving the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets established by
the Commission under §§ 7–223(b) and 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(2) The Commission shall consider any written findings provided by the
Maryland Energy Administration, the Department of the Environment, and the Office of
People’s Counsel regarding the design and adequacy of the plan.
(3) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, in approving, modifying, or
denying the plan of an electric company [or a gas company], the Commission shall consider:
(i) the cost–effectiveness of the residential, commercial, and
industrial sector subportfolios by using:
1. the primary State jurisdiction–specific test, as developed,
updated, or approved by the Commission, to determine the cost–effectiveness of a program
or service prospectively, including consideration of:
A. participant nonenergy benefits;
B. utility nonenergy benefits; and
C. societal nonenergy benefits; and
2. a total resource cost test to compare the electricity savings
and demand reduction targets of the program or service with the results of similar
programs or services implemented in other jurisdictions, including:
A. participant nonenergy benefits; and
B. utility nonenergy benefits;
– 192 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(ii) the impact on rates of each ratepayer class;
(iii) the impact on jobs;
(iv) the impact on the environment; and
(v) the impact on the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets
specified in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the Commission
under §§ 7–223(b) and 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(4) Nonenergy benefits considered under paragraph (3) of this subsection
shall be quantifiable and directly related to a program or service.
(5) (i) In approving, modifying, or denying the plan of the Department,
the Commission shall consider:
1. subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
cost–effectiveness of the plan by using the primary State jurisdiction–specific test, as
developed, updated, or approved by the Commission;
2. the impact on rates of each ratepayer class;
3. the impact on jobs;
4. the impact on the environment; and
5. the impact on the greenhouse gas emissions targets
specified in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the Commission
under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle, and specified in § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(ii) The programs and services offered by the Department are not
required to be cost–effective.
(e) The Department of the Environment shall prepare and submit to the
Commission an analysis regarding the adequacy of the plan in supporting the State’s
greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals specified in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the
Environment Article, established by the Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle, and
required under § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
7–226.
(a) (1) Each electric company[, each gas company,] and the Department shall
provide to the Commission every 6 months an update on plan implementation and progress
made toward achieving the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets established by the
Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle and required under § 7–224(a)(2) of this
subtitle.
– 193 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The Commission shall monitor and analyze the impact of each program
and service to ensure that the outcome of each program and service provides the best
possible results.
(3) In monitoring and analyzing the impact of a program or service under
paragraph (2) of this subsection, if the Commission finds that the outcome of the program
or service may not be providing the best possible results, the Commission shall direct the
electric company[, the gas company,] or the Department to include in its next update under
paragraph (1) of this subsection specific measures to address the findings.
(b) (1) At least once each year, each electric company [and each gas company]
shall notify affected customers of the energy efficiency and conservation and greenhouse
gas reduction charges imposed and benefits conferred.
(2) The notice shall be provided by publication on the company’s website
and inclusion with billing information such as a bill insert or bill message.
(c) On or before May 1 each year, the Commission shall report, in accordance with
§ 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly on:
(1) the status of programs and services approved under this subtitle,
including an evaluation of the impact of the programs and services that are directed to
low–income communities and other particular classes of ratepayers;
(2) a recommendation for the appropriate funding level to adequately fund
these programs and services;
(3) the per capita electricity consumption and the winter and summer peak
demand for the previous calendar year; and
(4) beginning in 2026, progress made toward reducing greenhouse gas
emissions in accordance with §§ 7–223 and 7–224 of this subtitle.
7–227.
(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Commission may not require or allow an
electric company [or a gas company] to require a customer to authorize the electric
company [or gas company] to control the amount of the customer’s electricity usage [or gas
usage].
(b) A customer may provide consent to participate in a program of an electric
company [or a gas company] that provides direct load control or other utility manipulation
of a customer’s electricity [or gas] usage.
– 194 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
7–228.
(a) Each electric company [and each gas company] shall promote the availability
of federal and State rebates, tax credits, and incentives that can be used to support energy
efficiency investments, energy efficient and non–fossil–fuel–powered appliances and
cooking equipment, breaker box upgrades, and portable heating and cooling equipment.
(b) The Commission shall adopt regulations to carry out this section.
7–321.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM”
MEANS A MOVABLE PHOTOVOLTAIC SOLAR ENERGY GENERATION DEVICE THAT IS:
(1) DESIGNED TO BE CONNECTED TO A BUILDING’S ELECTRICAL
SYSTEM THROUGH A STANDARD ELECTRICAL OUTLET;
(2) PRIMARILY INTENDED TO OFFSET PART OF THE BUILDING’S
ELECTRICITY CONSUMPTION;
(3) LIMITED TO SUPPLYING A MAXIMUM POWER OUTPUT OF NOT
MORE THAN 391 WATTS BACK TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM OF THE BUILDING; AND
(4) CERTIFIED BY UNDERWRITERS LABORATORY OR AN EQUIVALENT
NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED TESTING LABORATORY.
(B) A PERSON MAY PURCHASE AND INSTALL NOT MORE THAN ONE
PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM PER ELECTRIC METER FOR
RESIDENTIAL USE ONLY.
(C) A PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM:
(1) IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF §§ 7–306 AND 7–306.1
OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR INCLUSION IN MEETING THE RENEWABLE
ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD; AND
(3) MAY NOT GENERATE RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS OF ANY TYPE.
(D) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY:
– 195 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) MAY NOT REQUIRE A CUSTOMER USING A PORTABLE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM TO:
(I) OBTAIN THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S APPROVAL BEFORE
INSTALLING OR USING THE PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM;
(II) PAY ANY FEE OR CHARGE RELATED TO THE PORTABLE
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM’S ABILITY TO FEED ELECTRICITY BACK INTO
THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM; OR
(III) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION,
INSTALL ANY ADDITIONAL CONTROLS OR EQUIPMENT BEYOND WHAT IS
INTEGRATED INTO THE PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM; AND
(2) IS NOT LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGE CAUSED BY A PORTABLE SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM.
(E) A CUSTOMER USING A PORTABLE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
SHALL:
(1) NOTIFY THE ELECTRIC COMPANY PROVIDING SERVICE IN THE
SERVICE TERRITORY IN WHICH THE GENERATING SYSTEM WILL BE INSTALLED ONCE
THE GENERATING SYSTEM IS INSTALLED;
(2) PROVIDE TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY PROVIDING SERVICE IN
THE SERVICE TERRITORY IN WHICH THE GENERATING SYSTEM WILL BE OR IS
INSTALLED A CERTIFICATION OF THE SAFETY FEATURES AND MAXIMUM
GENERATING CAPACITY OF THE GENERATING SYSTEM; AND
(3) IF THE GENERATING SYSTEM REQUIRES AN AUTOMATIC LOCKING
DISCONNECT SWITCH TO BE INSTALLED, PAY FOR THE SWITCH INSTALLATION.
7–322.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) “LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–212
OF THIS ARTICLE.
– 196 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(4) “ON–SITE BACKUP GENERATING FACILITY” MEANS A
GENERATING FACILITY THAT IS:
(I) NOT CONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM; AND
(II) CAPABLE OF SERVING AT LEAST 50% OF THE LOAD
REQUIRED BY A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER.
(B) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AND IN
ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 4–212 OF THIS ARTICLE, A LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER SHALL REGISTER WITH THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION AFTER AN INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT IS SIGNED AND BEFORE THE
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER INTERCONNECTS WITH THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY CHARGE A REASONABLE FEE FOR THE
REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION, BY ORDER
OR REGULATION, SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO REGISTER LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMERS.
(2) THE REGISTRATION PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION
SHALL:
(I) APPLY TO NEW OR EXPANDED INTERCONNECTION OF LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMERS;
(II) REQUIRE A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER TO DISCLOSE TO THE
COMMISSION:
1. WHETHER THE CUSTOMER IS PURSUING A
SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR INTERCONNECTION REQUEST WITH THE SAME ELECTRIC
COMPANY, ANOTHER ELECTRIC COMPANY IN THE STATE, OR AN ELECTRIC COMPANY
IN ANOTHER STATE IN THE PJM REGION, AND WHETHER THE APPROVAL OF THE
SIMILAR INTERCONNECTION REQUEST WOULD CAUSE THE CUSTOMER TO
MATERIALLY CHANGE, DELAY, OR WITHDRAW THE INTERCONNECTION REQUEST;
2. WHETHER THE CUSTOMER INTENDS TO:
A. ACQUIRE OR BUILD ENERGY GENERATION SOLELY
FOR THE CUSTOMER;
– 197 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. USE ENERGY SOLELY FROM THE ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM; OR
C. BOTH;
3. INFORMATION ABOUT THE TYPE OF ON–SITE BACKUP
GENERATING FACILITY THAT WOULD BE USED IN THE EVENT OF A SYSTEM OUTAGE;
AND
4. INFORMATION ABOUT:
A. THE AMOUNT OF WATER THAT WOULD BE USED EACH
MONTH;
B. THE SOURCE OF THE WATER THAT WOULD BE USED;
AND
C. THE STATUS OF APPLICATIONS FOR WATER
APPROPRIATION OR USE PERMITS SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
ENVIRONMENT OR A WATER UTILITY OWNED BY THE STATE OR A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT;
(III) ESTABLISH A PROCEDURE TO ALLOW THE COMMISSION TO
ACCESS, WHILE MAINTAINING CONFIDENTIALITY, ANY INFORMATION COLLECTED
BY THE INTERCONNECTING ELECTRIC COMPANY FOR TRANSMISSION PLANNING
ANALYSES; AND
(IV) ESTABLISH ANY OTHER STANDARDS THAT THE
COMMISSION CONSIDERS NECESSARY.
(D) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL CERTIFY WHETHER A REGISTRATION
UNDER THIS SECTION IS COMPLETE WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE
INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THE REGISTRATION
INFORMATION IS INCOMPLETE, THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND ANY TIME FRAME
PROVIDED IN AN ORDER OR REGULATION ESTABLISHING THE REGISTRATION
PROCESS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(E) THE COMMISSION SHALL POST AND REGULARLY UPDATE ON ITS
WEBSITE:
– 198 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(1) A MAP DISPLAYING THE APPROXIMATE PROPOSED LOCATION OF
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS REGISTERED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) OTHER PERTINENT INFORMATION THAT THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST.
(F) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER,
THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION,
ENERGY AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ENVIRONMENT AND
TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE REGISTRATION PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION.
7–505.
(b) (1) The Commission shall issue the orders or adopt the regulations
required under this subsection before the implementation of customer choice.
(2) The Commission shall order a universal service program, to be made
available on a statewide basis, to benefit low–income customers, in accordance with [§
7–512.1 of this subtitle] § 5–5A–08 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE.
7–510.
(d) (2) A residential electricity supplier:
(i) may offer electricity, other than green power, only at a price that
does not exceed [the trailing 12–month average] 110% of the electric company’s standard
offer service rate in the electric company’s service territory as of the date of agreement with
the customer;
(ii) may offer residential electricity supply only for a term not to
exceed [12] 36 months at a time;
(iii) may, for electricity supply other than green power, automatically
renew the term only if the electricity supplier provides notice to the customer 90 days before
and 30 days before renewal;
(iv) may offer green power that meets the requirements of § 7–707 of
this title, but may not automatically renew the term with the customer;
(v) [subject to] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN paragraph (3) of this
subsection, may not offer a variable rate [other than a rate that adjusts for seasonal
variation not more than twice in a single year]; and
– 199 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vi) may not pay a commission or other incentive–based
compensation to an energy salesperson for enrolling customers.
(3) [Paragraph (2)(v) of this subsection does not prohibit the offer and use
of] A RESIDENTIAL ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER MAY OFFER A VARIABLE RATE THAT:
(I) USES time–of–use rates that establish different rates for periods
within a single day;
(II) ADJUSTS FOR SEASONAL VARIATION NOT MORE THAN
TWICE IN A SINGLE YEAR; OR
(III) DOES NOT EXCEED THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S STANDARD
OFFER SERVICE RATE IN THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY AT ANY
TIME DURING THE AGREEMENT WITH THE CUSTOMER.
7–510.3.
(o) The Commission shall establish procedures for an electric customer that is
receiving electricity supply through a community choice aggregator to receive any bill
assistance credit or arrearage assistance to which the customer may be entitled under [§
7–512.1 of this subtitle] § 5–5A–08 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE or any other
federal or State bill and arrearage assistance administered by the Office of Home Energy
Programs.
7–1006.
(a) (1) [The Commission may approve or require an investor–owned electric
company to] SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDING, THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION, MAY offer upfront
incentives or rebates to customers to acquire and install renewable on–site generating
systems if the customer:
(i) enrolls in a pilot program or temporary tariff established under
§ 7–1005 of this subtitle; and
(ii) allows the system to be used for electric distribution system
support services for a period of not less than 5 years.
(2) [The Commission may:
(i) authorize or require an investor–owned electric company to
provide an additional incentive or rebate for low– or moderate–income customers who apply
for an incentive or rebate under this section; and
– 200 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(ii) require an investor–owned electric company to] THE
MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION,
MAY prioritize the offer of incentives or rebates under this section to low– or
moderate–income customers.
(b) [In determining whether to require an investor–owned electric company to
offer an incentive or rebate under this section, the Commission shall consider:
(1) the benefit of reducing the operation of peak generating facilities in
overburdened and underserved communities;
(2) the benefit of resiliency and service outage avoidance for customers
with on–site generating systems; and
(3) the potential for investor–owned electric companies to reduce expenses
relating to electric distribution system infrastructure by leveraging customers’ on–site
generating systems.
(c) The Commission shall consider establishing a limit on the amount of
incentives or rebates issued in a manner that achieves deployment goals while mitigating
potential customer impacts.
(d) The Commission shall consult with the] THE Maryland Energy
Administration, when approving [or requiring] an incentive or rebate under this section,
[to] SHALL ensure that the incentive or rebate is designed to supplement, to the greatest
extent possible, other available State and federal incentives for customer adoption of
renewable on–site generating systems.
7–1007.
(a) An investor–owned electric company may recover all reasonable costs incurred
in[:
(1)] participating in and administering a program under § 7–1005 of this
subtitle[; and
(2) offering an upfront incentive or rebate under § 7–1006 of this subtitle].
(b) To the extent feasible, the costs [listed] in subsection (a) of this section shall
be recovered by the investor–owned electric company within the calendar year in which
those costs were incurred.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this subtitle, an investor–owned electric
company may pursue and use a performance incentive mechanism to cover the cost of using
distributed energy resources or an aggregator of distributed resources under this subtitle.
– 201 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
7–1201.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Large capacity energy resource” means a generating station or energy storage
device that[:
(1) on or before January 1, 2025:
(i) has applied to PJM for interconnection approval; or
(ii) has been approved by PJM for interconnection; and
(2)] has a capacity rating equal to or greater than 20 megawatts after
accounting for the effective load carrying capability.
7–1216.
(a) The Commission may not approve an application for a nuclear energy
generation project submitted under § 7–1212 of this subtitle unless:
(1) the project is connected to the electric system serving the State;
(2) over the duration of the proposed long–term pricing schedule, the
projected net rate impact for an average residential customer, based on annual
consumption of 12,000 kilowatt–hours and combined with the projected net rate impact of
other nuclear energy generation projects, does not exceed an amount determined by the
Commission;
(3) over the duration of the proposed long–term pricing schedule, the
projected net rate impact for all nonresidential customers, considered as a blended average
and combined with the projected net rate impact of other nuclear energy generation
projects, does not exceed a percentage determined by the Commission of nonresidential
customers’ total annual electric bills; and
(4) the price specified in the proposed long–term pricing schedule does not
exceed an amount determined by the Commission.
(b) When calculating the projected net average rate impacts for nuclear energy
generation projects under this section, the Commission shall [apply the same] CONSIDER
THE net long–term cost per megawatt–hour APPLIED to residential and nonresidential
customers.
7–1220.
– 202 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(a) In this section, “zero–emission credit” means [the difference between the price
that a nuclear energy generating station with a long–term pricing schedule approved in an
order issued under § 7–1217 of this subtitle may receive on the wholesale market and the
cost of constructing the nuclear energy generating station] A CREDIT EQUAL TO THE
ENVIRONMENTAL ATTRIBUTES OF 1 MEGAWATT–HOUR OF ELECTRICITY THAT IS
DERIVED FROM A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION APPROVED BY THE
COMMISSION UNDER § 7–1217 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) The Commission shall adopt regulations that:
(1) establish the nuclear energy long–term pricing purchase obligation
sufficiently in advance to allow an electric company to reflect nuclear energy long–term
pricing costs as a nonbypassable surcharge that is added to the electric company’s base
distribution rate on customer bills;
(2) define rules that facilitate and ensure the secure and transparent
transfer of revenues and long–term pricing payments among parties;
(3) define the terms and procedures of the nuclear energy long–term
pricing schedule obligations, including:
(i) establishing a formula and process to adjust the value of the
long–term pricing schedule every 2 years based on projected wholesale market prices
adjusted by the locational value and earning potential in the PJM region of the nuclear
energy generating station; and
(ii) establishing a per megawatt hour cap on any long–term pricing
schedule specified in an order issued under § 7–1217 of this subtitle;
(4) require the Commission to establish an escrow account; and
(5) to meet the total statewide long–term pricing purchase obligation for
all applications approved in an order issued under § 7–1217 of this subtitle, require the
Commission to annually establish each electric company’s zero–emission credit purchase
obligation based on the most recent final electricity sales data as reported by PJM
Interconnection and measured at the customer’s meter in proportion to the electric
company’s share of statewide load.
(c) (1) Each electric company shall procure from the escrow account
established by regulation under this section a quantity of zero–emission credits equal to
the electric company’s respective percentage of retail electric sales each year.
(2) Subject to any escrow account reserve requirement the Commission
establishes, if there are insufficient zero–emission credits available to satisfy the electric
companies’ zero–emission credit purchase obligations, the overpayment shall be distributed
to electric companies to be refunded or credited to each distribution customer based on the
– 203 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
customer’s consumption of electricity supply that is subject to the renewable energy
portfolio standard.
(d) A debt, an obligation, or a liability of a nuclear energy generation project or of
an owner or operator of a nuclear energy generation project may not be considered a debt,
an obligation, or a liability of the State.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AND BEFORE
THE NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT BEGINS COMMERCIAL OPERATION,
THE COMMISSION MAY APPROVE AN INCREASE OF THE TOTAL COST OF A NUCLEAR
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT UNDER A LONG–TERM PRICING PURCHASE
OBLIGATION.
(2) THE TOTAL COST OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT
UNDER A LONG–TERM PRICING PURCHASE OBLIGATION MAY NOT BE INCREASED BY
MORE THAN 15% OF THE ORIGINAL TOTAL PROJECT COST.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–217.
(a) In this section, “multi–year contract” means a procurement contract that
requires appropriations for more than 1 fiscal year.
(b) (1) A unit may enter into a multi–year contract subject to:
(i) standards established by the Board; and
(ii) regulations adopted by the primary procurement unit that is
responsible for the type of procurement involved.
(2) A multi–year contract shall be subject to review and approval by that
primary procurement unit.
(c) A multi–year contract may not be approved unless each unit reviewing the
multi–year contract determines that:
(1) the estimated requirements of the State:
(i) cover the period of the multi–year contract;
(ii) are reasonably firm; and
(iii) are continuing; and
– 204 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(2) the multi–year contract will serve the best interests of the State by
encouraging effective competition or otherwise promoting economy in State procurement.
(d) (1) If money sufficient for the continued performance of a multi–year
contract is not appropriated for any fiscal year, the multi–year contract terminates
automatically on the earlier of:
(i) the last day of the fiscal year for which money last was
appropriated; or
(ii) the date provided in the termination clause of the procurement
contract.
(2) If the multi–year contract is terminated under this subsection, the unit
shall reimburse the contractor for the reasonable value of any nonrecurring costs that were:
(i) incurred as a result of the multi–year contract; but
(ii) not amortized in the price of the supplies or services delivered
under the multi–year contract.
(3) The cost of termination under this subsection may be paid from any
appropriation available for that purpose.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, each multi–year contract,
including a lease of real property, shall include an automatic termination clause that:
(1) is not inconsistent with the requirements of subsection (d) of this
section; and
(2) discharges both parties to the multi–year contract from future
performance of that contract, but not from their existing obligations.
(f) (1) On the recommendation of the Secretary of General Services, FOR A
MULTI–YEAR CONTRACT TO PROCURE ENERGY GENERATED FROM A TIER 1
RENEWABLE SOURCE OR A TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCE, AS DEFINED IN § 7–701 OF
THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE, the Board may waive the requirement to include:
(I) an automatic termination clause under subsection (e) of this
section [for a multi–year contract to procure energy generated from a Tier 1 renewable
source or a Tier 2 renewable source, as defined in § 7–701 of the Public Utilities Article];
OR
(II) A TERMINATION FOR CONVENIENCE CLAUSE REQUIRED
UNDER § 13–218(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
– 205 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) In determining whether [or not] to grant a waiver under paragraph (1)
of this subsection, the Board shall consider the effect of imposing THE FOLLOWING
CLAUSE REQUIREMENTS ON THE ABILITY OF THE ENERGY SUPPLIER TO OBTAIN
FINANCING FOR THE RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT THAT PRODUCES
THE ENERGY THAT THE STATE IS CONTRACTING TO PROCURE:
(I) the termination clause requirement under subsection (e) of this
section [on the ability of the energy supplier to obtain financing for the renewable energy
generation project that produces the energy that the State is contracting to procure]; AND
(II) THE TERMINATION FOR CONVENIENCE CLAUSE
REQUIREMENT UNDER § 13–218(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
13–218.
(a) Each procurement contract shall include clauses covering:
(2) termination wholly or partly by the State for its convenience if the head
of the primary procurement unit determines that termination is appropriate;
(F) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–217(F) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD MAY
WAIVE THE INCLUSION OF A TERMINATION FOR CONVENIENCE CLAUSE REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
Article – State Government
9–20B–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Maryland Energy Administration.
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(1) to invest in the promotion, development, and implementation of:
(i) cost–effective energy efficiency and conservation programs,
projects, or activities, including measurement and verification of energy savings;
(ii) renewable and clean energy resources;
– 206 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(iii) climate change programs directly related to reducing or
mitigating the effects of climate change; and
(iv) demand response programs that are designed to promote
changes in electric usage by customers in response to:
1. changes in the price of electricity over time; or
2. incentives designed to induce lower electricity use at times
of high wholesale market prices or when system reliability is jeopardized;
(2) to provide targeted programs, projects, activities, and investments to
reduce electricity consumption by customers in the low–income and moderate–income
residential sectors;
(3) to provide supplemental funds for low–income energy assistance
through [the Electric Universal Service Program established under § 7–512.1 of the Public
Utilities Article and other] electric AND FUEL assistance programs in the Department of
Human Services;
(4) to provide rate relief by offsetting electricity rates of:
(I) residential customers, including an offset of surcharges imposed
on ratepayers under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article; AND
(II) RESIDENTS OF APARTMENT HOUSES, AS DEFINED IN § 7–303
OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE, FOR WHICH ELECTRICITY SERVICE IS
PROVIDED THROUGH:
1. SUBMETERING AUTHORIZED UNDER § 7–303 OF THE
PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE; OR
2. AN ENERGY ALLOCATION SYSTEM AS DEFINED IN §
7–304 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE;
(5) to provide grants, loans, and other assistance and investment as
necessary and appropriate to implement the purposes of the Program as set forth in §
9–20B–03 of this subtitle;
(6) to implement energy–related public education and outreach initiatives
regarding reducing energy consumption and greenhouse gas emissions;
(7) to provide rebates under the Electric Vehicle Recharging Equipment
Rebate Program established under § 9–2009 of this title;
– 207 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(8) to provide grants to encourage combined heat and power projects at
industrial facilities;
(9) to provide at least $1,200,000 in each fiscal year for fiscal year 2025
through fiscal year 2028 to the Climate Technology Founder’s Fund established under §
10–858 of the Economic Development Article;
(10) subject to subsection (f–2) of this section, to provide at least $2,100,000
in funding each fiscal year to the Maryland Energy Innovation Fund established under §
10–835 of the Economic Development Article;
(11) to provide at least $500,000 each year to the Resiliency Hub Grant
Program Fund under § 9–2011 of this title;
(12) to provide grants through the Customer–Sited Solar Program under §
9–2016 of this title;
(13) notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section, to pay costs associated
with the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of the Environment;
[and]
(14) TO AWARD BIDS FOR RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECTS UNDER § 9–20E–02 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(15) to pay the expenses of the Program.
(g) Proceeds received by the Fund from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g)
of the Environment Article shall be allocated as follows:
(1) at least 50% shall be credited to an energy assistance account to be used
for [the Electric Universal Service Program and other] electricity AND FUEL assistance
programs in the Department of Human Services;
(2) at least 20% shall be credited to a low and moderate income efficiency
and conservation programs account and to a general efficiency and conservation programs
account for energy efficiency and conservation programs, projects, or activities and demand
response programs, of which at least one–half shall be targeted to the low and moderate
income efficiency and conservation programs account for:
(i) the low–income residential sector at no cost to the participants
of the programs, projects, or activities; and
(ii) the moderate–income residential sector;
– 208 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS ITEM, at least 20%
shall be credited to a renewable and clean energy programs account for:
[(i)] 1. renewable and clean energy programs and initiatives;
[(ii)] 2. energy–related public education and outreach; and
[(iii)] 3. climate change and resiliency programs;
(II) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, AT LEAST 20% SHALL BE
CREDITED TO A RENEWABLE AND CLEAN ENERGY PROGRAMS ACCOUNT AND
ALLOCATED AS FOLLOWS:
1. AT LEAST 45% FOR BUILDING CLEAN ENERGY AND
EFFICIENCY PROGRAMS, INCLUDING LOW–INCOME HOUSEHOLD ENERGY
EFFICIENCY AND SCHOOL ELECTRIFICATION;
2. 30% FOR TRANSPORTATION–RELATED EMISSIONS
REDUCTION PROGRAMS, INCLUDING ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING
INFRASTRUCTURE AND ELECTRIC SCHOOL BUS DEPLOYMENT;
3. 15% FOR ELECTRIC SYSTEM RESILIENCY PROGRAMS,
INCLUDING MICROGRID INSTALLATION AND RESILIENCY HUBS;
4. 5% FOR GRANTS OR REBATES TO INCENTIVIZE
CUSTOMERS TO INSTALL RENEWABLE ON–SITE GENERATING SYSTEMS UNDER §
7–1006 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE; AND
5. IF THE AMOUNT OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL
SURCHARGE IMPOSED ON EACH RETAIL ELECTRIC CUSTOMER UNDER § 3–302 OF
THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE IS LESS THAN 0.15 MILL PER KILOWATT HOUR
OR $1,000 PER MONTH, 5% TO THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM WITHIN
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES; and
(4) up to 10%, but not more than $7,500,000, shall be credited to an
administrative expense account for costs related to the administration of the Fund,
including the review of electric company plans for achieving electricity savings and demand
reductions that the electric companies are required under law to submit to the
Administration.
(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), [and] (4), AND (5) of this
subsection, compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b) of the Public Utilities Article may be
used only to make loans and grants to support the creation of new Tier 1 renewable energy
sources in the State that are owned by or directly benefit:
– 209 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
or
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article.
(2) Compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities
Article shall be accounted for separately within the Fund and may be used only to make
loans and grants to support the creation of new solar energy sources in the State that are
owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article; or
(iii) households with low to moderate income, as defined in § 9–2016
of this title.
(3) For fiscal year 2026 only, up to $100,000,000 of compliance fees paid
under §§ 7–705(b) and 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities Article shall be accounted for
separately within the Fund and may be used for solar development on State government
property and local government clean energy projects.
(4) (i) Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this paragraph,
compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article may be used to provide
grants to electric companies to be refunded or credited to each residential distribution
customer based on the customer’s consumption of electricity supply that is subject to the
renewable energy portfolio standard.
(ii) The refunding or crediting of amounts to residential distribution
customers shall be identified on the customer’s bill as a line item identified as a “legislative
energy relief refund”.
(iii) An electric company awarded a grant under this paragraph:
1. may not retain any of the grant funds to cover overhead
expenses; and
2. shall provide all of the grant funds to residential
distribution customers.
– 210 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(iv) The process under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph
related to the refunding or crediting of amounts to residential distribution customers shall
be directed and overseen by the Commission.
(5) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028, $100,000,000 OF
COMPLIANCE FEES PAID UNDER § 7–705 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE AND
DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND EACH FISCAL YEAR MAY BE USED TO AWARD BIDS FOR
RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS UNDER § 9–20E–02 OF THIS TITLE,
INCLUDING ANY ASSOCIATED ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES.
(N) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION TO
THE FUND THAT IS EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT BY WHICH THE UNENCUMBERED AND
UNAPPROPRIATED BALANCE OF THE FUND THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE SALE OF
ALLOWANCES UNDER § 2–1002(G) OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE EXCEEDS THE
FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ON JUNE 30 OF THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR:
(1) FOR PROCEEDS CREDITED TO AN ENERGY ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
UNDER SUBSECTION (G)(1) OF THIS SECTION, $50,000,0000 $50,000,000;
(2) FOR PROCEEDS CREDITED TO A LOW AND MODERATE INCOME
EFFICIENCY AND CONSERVATION PROGRAMS ACCOUNT AND TO A GENERAL
EFFICIENCY AND CONSERVATION PROGRAMS ACCOUNT UNDER SUBSECTION (G)(2)
OF THIS SECTION, $5,000,000 COMBINED BETWEEN THE TWO ACCOUNTS;
(3) FOR PROCEEDS CREDITED TO A RENEWABLE AND CLEAN ENERGY
PROGRAMS ACCOUNT UNDER SUBSECTION (G)(3)(II) OF THIS SECTION, $5,000,000;
AND
(4) FOR PROCEEDS CREDITED TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSE
ACCOUNT UNDER SUBSECTION (G)(4) OF THIS SECTION, $3,000,000.
SUBTITLE 20E. ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE AUCTIONS.
9–20E–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ADMINISTRATION” MEANS THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION.
– 211 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) “ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE” MEANS A FEE PAID IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 7–705 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE TO THE MARYLAND STRATEGIC
ENERGY INVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THIS TITLE.
(D) “AUCTION” MEANS AN ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE AUCTION.
(E) “CAPACITY TARGET” MEANS A CALCULATION OF THE AMOUNT OF
RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION NEEDED IN A GIVEN YEAR TO SATISFY THE
RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD UNDER § 7–703 OF THE PUBLIC
UTILITIES ARTICLE FOR A SPECIFIC YEAR, MINUS THE AMOUNT ALREADY
PROCURED FROM OTHER SOURCES.
(F) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION.
(G) “RENEWABLE ENERGY” MEANS ENERGY GENERATED FROM:
(1) ONSHORE WIND ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS; OR
(2) UTILITY–SCALE SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS, WHICH
MAY INCLUDE CO–LOCATED BATTERY STORAGE, THAT DO NOT PARTICIPATE IN NET
ENERGY METERING UNDER § 7–306, § 7–306.2, § 7–306.3, OR § 7–306.4 OF THE
PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
9–20E–02.
(A) (1) FOR 2027 AND 2028, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL CONDUCT, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION, AN ANNUAL, COMPETITIVE, LOW–BID
ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE AUCTION TO AWARD CONTRACTS TO ELIGIBLE
BIDDERS TO FUND PROJECTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY
GENERATION IN THE STATE USING REVENUE FROM ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE
FEES.
(2) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE COMMISSION SHALL SET
THE CAPACITY TARGET FOR THE AMOUNT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION
REQUIRED FOR 2027 AND 2028.
(II) IN DETERMINING THE CAPACITY TARGET FOR EACH
AUCTION, THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE COMMISSION SHALL USE A
TRANSPARENT METHODOLOGY, INCLUDING:
1. RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDIT SHORTFALLS FROM THE
PRIOR YEAR;
– 212 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
2. ANTICIPATED GROWTH IN RENEWABLE ENERGY OVER
TIME;
3. AVAILABLE ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE
REVENUE;
4. MODELED EXPECTED ENERGY CLEARING PRICES;
AND
5. TRENDS IN IN–STATE RENEWABLE ENERGY
GENERATION.
(3) THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE COMMISSION MAY SET:
(I) A MINIMUM LEVEL OF MEGAWATTS REQUIRED FROM EACH
TYPE OF RENEWABLE ENERGY SOURCE IN THE AUCTION; OR
(II) SPECIFIC PROCUREMENT THRESHOLDS FOR ALL TYPES OF
RENEWABLE ENERGY SOURCES COLLECTIVELY.
(B) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
COMMISSION, SHALL DEVELOP AND CONDUCT THE AUCTIONS IN A MANNER THAT IS
COST–EFFECTIVE AND MAINTAINS AND PROMOTES THE DEVELOPMENT OF
RENEWABLE ENERGY IN THE STATE.
(2) THE COMPETITIVE AUCTION PROCESS MAY REQUIRE THE
ADMINISTRATION TO SOLICIT A SERIES OF BIDS FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY
PROJECT DEVELOPERS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECTS THAT ARE NEEDED TO MEET ELECTRICITY DEMAND IN A
COST–EFFECTIVE MANNER.
(C) (1) TO BE ELIGIBLE TO SUBMIT A BID UNDER THIS SECTION, A
PERSON MUST:
(I) BE A RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT
DEVELOPER; AND
(II) MEET THE MINIMUM CREDIT AND OTHER ELIGIBILITY
REQUIREMENTS SET UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
– 213 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
COMMISSION, SHALL SET ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR BIDDERS, INCLUDING
REQUIRING EACH BIDDER TO:
(I) PROVIDE PROOF OF FINANCIAL INTEGRITY;
(II) POST A BOND OR OTHER SIMILAR INSTRUMENT;
(III) AGREE TO BE SUBJECT TO ALL APPLICABLE TAXES; AND
(IV) COMPLY WITH ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS THE
ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES ARE IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST.
(D) (1) ELIGIBLE BIDDERS SHALL SUBMIT COMPETITIVE BIDS BY
SPECIFYING:
(I) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT OF MEGAWATTS TO BE GENERATED
BY THE RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT; AND
(II) A PRICE PER MEGAWATT THAT WOULD BE REQUIRED FROM
THE AUCTION.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL RANK BIDS FROM LOWEST TO
HIGHEST COST PER MEGAWATT AND AWARD FUNDS DERIVED FROM ALTERNATIVE
COMPLIANCE FEES TO THE LOWEST BID OR BIDS.
(3) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL AWARD BIDS UNTIL THE CAPACITY
TARGET SET UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION IS REACHED.
(4) THE BIDDER WHO SUBMITS THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE BID FOR
DEVELOPING A RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT SHALL BE AWARDED
THE AMOUNT OF FUNDS TO BUILD THE RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT.
(5) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REFUSE TO ACCEPT SOME OR ALL OF
THE BIDS MADE IN A COMPETITIVE AUCTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH STANDARDS
ADOPTED BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(6) (I) IF THE CAPACITY TARGET CAN BE MET AT A COST BELOW
THE ALLOCATED FUNDING, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY:
1. CARRY FORWARD ANY FUNDING TO THE NEXT
AUCTION, IF APPLICABLE; OR
– 214 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
2. APPLY THE FUNDS FOR ANY ADDITIONAL MEGAWATTS
OF RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION THAT HAVE BEEN OFFERED UNDER THE
AUCTION.
(II) ANY AMOUNT OF ALLOCATED FUNDING THAT IS NOT
CARRIED FORWARD OR APPLIED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
SHALL ACCRUE IN THE MARYLAND STRATEGIC ENERGY INVESTMENT FUND AND
MAY BE ALLOCATED FOR ANY PURPOSE FOR WHICH ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE
REVENUE IS AUTHORIZED TO BE USED.
(E) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL SET DELIVERY DEADLINES FOR
EACH RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT THAT IS AWARDED FUNDING
FROM AN AUCTION.
(2) THE DEADLINES SET IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL INCLUDE MILESTONES THAT REQUIRE THE DEVELOPER TO MEET CERTAIN
DELIVERY GOALS DURING THE DEVELOPMENT OF A RENEWABLE ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT.
(3) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY GRANT EXTENSIONS FOR DELIVERY
GOALS THAT ARE DELAYED DUE TO INTERCONNECTION OR PERMITTING
CHALLENGES OR DELAYS IF THE DEVELOPER PROVIDES DOCUMENTATION OF THE
CHALLENGE OR DELAY.
(4) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH A METHOD OF
COLLECTION AGAINST ANY DEVELOPER AWARDED A CONTRACT UNDER THIS
SECTION TO RECAPTURE ANY FUNDS RECEIVED AS A RESULT OF:
(I) MISAPPROPRIATION, OVERPAYMENT, OR FRAUD; OR
(II) FAILURE TO MEET MILESTONES OR DELIVERY DATES.
(F) WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER ALL CONTRACTS FOR RENEWABLE ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECTS ARE EXECUTED, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PUBLICLY
DISCLOSE THE NAMES OF EACH SUCCESSFUL BIDDER AND THE MEGAWATTS TO BE
DELIVERED BY THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECT.
(G) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND JULY 1, 2028, THE ADMINISTRATION
AND THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, ON THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING AUCTION, INCLUDING:
– 215 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) THE AMOUNT OF MEGAWATTS PROCURED THROUGH THE
AUCTION;
(2) THE COST PER MEGAWATT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY ALLOCATED
IN THE AUCTION;
(3) THE NUMBER OF RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS CREATED AS A
RESULT OF THE AUCTION; AND
(4) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE
COMMISSION CONSIDER RELEVANT.
(H) THE ADMINISTRATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION,
SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
4–213.
(a) This section applies only to a public service company that is an electric
company, a gas company, or a combination gas and electric company.
(b) Unless otherwise authorized by law, the Commission may approve the use of
a multiyear rate plan for distribution base rates only if the plan:
(1) demonstrates the customer benefits of the investment; and
(2) does not allow for:
(I) the public service company to file for reconciliation of cost or
revenue variances of the approved revenue component used by the Commission to establish
just and reasonable rates IF THE RECONCILIATION WOULD RESULT IN ADDITIONAL
CHARGES TO CUSTOMERS; OR
(II) THE USE OF COST–SHARING MECHANISMS THAT WOULD
RESULT IN ADDITIONAL CHARGES TO CUSTOMERS ABOVE THE APPROVED REVENUE
COMPONENT USED BY THE COMMISSION TO ESTABLISH JUST AND REASONABLE
RATES.
– 216 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(c) A public service company that files or has filed an application for a multiyear
rate plan may not subsequently file for reconciliation of cost or revenue variances [of] THAT
WOULD RESULT IN ADDITIONAL CHARGES TO CUSTOMERS DUE TO THE PUBLIC
SERVICE COMPANY SPENDING MORE THAN the approved revenue component used by
the Commission to establish the multiyear rates unless the filing for reconciliation was
made on or before January 1, 2025.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY REQUIRE A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY TO
INCLUDE A RECONCILIATION PROCEDURE IN ITS MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN TO REFUND
CUSTOMERS THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN:
(1) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY’S FORECAST REVENUE
REQUIREMENT; AND
(2) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY’S ACTUAL REVENUE
REQUIREMENT DURING THE TERM OF THE MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN.
4–504.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “BONUS” MEANS A FORM OF DIRECT OR INDIRECT
PAYMENT, CONSIDERATION, OR COMPENSATION THAT IS PAID OR CONVEYED TO AN
EMPLOYEE OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY IN ADDITION TO THE EMPLOYEE’S BASE
PAY.
(II) “BONUS” INCLUDES:
1. COMPENSATION THAT THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY DOES NOT FORMALLY LABEL AS A BONUS PAYMENT;
2. ANY FORM OF INCENTIVE COMPENSATION THE FACT
AND AMOUNT OF WHICH IS UNDER THE DISCRETION OF THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY UNTIL A TIME CLOSE TO THE END OF THE PERIOD FOR WHICH THE
INCENTIVE PAYMENT IS PAID; AND
3. PAYMENTS GIVEN IN ADDITION TO BASE PAY THAT
ARE CONTINGENT ON THE OCCURRENCE OF ONE OR MORE EVENTS OR CONDITIONS.
(3) (I) “COMPENSATION” MEANS A FORM OF PAYMENT OR
CONSIDERATION CONVEYED TO OR FOR THE BENEFIT OF AN EMPLOYEE OF A PUBLIC
SERVICE COMPANY, THE PARENT COMPANY OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY, OR ANY
– 217 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
OTHER AFFILIATE OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY IN CONNECTION WITH THE
EMPLOYEE’S WORK FOR A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY.
(II) “COMPENSATION” INCLUDES:
1. DIRECT AND INDIRECT METHODS OF CONFERRING
BENEFITS;
2. CASH AND NONCASH BENEFITS;
3. SALARY, BONUSES, PERIOD PAYMENTS, AND
SEVERANCE PAY; AND
4. THE VALUE OF A PERQUISITE, COMPENSATORY OR
PAID LEAVE, OR OTHER BENEFIT NOT EXCLUDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH.
(III) “COMPENSATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY EXPENDITURE
OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY FOR HEALTH, MEDICAL, DENTAL, VISION, OR LIFE
INSURANCE OR DISABILITY PAY.
(4) “SUPERVISOR” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE OF A PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY, THE PARENT COMPANY OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY, OR ANY OTHER
AFFILIATE OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY WHO:
(I) USING THE EMPLOYEE’S INDEPENDENT JUDGMENT:
1. IS AUTHORIZED BY THE EMPLOYEE’S EMPLOYER TO
HIRE, TRANSFER, SUSPEND, LAY OFF, RECALL, PROMOTE, DISCHARGE, ASSIGN,
REWARD, OR DISCIPLINE OTHER EMPLOYEES;
2. IS RESPONSIBLE FOR DIRECTING THE WORK
PERFORMANCE OF OTHER EMPLOYEES; AND
3. IS RESPONSIBLE FOR RESPONDING TO EMPLOYEE
COMPLAINTS; OR
(II) IS EMPLOYED IN A BONA FIDE EXECUTIVE CAPACITY UNDER
THE FEDERAL FAIR LABOR STANDARDS ACT.
(B) This section applies only to a public service company that is an
investor–owned electric company, gas company, or combination gas and electric company.
– 218 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
[(b)] (C) A public service company may not recover through rates any costs
associated with:
(1) membership, dues, sponsorships, or contributions to an industry trade
association, group, or related entity exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(6) of the Internal
Revenue Code; [or]
(2) the acquisition, use, or allocation of costs associated with a private
plane that is owned or leased by the public service company or its holding company; OR
(3) COMPENSATION FOR A SUPERVISOR THAT EXCEEDS 110% OF THE
MAXIMUM ANNUAL SALARY PAYABLE TO THE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION FOR THE
SAME CALENDAR YEAR.
(D) (1) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF EACH PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY
SHALL ADOPT A COMPANY–WIDE POLICY PLACING REASONABLE COST LIMITATIONS,
IN ACCORDANCE WITH GUIDANCE PUBLISHED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON EXPENDITURES THAT THE PUBLIC
SERVICE COMPANY INTENDS TO RECOVER THROUGH RATES FOR:
(I) ENTERTAINMENT AND EVENTS;
(II) OFFICE AND FACILITY RENOVATIONS;
(III) TRANSPORTATION SERVICES, INCLUDING AVIATION;
(IV) STAFF DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITIES OR EVENTS;
(V) PERFORMANCE INCENTIVES; AND
(VI) OTHER ACTIVITIES OUTSIDE THE SCOPE OF THE NORMAL
COURSE OF BUSINESS OPERATIONS.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL PUBLISH GUIDANCE DEFINING
“REASONABLE COST LIMITATIONS” FOR EXPENDITURES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) EACH PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY SHALL SEND A COPY OF THE
POLICY ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE
COMMISSION:
(I) AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE; AND
(II) EACH TIME THE POLICY IS UPDATED, BUT NOT LESS THAN
EVERY 5 YEARS.
– 219 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
7–306.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) “Eligible customer–generator” means a customer that owns and
operates, leases and operates, or contracts with a third party that owns and operates a
biomass, micro combined heat and power, solar, fuel cell, wind, or closed conduit hydro
electric generating facility that:
(i) is located on the customer’s premises or contiguous property;
(ii) is interconnected and operated in parallel with an electric
company’s transmission and distribution facilities; and
(iii) is intended primarily to offset all or part of the customer’s own
electricity requirements.
(7) “Net energy metering” means measurement of the difference between
the electricity that is supplied by an electric company and the electricity that is generated
by an eligible customer–generator and fed back to the electric grid over the eligible
customer–generator’s billing period.
(d) (1) The Commission shall require electric utilities to develop a standard
contract or tariff for net energy metering and make it available to eligible
customer–generators on a first–come, first–served basis until THE EARLIER OF:
(I) THE DATE ON WHICH the rated generating capacity owned and
operated by eligible customer–generators in the State reaches 3,000 megawatts; OR
(II) JULY 1, 2027.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE 3,000
MEGAWATT LIMIT IN PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION HAS NOT BEEN MET, A
COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM UNDER § 7–306.2 OF THIS
SUBTITLE THAT IS PLACED IN SERVICE AFTER JULY 1, 2027, SHALL BE ELIGIBLE
FOR NET ENERGY METERING UNDER THIS SECTION IF:
(I) THE SYSTEM:
1. ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, RECEIVED A QUEUE
POSITION UNDER § 7–306.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND PAID ALL INTERCONNECTION
FEES; AND
– 220 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
2. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IS PLACED IN SERVICE ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2029; AND
(II) THE ELECTRIC COMPANY IN WHOSE SERVICE TERRITORY
THE COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM IS LOCATED HAS NOT MET
THE NET ENERGY METERING CAPACITY LIMIT UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(3) THE NET ENERGY METERING CAPACITY LIMIT FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION OF COMMUNITY SOLAR PROJECTS UNDER A NET ENERGY METERING
CONTRACT OR TARIFF UNDER THIS SECTION IN AN ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE
TERRITORY SHALL BE THE PERCENTAGE OF THE 3,000 MEGAWATT LIMIT PROVIDED
IN PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT IS EQUAL TO THE PERCENTAGE OF
TOTAL RETAIL ELECTRICITY SALES IN THE STATE THAT ARE MADE IN THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY DURING 2026.
(4) IF THE COMMISSION DOES NOT IMPLEMENT A SUCCESSOR
PROGRAM UNDER § 7–306.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE BY JULY 1, 2027, A COMMUNITY
SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT HAS NOT BEEN PLACED IN SERVICE BY
JULY 1, 2027, BUT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (2)(I)1 AND (II) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE ELIGIBLE FOR NET ENERGY METERING UNDER THIS
SECTION IF IT IS PLACED IN SERVICE ON OR BEFORE 2 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THAT
THE SUCCESSOR PROGRAM IS IMPLEMENTED.
(5) (I) AN ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR THAT, ON JULY 1,
2027, IS UNDER A NET ENERGY METERING CONTRACT OR TARIFF UNDER THIS
SECTION OR A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL REMAIN
ELIGIBLE FOR NET ENERGY METERING UNDER THIS SECTION FOR A LENGTH OF
TIME DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION THROUGH REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(II) THE COMMISSION, AFTER HOLDING A STAKEHOLDER
PROCEEDING, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS REGARDING THE TERMS UNDER WHICH
AN ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR OR COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM UNDER A NET METERING CONTRACT OR TARIFF UNDER THIS SECTION MAY
REMAIN ELIGIBLE FOR NET ENERGY METERING UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
1. THE LENGTH OF TIME AFTER THE SUCCESSOR
PROGRAM UNDER § 7–306.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS IMPLEMENTED THAT AN EXISTING
ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR MAY REMAIN ELIGIBLE FOR NET ENERGY
METERING UNDER THIS SECTION;
– 221 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. CONDITIONS UNDER WHICH A NET ENERGY METERED
SYSTEM MAY BE CONSIDERED INELIGIBLE FOR NET ENERGY METERING UNDER THIS
SECTION; AND
3. REQUIREMENTS FOR DECOMMISSIONING SYSTEMS
THAT ARE NET ENERGY METERED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(j) On or before November 1 of each year, the Commission shall report to the
General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the
status of the net ENERGY metering program under this section AND § 7–306.4 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, including:
(1) the amount of capacity of electric generating facilities owned and
operated by eligible customer–generators in the State by type of energy resource;
(2) based on the need to encourage a diversification of the State’s energy
resource mix to ensure reliability, whether the rated generating capacity limit in subsection
(d) of this section should be altered; [and]
(3) THE STATUS OF THE IMPLEMENTATION AND EFFICACY OF THE
SUCCESSOR PROGRAM DEVELOPED AND IMPLEMENTED UNDER § 7–306.4 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(4) other pertinent information.
7–306.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) “NET ENERGY METERING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–306
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO TRANSITION TO A NET
ENERGY METERING PROGRAM THAT:
(1) INCREASES BENEFITS TO RATEPAYERS BY LOWERING ELECTRIC
SYSTEM COSTS THROUGH THE USE OF FLEXIBLE CUSTOMER–SITED RENEWABLE
ENERGY RESOURCES;
– 222 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(2) PROVIDES FAIR COMPENSATION TO ELIGIBLE
CUSTOMER–GENERATORS;
(3) IS DESIGNED TO MAKE PROGRESS TOWARD MEETING THE STATE’S
DEMAND–SIDE, ENERGY STORAGE, AND CLEAN ENERGY GOALS; AND
(4) PROVIDES INCENTIVES FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF DISTRIBUTED
GENERATION THAT ARE LESS THAN THE INCENTIVES PROVIDED BY THE NET ENERGY
METERING PROGRAM UNDER § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE COMMISSION, BY ORDER OR REGULATION, SHALL DEVELOP AND
IMPLEMENT, AS A SUCCESSOR PROGRAM TO THE NET ENERGY METERING PROGRAM
UNDER § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A NET ENERGY METERING PROGRAM TO BEGIN
JULY 1, 2027, THAT:
(1) PROVIDES INCENTIVES FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF DISTRIBUTED
GENERATION TO ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATORS UNDER §§ 7–306 AND 7–306.3
OF THIS SUBTITLE AND COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS UNDER
§ 7–306.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) MINIMIZES RATEPAYER COSTS IN THE SHORT TERM AND IN THE
LONG TERM; AND
(3) BALANCES, ON A STATEWIDE BASIS AND ACROSS TECHNOLOGIES
AND INDUSTRY SECTORS PARTICIPATING IN NET ENERGY METERING:
(I) 1. FAIR COMPENSATION FOR ENERGY EXPORTS; AND
2. THE BENEFITS OF AN ELIGIBLE
CUSTOMER–GENERATOR’S OR FACILITY’S REDUCED LOAD ON THE ELECTRIC
TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM; AGAINST
(II) 1. THE NEEDS OF THE TRANSMISSION AND
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM;
2. RATEPAYER COSTS AND BENEFITS; AND
3. POTENTIAL IMPACTS ON CUSTOMERS, INCLUDING
LOW– AND MODERATE–INCOME CUSTOMERS, WHO DO NOT PARTICIPATE IN THE NET
ENERGY METERING PROGRAM RESULTING FROM ELIGIBLE
CUSTOMER–GENERATORS’ REDUCED CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM.
– 223 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE
NOTICE TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE STATUS OF THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE
PROGRAM REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) THE COMMISSION SHALL PRIORITIZE THE REVIEW AND APPROVAL OF
APPLICATIONS FROM A PROSPECTIVE ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR FOR
PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM IMPLEMENTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION IF, AT THE TIME THE PROGRAM WAS IMPLEMENTED, THE PROSPECTIVE
ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR WAS IN THE QUEUE FOR THE NET ENERGY
METERING PROGRAM UNDER § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) THE PROGRAM IMPLEMENTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE AVAILABLE UNTIL THE COMBINED
TOTAL RATED GENERATING CAPACITY OWNED AND OPERATED UNDER THE NET
ENERGY METERING PROGRAM UNDER § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND THE NET
ENERGY METERING PROGRAM IMPLEMENTED UNDER THIS SECTION REACHES 6,000
MEGAWATTS.
7–505.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including subsection (d) of
this section, and subject to § 4–213 of this article, the Commission may regulate the
regulated services of an electric company through alternative forms of regulation.
(2) The Commission may adopt an alternative form of regulation under this
section if the Commission finds, after notice and hearing, that the alternative form of
regulation:
(i) protects consumers;
(ii) ensures the quality, availability, and reliability of regulated
electric services; and
(iii) is in the interest of the public, including shareholders of the
electric company.
(3) Alternative forms of regulation may include:
(i) price regulation, including price freezes or caps;
(ii) revenue regulation;
– 224 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(iii) ranges of authorized return;
(iv) rate of return;
(v) categories of services; or
(vi) price–indexing.
(4) ALTERNATIVE FORMS OF REGULATION MAY NOT INCLUDE A RATE
MECHANISM THAT IS BASED ON A FORECAST TEST YEAR IN A BASE RATE
PROCEEDING.
Chapter 623 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Public Service Commission shall conduct a study on the feasibility of and
technical barriers to establishing:
(1) within the Commission a community solar automatic enrollment
program for local jurisdictions; AND
(2) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES, AN AUTOMATIC COMMUNITY SOLAR ENROLLMENT PROCESS TO PROVIDE
BILL CREDITS FOR LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME SUBSCRIBERS THROUGH THE
OFFICE OF HOME ENERGY PROGRAMS IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(b) In conducting the study under subsection (a) of this [section,] SECTION:
(1) FOR AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROGRAM UNDER SUBSECTION
(A)(1) OF THIS SECTION, the PUBLIC SERVICE Commission shall consider:
[(1)] (I) how low– to moderate–income subscribers would be subscribed
under the program;
[(2)] (II) whether subscribers automatically enrolled in the program
should receive a bill credit;
[(3)] (III) how to ensure that local jurisdictions comply with all parameters
of the program; and
[(4)] (IV) any necessary notification requirements and consumer
protections that the program should have; AND
– 225 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) FOR THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME
SUBSCRIBERS;
(II) OPT–OUT PROCEDURES FOR SUBSCRIBERS;
(III) THE AMOUNT OF BILL SAVINGS FOR LOW– TO
MODERATE–INCOME SUBSCRIBERS;
(IV) THE ROLE OF ANY OTHER STATE OR LOCAL AGENCY IN THE
AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS;
(V) THE AMOUNT OF ENERGY GENERATED BY A COMMUNITY
SOLAR PROJECT THAT SHOULD BE DEDICATED TO LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME
SUBSCRIBERS; AND
(VI) THE IMPACT TO RATEPAYERS THAT DO NOT PARTICIPATE IN
THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS.
(c) On or before [July 1, 2026] DECEMBER 1, 2026, the Public Service
Commission shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly on the results of the study.
Chapter 624 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Public Service Commission shall conduct a study on the feasibility of and
technical barriers to establishing:
(1) within the Commission a community solar automatic enrollment
program for local jurisdictions; AND
(2) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES, AN AUTOMATIC COMMUNITY SOLAR ENROLLMENT PROCESS TO PROVIDE
BILL CREDITS FOR LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME SUBSCRIBERS THROUGH THE
OFFICE OF HOME ENERGY PROGRAMS IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(b) In conducting the study under subsection (a) of this [section,] SECTION:
– 226 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(1) FOR AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROGRAM UNDER SUBSECTION
(A)(1) OF THIS SECTION, the PUBLIC SERVICE Commission shall consider:
[(1)] (I) how [low–to–moderate income] LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME
subscribers would be subscribed under the program;
[(2)] (II) whether subscribers automatically enrolled in the program
should receive a bill credit;
[(3)] (III) how to ensure that local jurisdictions comply with all parameters
of the program; and
[(4)] (IV) any necessary notification requirements and consumer
protections that the program should have; AND
(2) FOR THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME
SUBSCRIBERS;
(II) OPT–OUT PROCEDURES FOR SUBSCRIBERS;
(III) THE AMOUNT OF BILL SAVINGS FOR LOW– TO
MODERATE–INCOME SUBSCRIBERS;
(IV) THE ROLE OF ANY OTHER STATE OR LOCAL AGENCY IN THE
AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS;
(V) THE AMOUNT OF ENERGY GENERATED BY A COMMUNITY
SOLAR PROJECT THAT SHOULD BE DEDICATED TO LOW– TO MODERATE–INCOME
SUBSCRIBERS; AND
(VI) THE IMPACT TO RATEPAYERS THAT DO NOT PARTICIPATE IN
THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT PROCESS.
(c) On or before [July 1, 2026] DECEMBER 1, 2026, the Public Service
Commission shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly on the results of the study.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the requirements established
under § 7–207(b)(3)(iv), as enacted under Section 3 of this Act, apply to an application for
a certificate of public convenience and necessity submitted on or after July 1, 2026, and
– 227 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
may not be construed to apply to a certificate of public convenience and necessity submitted
before July 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible customer–generator” has the meaning stated in § 7–306 of the
Public Utilities Article.
(3) “Net energy metering” has the meaning stated in § 7–306 of the Public
Utilities Article.
(b) (1) The Public Service Commission shall conduct a proceeding exploring
the development and implementation of a successor program to the net energy metering
program under § 7–306 of the Public Utilities Article.
(2) In conducting the proceeding, the Public Service Commission shall
accept input from:
(i) utility companies;
(ii) owners and developers of net metered projects, including projects
that are:
1. residential behind–the–meter;
2. commercial behind–the–meter; and
3. front–of–the–meter;
(iii) renewable energy industry experts, including representatives
from the solar energy industry;
(iv) consumer advocates; and
(v) other stakeholders.
(c) On or before December 15, 2026, the Public Service Commission shall submit
a report on the proceeding held under subsection (b) of this section to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(d) The report shall include:
(1) recommendations for a successor program to the net energy metering
program under § 7–306 of the Public Utilities Article that:
– 228 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(i) incentivizes the development of distributed generation;
(ii) minimizes ratepayer costs in the short term and in the long term;
and
(iii) balances, on a statewide basis and across technologies and
industry sectors participating in net energy metering:
1. fair compensation for energy exports;
2. the benefits of an eligible customer–generator’s or
facility’s reduced load on the electric grid against:
A. the needs of the grid;
B. ratepayer costs and benefits; and
C. implications of the reduced load on energy equity,
including any disparities in the amount paid for grid maintenance by eligible
customer–generator and distributed generation owners in comparison to other retail
customers;
(2) recommendations for any legislative changes necessary to implement
the successor program; and
(3) the terms under which existing eligible customer–generators, including
community solar projects and subscribers under § 7–306.2 of the Public Utilities Article
and aggregated net energy metered projects and customers under § 7–306.3 of the Public
Utilities Article may remain eligible for net energy metering under § 7–306 of the Public
Utilities Article, including:
(i) the length of time after the successor program is implemented
that an existing eligible customer–generator may remain eligible for net energy metering
under § 7–306 of the Public Utilities Article; and
(ii) conditions under which a net energy metered system may be
considered ineligible for net energy metering under § 7–306 of the Public Utilities Article;
and
(iii) requirements for decommissioning systems that are net energy
metered under § 7–306 of the Public Utilities Article; and
(4) any administrative concerns with transitioning to the successor
program on July 1, 2027, and whether those concerns may cause a delay in implementation.
– 229 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Public Service Commission,
in consultation with electric companies, work to resolve any administrative and technical
issues in order to provide rate relief to all residential electric customers, including residents
of apartments, condominiums, and other multi–occupancy residences, in accordance with
this section.
(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from the alternative
compliance fees paid into the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund in accordance
with § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article, $100,000,000 shall be used to provide grant
awards to electric companies to be refunded or credited to residential electric customers to
offset any surcharges imposed as a result of the operating costs of the programs and services
under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article in calendar year 2027 in
accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The Governor may transfer by budget amendment the funds described
in paragraph (1) of this subsection to the Public Service Commission to be awarded to
electric companies.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the funds described in subsection
(b)(1) of this section shall be distributed:
(1) in accordance with § 9–20B–05(f)(4) of the State Government Article,
as enacted by Section 4 of this Act; and
(2) in equal monthly amounts during the calendar year 2027.
(d) (1) To the greatest extent practicable the Public Service Commission, in
consultation with each electric company that collects a surcharge under § 7–222(d) of the
Public Utilities Article, shall determine:
(i) the commercial customers of each electric company that use a
master meter to allocate costs of retail electric service to the residents of apartments,
condominiums, and other multi–occupancy residences; and
(ii) the estimated energy use by the commercial customers identified
under item (i) of this paragraph.
(2) If the Public Service Commission is able to determine, with a
reasonable degree of certainty, the commercial customer information specified in
paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Commission may require that a pro rata share of the
funds described in subsection (b)(1) of this section be provided as grants to electric
companies to be refunded or credited to commercial customers that use a master meter to
allocate costs of retail electric service to residents of apartment houses, condominiums, or
other multi–occupancy residences.
– 230 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(3) A commercial customer that receives funding under this subsection:
(i) shall refund or credit each residential dwelling unit with its pro
rata share of the funding provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection;
(ii) may not provide a refund or credit to any person known to be
using electric service for a commercial purpose;
(iii) may retain up to 3% of the credited amount for administrative
expenses; and
(iv) if the commercial customer received the funding in error, shall
refund the funding to the electric company for redistribution.
(4) The Public Service Commission and each electric company shall be held
harmless for any failure by a commercial customer that receives funding under this
subsection to use the funding as required under paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(5) If the Public Service Commission is unable to determine, with a
reasonable degree of certainty, the commercial customer information specified in
paragraph (1) of this subsection or determines that providing funding to commercial
customers in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection is not in the public interest,
the Commission, on or before December 1, 2026:
(i) may direct electric companies to refund or credit only those
residential customers taking service under a residential tariff; and
(ii) shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, report to the General Assembly, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment, and the House Environment and Transportation Committee on the
reasoning for the Commission’s decision to direct electric companies to refund or credit
residential customers in accordance with item (i) of this paragraph.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) The Public Service Commission shall issue a request for information on
the use of a third–party, single–implementer program for the administration of the
programs and services under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article.
(2) The request for information shall seek:
(i) determinations of what effect the use of a single, third–party
administrator would have on costs;
– 231 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) identification of technical and logistical barriers to transitioning
to a single, third–party administrator; and
(iii) an analysis of the advantages and disadvantages of a private,
third–party administrator as opposed to a State administrator.
(3) The Public Service Commission may conduct research and produce a
report independent of, and in order to supplement any information received through, the
request for information under this subsection.
(4) The Public Service Commission shall require that responses to the
request for information be received not later than July 1, 2027.
(b) (1) As soon as practicable after receiving the information requested in
subsection (a) of this section, the Public Service Commission shall issue a request for
proposals for a third–party administrator for the programs and services under Title 7,
Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article.
(2) The request for proposals shall specify that responses to the request
should minimize short–term and long–term costs for utility ratepayers.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, on or before June
1, 2028, the Public Service Commission shall select, through the request for proposals
process initiated under subsection (b) of this section, a third–party administrator for the
administration of the programs and services under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public
Utilities Article beginning with the 3–year program cycle starting in 2030.
(2) (i) The Public Service Commission may decline to select a
third–party administrator if the Public Service Commission determines that the use of a
third–party administrator would not be cost–effective.
(ii) The Public Service Commission shall notify the General
Assembly of a decision to decline to select a third–party administrator within 5 days after
making the decision.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Power Plant Research Program, in consultation with the Department of
the Environment and the Maryland Energy Administration, shall conduct a study to
identify ways to streamline the permitting process for energy development in the State.
(b) In conducting the study under subsection (a) of this section, the Power Plant
Research Program shall:
(1) identify up to 50 priority energy sites suitable for new or expanded
generating stations or energy storage devices, including:
– 232 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(i) brownfields;
(ii) industrial sites surrounded by areas with low–population
density; and
(iii) sites with old or decommissioned generating units that may be
repowered or repurposed, with special consideration given to sites with surplus
interconnection capacity;
(2) identify current bottlenecks and barriers in the State that extend State
and local permitting timelines; and
(3) develop recommendations on what a State–level zoning or permitting
structure should look like in order to promote fast–tracked development at the priority
energy sites identified in item (1) of this subsection.
(c) On or before December 31, 2026, the Program shall report to the Governor
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly
on the results of the study.
SECTION 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That all employees who are
transferred to the Department of Human Services as a result of this Act shall be transferred
without diminution of their rights, benefits, employment, or retirement status.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
4–212.
(c) (1) (i) On or before September 1, 2026, each investor–owned electric
company and each electric cooperative shall submit to the Commission for approval a
specific rate schedule for large load customers that accomplishes the intent of subsection
(b) of this section.
– 233 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Each municipal electric utility that receives an application for
retail electric service from a large load customer shall submit to the Commission for
approval a specific rate schedule for large load customers.
(2) (i) Service under a specific rate schedule shall be available to large
load customers that will use, within the initial contract term:
1. a monthly maximum demand of more than [100] 25
megawatts at a single location; or
2. an aggregated contract capacity in the electric company’s
service territory of more than 100 megawatts.
(ii) Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, large
load customers that qualify for a specific rate schedule after the effective date of that
schedule:
1. shall take service under the specific rate schedule; and
2. may not be allowed to take service under any other
existing schedule.
(iii) A specific rate schedule does not apply to the facility of an
existing large load customer that has signed a service agreement before the effective date
of the schedule if:
1. the large load customer’s existing load does not expand by
more than 25 megawatts at that facility under the existing service agreement; or
2. the large load customer does not sign a new service
agreement to expand the facility’s load by more than 25 megawatts above the contract
capacity of the existing service agreement.
4–213.
(a) This section applies only to a public service company that is an electric
company, a gas company, or a combination gas and electric company.
(b) Unless otherwise authorized by law, the Commission may approve the use of
a multiyear rate plan for distribution base rates only if the plan:
(1) demonstrates the customer benefits of the investment; and
(2) does not allow for:
– 234 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(I) the public service company to file for reconciliation of cost or
revenue variances of the approved revenue component used by the Commission to establish
just and reasonable rates IF THE RECONCILIATION WOULD RESULT IN ADDITIONAL
CUSTOMER CHARGES; OR
(II) THE USE OF COST–SHARING MECHANISMS THAT WOULD
RESULT IN ADDITIONAL CUSTOMER CHARGES ABOVE THE APPROVED REVENUE
COMPONENT USED BY THE COMMISSION TO ESTABLISH JUST AND REASONABLE
RATES.
(c) A public service company that files or has filed an application for a multiyear
rate plan may not subsequently file for reconciliation of cost or revenue variances [of] THAT
WOULD RESULT IN ADDITIONAL CUSTOMER CHARGES DUE TO THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY SPENDING MORE THAN the approved revenue component used by the
Commission to establish the multiyear rates unless the filing for reconciliation was made
on or before January 1, 2025.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY REQUIRE A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY TO
INCLUDE A RECONCILIATION PROCEDURE IN ITS MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN TO REFUND
CUSTOMERS THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN:
(1) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY’S FORECAST REVENUE
REQUIREMENT; AND
(2) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY’S ACTUAL REVENUE
REQUIREMENT DURING THE TERM OF THE MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN.
7–222.
(c) (5) The information provided to the Commission under paragraph (4) of
this subsection shall be based on a plan to offer programs and services to customers that
complies with the requirements of an electric company subject to subsection (a) of this
section for the [3–year] 2–YEAR program cycle starting January 1, 2027.
7–223.
(a) On or before January 1, 2025, [and] on or before January 1, 2027, ON OR
BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2029, AND ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 every 3 years, starting in
[2027] 2029, the Commission shall, by regulation or order, require each electric company
and each gas company subject to § 7–222(a) of this subtitle to develop and implement a plan
that:
(1) covers appropriate ratepayer classes;
– 235 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) starting in [2027] 2029, covers a 3–year program cycle; and
(3) achieves the greenhouse gas emissions reduction target established for
the electric company or gas company under subsection (b) of this section through
cost–effective energy efficiency and conservation programs and services, demand response
programs and services, and beneficial electrification programs and services.
(b) (1) For [2025 and 2026,] 2025, 2026, 2027, AND 2028, and for each
3–year program cycle starting in [2027] 2029, the Commission shall establish a greenhouse
gas emissions reduction target for each electric company and each gas company subject to
§ 7–222(a) of this subtitle as provided in this subsection.
(4) By the dates specified in § 7–225(a) of this subtitle, the Commission
shall establish greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets for each electric company plan
that will achieve at least the greenhouse gas emissions reduction equivalent, measured on
a lifecycle basis using the emission intensities under paragraph (2) of this subsection, of
the following annual electricity savings percentages, calculated as a percentage of the
electric company’s 2016 weather–normalized gross retail sales and electricity losses:
(i) 2.0% in 2024;
(ii) 2.25% each year in 2025 [and 2026; and] THROUGH 2028; AND
(iii) 2.5% each year in [2027] 2029 and after.
7–224.
(a) (1) Beginning January 1, 2025, [and] on or before January 1, 2027, ON OR
BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2029, AND ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 every 3 years, starting in
[2027] 2029, the Department shall procure or provide to low–income individuals energy
efficiency and conservation programs and services, demand response programs and
services, and beneficial electrification programs and services that achieve the greenhouse
gas emissions reduction targets established for the Department under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
(d) If directed by the Commission in 2024, [and] on or before September 1, 2026,
ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2028, AND ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 every 3 years,
starting in [2026] 2028, the Department shall submit its plans for any programs or services
procured or provided under subsection (a) of this section to the Commission for review and
approval under § 7–225 of this subtitle.
7–225.
(b) (1) (i) If directed by the Commission in 2024, [and] on or before July 1,
2026, ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AND ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 every 3 years, starting
– 236 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
in [2026] 2028, each electric company and each gas company subject to § 7–222(a) of this
subtitle that submitted a plan for achieving electricity savings and demand reduction
targets to the Commission before July 1, 2024, and the Department, shall consult with the
technical staff of the Commission, the Office of People’s Counsel, the Maryland Energy
Administration, and the Department of the Environment regarding the design and
adequacy of its plans for achieving the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets
established by the Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle and specified in §
7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(ii) On or before October 1, 2024, [and] on or before July 1, 2026, ON
OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AND ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 every 3 years, starting in [2026]
2028, each electric company and each gas company subject to § 7–222(a) of this subtitle
that did not submit a plan for achieving electricity savings and demand reduction targets
to the Commission before July 1, 2024, shall comply with the consulting requirements
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(2) Each electric company and each gas company subject to § 7–222(a) of
this subtitle shall provide the technical staff of the Commission, the Office of People’s
Counsel, the Maryland Energy Administration, and the Department of the Environment
with any additional information regarding its plan, as requested.
(c) (1) (i) If directed by the Commission in 2024, and on or before
September 1, 2026, ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2028, AND ON OR BEFORE
SEPTEMBER 1 every 3 years, starting in [2026] 2028, each electric company and each gas
company subject to § 7–222(a) of this subtitle that submitted a plan for achieving electricity
savings and demand reduction targets to the Commission before July 1, 2024, and the
Department, shall submit its plan to the Commission.
(ii) On or before December 1, 2024, [and] on or before September 1,
2026, ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2028, AND ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 every
3 years, starting in [2026] 2028, each electric company and each gas company that did not
submit a plan for achieving electricity savings and demand reduction targets to the
Commission before July 1, 2024, shall submit its plan to the Commission.
(2) (I) [Each] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, EACH plan shall detail a proposal for achieving greenhouse gas
emissions reduction targets for 3 subsequent calendar years.
(II) THE PLAN SUBMITTED IN 2026 SHALL DETAIL A PROPOSAL
FOR ACHIEVING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION TARGETS FOR THE 2
SUBSEQUENT CALENDAR YEARS.
(3) (i) Each plan shall:
1. include:
– 237 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A. a description of the proposed programs and services;
B. anticipated costs;
C. projected benefits, including greenhouse gas emissions
reductions, electricity savings, and gas savings; and
D. any other information requested by the Commission; and
2. address residential, commercial, and industrial sectors as
appropriate, including low–income communities.
(ii) A plan of the Department shall include:
1. a definition of “low–income individual” to be used in the
procurement or provision of energy efficiency, conservation, and greenhouse gas emissions
reduction programs and services;
2. a description of the steps proposed to ensure insulation
materials meet the requirements under § 7–224 of this subtitle; and
3. a proposed average lifetime measure threshold that:
A. encourages the delivery of insulation and weatherization
measures; and
B. is developed through a stakeholder engagement process.
(iii) A plan of an electric company shall include the provision or
procurement of programs and services for residential beneficial electrification.
(d) (1) The Commission shall review the plan of each electric company, each
gas company, and the Department to determine whether the plan is adequate and
cost–effective in achieving the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets established by
the Commission under §§ 7–223(b) and 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(2) The Commission shall consider any written findings provided by the
Maryland Energy Administration, the Department of the Environment, and the Office of
People’s Counsel regarding the design and adequacy of the plan.
(3) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, in approving, modifying, or
denying the plan of an electric company or a gas company, the Commission shall consider:
(i) the cost–effectiveness of the residential, commercial, and
industrial sector subportfolios by using:
– 238 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
1. the primary State jurisdiction–specific test, as developed,
updated, or approved by the Commission, to determine the cost–effectiveness of a program
or service prospectively, including consideration of:
A. participant nonenergy benefits;
B. utility nonenergy benefits; and
C. societal nonenergy benefits; and
2. a total resource cost test to compare the electricity savings
and demand reduction targets of the program or service with the results of similar
programs or services implemented in other jurisdictions, including:
A. participant nonenergy benefits; and
B. utility nonenergy benefits;
(ii) the impact on rates of each ratepayer class;
(iii) the impact on jobs;
(iv) the impact on the environment; and
(v) the impact on the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets
specified in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the Commission
under §§ 7–223(b) and 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(4) Nonenergy benefits considered under paragraph (3) of this subsection
shall be quantifiable and directly related to a program or service.
(5) (i) In approving, modifying, or denying the plan of the Department,
the Commission shall consider:
1. subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
cost–effectiveness of the plan by using the primary State jurisdiction–specific test, as
developed, updated, or approved by the Commission;
2. the impact on rates of each ratepayer class;
3. the impact on jobs;
4. the impact on the environment; and
– 239 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
5. the impact on the greenhouse gas emissions targets
specified in Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the Commission
under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle, and specified in § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle.
(ii) The programs and services offered by the Department are not
required to be cost–effective.
(6) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE A PLAN UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION THAT INCLUDES A RESIDENTIAL SECTOR SUBPROGRAM WITH A
BENEFIT–TO–COST RATIO OF LESS THAN 1.0 UNDER THE PRIMARY STATE
JURISDICTION–SPECIFIC TEST, AS DEVELOPED, UPDATED, OR APPROVED BY THE
COMMISSION.
7–1201.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Large capacity energy resource” means a generating station or energy storage
device that[:
(1) on or before January 1, 2025:
(i) has applied to PJM for interconnection approval; or
(ii) has been approved by PJM for interconnection; and
(2)] has a capacity rating equal to or greater than 20 megawatts after
accounting for the effective load carrying capability.
7–1216.
(a) The Commission may not approve an application for a nuclear energy
generation project submitted under § 7–1212 of this subtitle unless:
(1) the project is connected to the electric system serving the State;
(2) over the duration of the proposed long–term pricing schedule, the
projected net rate impact for an average residential customer, based on annual
consumption of 12,000 kilowatt–hours and combined with the projected net rate impact of
other nuclear energy generation projects, does not exceed an amount determined by the
Commission;
(3) over the duration of the proposed long–term pricing schedule, the
projected net rate impact for all nonresidential customers, considered as a blended average
and combined with the projected net rate impact of other nuclear energy generation
– 240 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
projects, does not exceed a percentage determined by the Commission of nonresidential
customers’ total annual electric bills; and
(4) the price specified in the proposed long–term pricing schedule does not
exceed an amount determined by the Commission.
(b) When calculating the projected net average rate impacts for nuclear energy
generation projects under this section, the Commission shall [apply the same] CONSIDER
THE net long–term cost per megawatt–hour APPLIED to residential and nonresidential
customers.
7–1220.
(a) In this section, “zero–emission credit” means [the difference between the price
that a nuclear energy generating station with a long–term pricing schedule approved in an
order issued under § 7–1217 of this subtitle may receive on the wholesale market and the
cost of constructing the nuclear energy generating station] A CREDIT EQUAL TO THE
ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT OF 1 MEGAWATT–HOUR OF ELECTRICITY THAT IS
DERIVED FROM A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION APPROVED BY THE
COMMISSION UNDER § 7–1217 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) The Commission shall adopt regulations that:
(1) establish the nuclear energy long–term pricing purchase obligation
sufficiently in advance to allow an electric company to reflect nuclear energy long–term
pricing costs as a nonbypassable surcharge that is added to the electric company’s base
distribution rate on customer bills;
(2) define rules that facilitate and ensure the secure and transparent
transfer of revenues and long–term pricing payments among parties;
(3) define the terms and procedures of the nuclear energy long–term
pricing schedule obligations, including:
(i) establishing a formula and process to adjust the value of the
long–term pricing schedule every 2 years based on projected wholesale market prices
adjusted by the locational value and earning potential in the PJM region of the nuclear
energy generating station; and
(ii) establishing a per megawatt hour cap on any long–term pricing
schedule specified in an order issued under § 7–1217 of this subtitle;
(4) require the Commission to establish an escrow account; and
(5) to meet the total statewide long–term pricing purchase obligation for
all applications approved in an order issued under § 7–1217 of this subtitle, require the
– 241 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Commission to annually establish each electric company’s zero–emission credit purchase
obligation based on the most recent final electricity sales data as reported by PJM
Interconnection and measured at the customer’s meter in proportion to the electric
company’s share of statewide load.
(c) (1) Each electric company shall procure from the escrow account
established by regulation under this section a quantity of zero–emission credits equal to
the electric company’s respective percentage of retail electric sales each year.
(2) Subject to any escrow account reserve requirement the Commission
establishes, if there are insufficient zero–emission credits available to satisfy the electric
companies’ zero–emission credit purchase obligations, the overpayment shall be distributed
to electric companies to be refunded or credited to each distribution customer based on the
customer’s consumption of electricity supply that is subject to the renewable energy
portfolio standard.
(d) A debt, an obligation, or a liability of a nuclear energy generation project or of
an owner or operator of a nuclear energy generation project may not be considered a debt,
an obligation, or a liability of the State.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY APPROVE AN INCREASE OF THE TOTAL COST OF A NUCLEAR
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT UNDER A LONG–TERM PRICING PURCHASE
OBLIGATION.
(2) THE TOTAL COST OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT
UNDER A LONG–TERM PRICING PURCHASE OBLIGATION MAY NOT BE INCREASED BY
MORE THAN 15% OF THE ORIGINAL COST.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, the Public Service Commission shall issue a
request for information on the use of a third–party, single–implementer program for the
administration of the programs and services under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public
Utilities Article.
(2) The request for information shall seek:
(i) determinations of what effect the use of a single, third–party
administrator would have on costs;
(ii) identification of technical and logistical barriers to transitioning
to a single, third–party administrator; and
– 242 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(iii) an analysis of the advantages and disadvantages of a private,
third–party administrator as opposed to a State administrator.
(3) The request for information shall specify a completion date of July 1,
2027.
(b) (1) Within 30 days after receiving the information requested in subsection
(a) of this section, the Public Service Commission shall issue a request for proposals for a
third–party administrator for the programs and services under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II
of the Public Utilities Article.
(2) The request for proposals shall specify that responses to the request
should minimize short–term and long–term costs for utility ratepayers.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, on or before June
1, 2028, the Public Service Commission shall select, through the request for proposals
process initiated under subsection (b) of this section, a third–party administrator for the
administration of the programs and services under Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public
Utilities Article.
(2) (i) The Public Service Commission may decline to select a
third–party administrator if the Public Service Commission determines that the use of a
third–party administrator would not be cost effective.
(ii) The Public Service Commission shall notify the General
Assembly of a decision to decline to select a third–party administrator within 5 days after
making the decision.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Power Plant Research Program, in consultation with the Department of
the Environment and the Maryland Energy Administration, shall conduct a study to
identify ways to streamline the permitting process for energy development in the State.
(b) In conducting the study under subsection (a) of this section, the Power Plant
Research Program shall:
(1) identify up to 50 priority energy sites suitable for new or expanded
generating stations or energy storage devices, including:
(i) brownfields;
(ii) industrial sites surrounded by areas with low–population
density; and
– 243 –

Ch. 353 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) sites with old or decommissioned generating units that may be
repowered or repurposed, with special consideration given to sites with surplus
interconnection capacity;
(2) identify current bottlenecks and barriers in the State that extend State
and local permitting timelines; and
(3) develop recommendations on what a State–level zoning or permitting
structure should look like in order to promote fast–tracked development at the priority
energy sites identified in item (1) of this subsection.
(c) On or before December 31, 2026, the Program shall report to the Governor
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly
on the results of the study.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
SECTION 12. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 1, 2, 3, 5, 10, and
11 of this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 13. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and, except as provided in Section 12 of
this Act, shall take effect from the date it is enacted.
SECTION 22. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 8, 19,
and 20 of this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 23. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has been
passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to each of
the two Houses of the General Assembly, and, except as provided in Section 22 of this Act,
shall take effect from the date it is enacted.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 244 –